FORM 10-K
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
(Mark One)
☒ ANNUAL REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d)
OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the fiscal year ended December 31, 2022
OR
☐ TRANSITION REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d)
OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the transition period from ______ to
Commission File Number: 001-8610
AT&T INC.
Incorporated under the laws of the State of Delaware
I.R.S. Employer Identification Number 43-1301883
208 S. Akard St., Dallas, Texas, 75202
Telephone Number 210-821-4105
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:
  Name of each exchange
Title of each class Trading Symbol(s) on which registered
Common Shares (Par Value $1.00 Per Share) T New York Stock Exchange
Depositary Shares, each representing a 1/1000th interest in a share of
5.000% Perpetual Preferred Stock, Series A T PRA New York Stock Exchange
Depositary Shares, each representing a 1/1000th interest in a share of
4.750% Perpetual Preferred Stock, Series C T PRC New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 2.500% Global Notes due March 15, 2023 T 23 New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 2.750% Global Notes due May 19, 2023 T 23C New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. Floating Rate Global Notes due September 5, 2023 T 23D New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 1.050% Global Notes due September 5, 2023 T 23E New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 1.300% Global Notes due September 5, 2023 T 23A New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 1.950% Global Notes due September 15, 2023 T 23F New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 2.400% Global Notes due March 15, 2024 T 24A New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 3.500% Global Notes due December 17, 2025 T 25 New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 0.250% Global Notes due March 4, 2026 T 26E New York Stock Exchange
  Name of each exchange
Title of each class Trading Symbol(s) on which registered
AT&T Inc. 1.800% Global Notes due September 5, 2026 T 26D New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 2.900% Global Notes due December 4, 2026 T 26A New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 1.600% Global Notes due May 19, 2028 T 28C New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 2.350% Global Notes due September 5, 2029 T 29D New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 4.375% Global Notes due September 14, 2029 T 29B New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 2.600% Global Notes due December 17, 2029 T 29A New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 0.800% Global Notes due March 4, 2030 T 30B New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 2.050% Global Notes due May 19, 2032 T 32A New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 3.550% Global Notes due December 17, 2032 T 32 New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 5.200% Global Notes due November 18, 2033 T 33 New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 3.375% Global Notes due March 15, 2034 T 34 New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 2.450% Global Notes due March 15, 2035 T 35 New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 3.150% Global Notes due September 4, 2036 T 36A New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 2.600% Global Notes due May 19, 2038 T 38C New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 1.800% Global Notes due September 14, 2039 T 39B New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 7.000% Global Notes due April 30, 2040 T 40 New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 4.250% Global Notes due June 1, 2043 T 43 New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 4.875% Global Notes due June 1, 2044 T 44 New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 4.000% Global Notes due June 1, 2049 T 49A New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 4.250% Global Notes due March 1, 2050 T 50 New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 3.750% Global Notes due September 1, 2050 T50A New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 5.350% Global Notes due November 1, 2066 TBB New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 5.625% Global Notes due August 1, 2067 TBC New York Stock Exchange
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Act: None.
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer, as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act.
Yes ☒ No ☐
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Act. Yes ☐ No
☒
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934 during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to file such
reports), and (2) has been subject to such filing requirements for the past 90 days. Yes ☒ No ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be submitted
pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required
to submit such files). Yes ☒ No ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, a smaller
reporting company, or an emerging growth company. See definition of “large accelerated filer,” “accelerated filer,” “smaller
reporting company,” and “emerging growth company” in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act.
Large Accelerated Filer ☒ Accelerated Filer ☐
Non-accelerated filer ☐ Smaller reporting company ☐
Emerging growth company ☐
If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for
complying with any new or revised financial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act. ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has filed a report on and attestation to its management's assessment of the
effectiveness of its internal control over financial reporting under Section 404(b) of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act (15 U.S.C. 7262(b)) by
the registered public accounting firm that prepared or issued its audit report. ☒
If securities are registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act, indicate by check mark whether the financial statements of the
registrant included in the filing reflect the correction of an error to previously issued financial statements. ☐
Indicate by check mark whether any of those error corrections are restatements that required a recovery analysis of incentive-based
compensation received by any of the registrant’s executive officers during the relevant recovery period pursuant to §240.10D-1(b).
☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act).
Yes ☐ No ☒
Based on the closing price of $20.96 per share on June 30, 2022, the aggregate market value of our voting and non-voting common
stock held by non-affiliates was $149 billion.
At February 8, 2023, common shares outstanding were 7,129,870,323.
DOCUMENTS INCORPORATED BY REFERENCE
(1)Portions of AT&T Inc.’s Notice of 2022 Annual Meeting and Proxy Statement dated on or about April 3, 2023 to be filed
within the period permitted under General Instruction G(3) (Part III).
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
TABLE OF  CONTENTS
Item Page
PART I
1. Business 1
1A. Risk Factors 8
2. Properties 15
3. Legal Proceedings 15
4. Mine Safety Disclosures 15
Information about our Executive Officers 16
PART II
5.Market for Registrant’s Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases of Equity
Securities 17
6. Item 6. [Reserved] 18
7. Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations 18
7A. Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures about Market Risk 38
8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data 43
9. Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure 98
9A. Controls and Procedures 98
9B. Other Information 98
PART III
10. Directors, Executive Officers and Corporate Governance 99
11. Executive Compensation 99
12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters 100
13. Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence 101
14. Principal Accountant Fees and Services 101
PART IV
15. Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules 101
16. Form 10-K Summary 104
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
PART I
ITEM 1. BUSINESS
GENERAL
AT&T Inc. (“AT&T,” “we” or the “Company”) is a holding company incorporated under the laws of the State of Delaware in 1983
and has its principal executive offices at 208 S. Akard St., Dallas, Texas, 75202 (telephone number 210-821-4105). We maintain an
internet website at www.att.com. (This website address is for information only and is not intended to be an active link or to
incorporate any website information into this document.) We file electronically with the Securities and Exchange Commission
(SEC) required reports on Form 8-K, Form 10-Q and Form 10-K; proxy materials; registration statements on Forms S-3 and S-8, as
necessary; and other forms or reports as required. The SEC maintains a website (www.sec.gov) that contains reports, proxy and
information statements, and other information regarding issuers that file electronically with the SEC. We make available, free of
charge, on our website our annual report on Form 10-K, our quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, current reports on Form 8-K and all
amendments to those reports as soon as reasonably practicable after such reports are electronically filed with, or furnished to, the
SEC. We also make available on that website, and in print, if any stockholder or other person so requests, our “Code of Ethics”
applicable to all employees and Directors, our “Corporate Governance Guidelines,” and the charters for all committees of our
Board of Directors, including Audit, Human Resources and Corporate Governance and Nominating. Any changes to our Code of
Ethics or waiver of our Code of Ethics for senior financial officers, executive officers or Directors will be posted on that website.
A reference to a “Note” refers to the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements in Item 8.
History
AT&T, formerly known as SBC Communications Inc. (SBC), was formed as one of several regional holding companies created to
hold AT&T Corp.’s (ATTC) local telephone companies. On January 1, 1984, we were spun-off from ATTC pursuant to an anti-trust
consent decree, becoming an independent publicly traded telecommunications services provider.
Following our formation, we expanded our communications footprint and operations and invested in entertainment businesses,
most significantly:
•Our subsidiaries merged with incumbent local exchange carriers (ILEC) Pacific Telesis Group in 1997 and Ameritech
Corporation in 1999.
•In 2005, we merged one of our subsidiaries with ATTC, creating one of the world’s leading telecommunications providers.
In connection with the merger, we changed the name of our company from “SBC Communications Inc.” to “AT&T Inc.”
•In 2006, we acquired ILEC BellSouth Corporation (BellSouth), which included BellSouth’s 40 percent economic interest
in AT&T Mobility LLC (AT&T Mobility), formerly Cingular Wireless LLC, resulting in 100 percent ownership of AT&T
Mobility.
•In 2014, we completed the acquisition of wireless provider Leap Wireless International, Inc.
•In 2015, we acquired wireless properties in Mexico and acquired DIRECTV, a leading provider of digital television
entertainment services in both the United States (included in our Video business) and Latin America (referred to as Vrio).
•From 2018 through April 2022, we acquired and held various investments in entertainment businesses, namely Time
Warner Inc., which comprised a substantial portion of our WarnerMedia segment.
•In July 2021, we closed our transaction with TPG Capital (TPG) to form a new company named DIRECTV Entertainment
Holdings, LLC (DIRECTV). With the close of the transaction (DIRECTV Transaction), we separated our Video business,
comprised of our U.S. video operations, and began accounting for our investment in DIRECTV under the equity method.
•In April 2022, we completed the separation of our WarnerMedia business in a Reverse Morris Trust transaction
(WarnerMedia/Discovery Transaction). Upon its separation and distribution, the WarnerMedia business met the criteria for
discontinued operations, as did other dispositions that were part of a single plan, including Vrio, Xandr and Playdemic Ltd.
(Playdemic). These businesses are reflected in our historical financial statements as discontinued operations, including for
periods prior to the consummation of the WarnerMedia separation.
1
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
General
We are a leading provider of telecommunications and technology services globally. The services and products that we offer vary by
market and utilize various technology platforms in a range of geographies. Our reportable segments are organized as follows:
The Communications segment provides wireless and wireline telecom and broadband services to consumers located in the U.S.
and businesses globally. Our business strategies reflect bundled product offerings that cut across product lines and utilize shared
assets. This segment contains the following business units:
•Mobility provides nationwide wireless service and equipment.
•Business Wireline provides advanced ethernet-based fiber services, IP Voice and managed professional services, as well as
traditional voice and data services and related equipment to business customers.
•Consumer Wireline provides broadband services, including fiber connections that provide our multi-gig services to residential
customers in select locations. Consumer Wireline also provides legacy telephony voice communication services.
The Latin America segment provides wireless services and equipment in Mexico.
Corporate and Other reconciles our segment results to consolidated operating income and income before income taxes.
Corporate includes:
•DTV-related retained costs, which are costs previously allocated to the Video business that were retained after the transaction,
net of reimbursements from DIRECTV under transition service agreements.
•Parent administration support, which includes costs borne by AT&T where the business units do not influence decision
making.
•Securitization fees associated with our sales of receivables (see Note 17).
•Value portfolio, which are businesses no longer integral to our operations or which we no longer actively market.
Other items consist of:
•Video, which includes our former U.S. video operations that were contributed to DIRECTV on July 31, 2021, and our share of
DIRECTV’s earnings as equity in net income of affiliates (see Note 19).
•Held-for-sale and other reclassifications, which includes our former Crunchyroll, Government Solutions and wireless and
wireline operations in Puerto Rico and the U.S. Virgin Islands.
•Reclassification of prior service credits, which includes the reclassification of prior service credit amortization, where we
present the impact of benefit plan amendments in our business unit results. Prior service credit amortization is presented in
“Other income (expense) - net” in the consolidated statements of income and therefore has no impact on consolidated
operating income or EBITDA (EBITDA is defined as operating income excluding depreciation and amortization).
•Certain significant items, which includes items associated with the merger and integration of acquired or divested businesses,
including amortization of intangible assets, employee separation charges associated with voluntary and/or strategic offers, asset
impairments and abandonments and restructuring, and other items for which the segments are not being evaluated.
•Eliminations and consolidations, which removes transactions involving dealings between Mobility and our Video business,
prior to the July 31, 2021 separation of Video.
Areas of Focus
We are a leader in providing connectivity services through our market focus areas of 5G and fiber. Fiber underpins the connectivity
we deliver, both wired and wireless. Building on that fiber foundation is our solid spectrum portfolio, strengthened through recent
years’ Federal Communications Commission (FCC) auction acquisitions and 5G deployment. We believe our hybrid fixed wireline
and mobile approach will differentiate our services and provide us with additional growth opportunities in the future as bandwidth
demands continue to grow. We will continue to demonstrate our commitment to ensure management attention is sharply focused on
growth areas and operational efficiencies.
Communications
Our integrated telecommunications network utilizes different technological platforms to provide instant connectivity at the higher
speeds made possible by our fiber network expansion and wireless network enhancements. Streaming, augmented reality, “smart”
technologies and user generated content are expected to continue to drive greater demand for broadband and capitalize on our fiber
and 5G deployments. During 2023, we will continue to develop and provide high-value, integrated mobile and broadband solutions.
Wireless Service We continue to experience rapid growth in data usage as consumers are demanding seamless access across their
wireless and wired devices, and businesses and municipalities are connecting more and more equipment and facilities to the
internet. The deployment of 5G, which allows for faster connectivity, lower latency and greater bandwidth, requires modifications
of existing cell sites to add equipment supporting new frequencies, like the C-Band and the 3.45 GHz band. Our
2
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
5G service went nationwide in July 2020, and with that availability, the introduction of 5G handsets and devices has contributed to
a renewed interest in equipment upgrades. The increased speeds and network operating efficiency expected with 5G technology
should enable massive deployment of devices connected to the internet as well as faster delivery of data services. In January 2022,
we began to deploy our C-band spectrum, subject to certain voluntary limitations.
In North America, our network covers over 441 million people with 4G LTE and over 285 million with 5G technology. In the
United States, our network covers all major metropolitan areas and more than 337 million people with our LTE technology and
more than 285 million people with our 5G technology.
As the wireless industry has matured, future wireless growth will increasingly depend on our ability to offer innovative data
services on a wireless network that has sufficient spectrum and capacity to support these innovations. We expect to continue to
invest significant capital in expanding our network capacity, as well as obtaining additional spectrum that meets our long-term
needs. We participate in FCC spectrum auctions and have been redeploying spectrum previously used for more basic services to
support more advanced mobile internet services.
Broadband Technology In 2020, we identified fiber as a core priority for our business and enhanced our focus to expand our fiber
footprint and grow customers. At December 31, 2022, we had more than 7 million fiber consumer wireline broadband customers,
adding more than 1.2 million during the year. The expansion builds on our recent investments to convert to a software-based
network, managing the migration of wireline customers to services using our fiber infrastructure to provide broadband technology.
Software-based technologies align with our global leadership in software defined network (SDN) and network function
virtualization (NFV). This network approach delivers a demonstrable cost advantage in the deployment of next-generation
technology over the traditional, hardware-intensive network approach. Our virtualized network supports next-generation
applications like 5G and broadband-based services quickly and efficiently.
Latin America
We believe that the wireless model in the U.S., with accelerating demand for mobile internet service and the associated economic
benefits, will be repeated around the world as companies invest in high-speed mobile networks. We acquired Mexican wireless
operations in 2015 to establish a seamless, cross-border North American wireless network which now covers an area with over 441
million people and businesses in the United States and Mexico. With the increased capacity from our LTE network, we also expect
additional wholesale revenue in the coming years. Our 4G LTE network in Mexico now covers approximately 104 million people
and businesses.
BUSINESS OPERATIONS
OPERATING SEGMENTS
Our segments are strategic business units that offer different products and services over various technology platforms and/or in
different geographies that are managed accordingly. We have two reportable segments: Communications and Latin America.
Additional information about our segments, including financial information, is included under the heading “Segment Results” in
Item 7. and in Note 4 of Item 8.
COMMUNICATIONS
Our Communications segment provides wireless and wireline telecom and broadband services to consumers located in the U.S. and
businesses globally. Our Communications services and products are marketed under the AT&T, Cricket, AT&T PREPAID and
AT&T Fiber brand names. The Communications segment provided approximately 97% of 2022 segment operating revenues and
accounted for all of our 2022 total segment income. This segment contains the Mobility, Business Wireline and Consumer Wireline
business units.
Mobility – Our Mobility business unit provides nationwide wireless services to consumers and wholesale and resale wireless
subscribers located in the United States by utilizing our network to provide voice and data services, including high-speed internet
over wireless devices. We classify our subscribers as either postpaid, prepaid, connected device or reseller. As of December 31,
2022, we served 217 million Mobility subscribers, including 85 million postpaid (70 million phone), 19 million prepaid, 6 million
reseller and 107 million connected devices. Our Mobility business unit revenue includes the following categories: service and
equipment.
Services
We offer a comprehensive range of high-quality nationwide wireless voice and data communications services in a variety of pricing
plans to meet the communications needs of targeted customer categories. Through FirstNet services, we also provide a nationwide
wireless broadband network dedicated to public safety.SM
3
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Consumers continue to require increasing availability of data-centric services and a network to connect and control those devices.
An increasing number of our subscribers are using more advanced integrated and data-centric devices, including embedded
computing systems and/or software, commonly called the Internet of Things (IoT). We offer plans that include unlimited features
allowing for the sharing of voice, text and data across multiple devices, which attracts subscribers from other providers and helps
minimize subscriber churn. Customers in our “connected device” category (e.g., users of monitoring devices and automobile
systems) generally purchase those devices from third-party suppliers that buy data access supported by our network. We continue to
upgrade our network and coordinate with equipment manufacturers and application developers to further capitalize on the
continued growing demand for wireless data services.
We also offer nationwide wireless voice and data communications to certain customers who prefer to pay in advance. These
services are offered under the Cricket and AT&T PREPAID brands and are typically monthly prepaid services.
Equipment
We sell a wide variety of handsets, wireless data cards and wireless computing devices manufactured by various suppliers for use
with our voice and data services. We also sell accessories, such as carrying cases and hands-free devices. We sell through our own
company-owned stores, agents and third-party retail stores. We provide our customers the ability to purchase handsets on an
installment basis and the opportunity to bring their own device. Subscribers that bring their own devices or retain handsets for
longer periods impact upgrade activity. Like other wireless service providers, we also provide a limited number of postpaid contract
subscribers substantial equipment subsidies to initiate, renew or upgrade service.
Business Wireline – Our Business Wireline business unit provides services to business customers, including multinational
corporations, small and mid-sized businesses, governmental and wholesale customers. Our Business Wireline business unit revenue
includes the following categories: service and equipment.
Services
We offer advanced IP-based services, such as Virtual Private Networks (VPN), AT&T Dedicated Internet, and Ethernet as well as
traditional data services, cloud solutions, outsourcing and managed professional services. We provide collaboration services that
utilize our IP infrastructure and allow our customers to utilize the most advanced technology to improve their productivity. We also
provide state-of-the-art security solutions like threat management and intrusion detection.
We continue to reconfigure our wireline network to take advantage of the latest technologies and services, and rely on our SDN and
NFV to enhance business customers’ digital agility in a rapidly evolving environment. Some of the services we have offered
historically are in secular decline and going forward we will focus on our owned and operated connectivity services powered by 5G
and fiber.
Equipment
Equipment revenues include customer premises equipment.
Consumer Wireline – Our Consumer Wireline business unit provides broadband services, including fiber connections, and legacy
telephony voice communication services to customers in the United States by utilizing our IP-based and copper wired network. Our
Consumer Wireline business unit revenue includes the following categories: broadband, legacy voice and data services and other
service and equipment.
Broadband Services
We provide broadband and internet services to approximately 15 million customer locations, with 7 million fiber broadband
connections at December 31, 2022. With changes in video viewing preferences and the recent work and learn from home trends, we
are experiencing increasing demand for high-speed broadband services. Our investment in expanding our industry-leading fiber
network positions us to be a leader in wired connectivity. With our focus on fiber that brings efficiencies and owner economics, we
continue to evaluate opportunities where we can turn down existing copper infrastructure.
We believe that our flexible platform with a broadband and wireless connection is the most efficient way to transport direct-to-
consumer video and data experiences both at home and on mobile devices. Through this integrated approach, we can optimize the
use of storage in the home as well as in the cloud, while also providing a seamless service for consumers across screens and
locations.
Legacy Voice and Data Services
Revenues from our traditional voice services continue to decline as customers switch to wireless or VoIP services provided by us,
cable companies or other internet-based providers.
Other Services and Equipment
Other service revenues include AT&T U-verse voice services (which use VoIP technology), customer fees and equipment.
4
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Additional information on our Communications segment is contained in the “Overview” section of Item 7.
LATIN AMERICA
Our Latin America segment provides wireless services in Mexico. We utilize our regional and national wireless networks in Mexico
to provide consumer and business customers with wireless data and voice communication services. We divide our revenue into the
following categories: service and equipment.
Services
We provide postpaid and prepaid wireless services in Mexico to approximately 22 million subscribers under the AT&T and Unefon
brands. Postpaid services allow for (1) no annual service contract for subscribers who bring their own device or purchase a device
on installment and (2) service contracts for periods up to 36 months for subscribers who purchase their equipment under the
traditional device subsidy model. We also offer prepaid services to customers who prefer to pay in advance.
Equipment
We sell a wide variety of handsets, including smartphones manufactured by various suppliers for use with our voice and data
services. We sell through our own company-owned stores, agents and third-party retail stores.
Additional information on our Latin America segment is contained in the “Overview” section of Item 7.
MAJOR CLASSES OF SERVICE
The following table sets forth the percentage of total consolidated reported operating revenues by any class of service that
accounted for 10% or more of our consolidated total operating revenues in any of the last three fiscal years:
Percentage of Total
Consolidated Operating Revenues
2022 2021 2020
Communications Segment
Wireless service 50  % 43  % 39  %
Business service 18 17 17 
Equipment 18 16 12 
Latin America Segment
Wireless service 2 1 1 
Equipment 1 1 1 
Corporate and Other
Video services — 12 20 
U.S. video operations were separated in July 2021. See Note 6
Additional information on our geographical distribution of revenues is contained in Note 4 of Item 8.
GOVERNMENT REGULATION
Facilities-based wireless communications providers in the United States, like AT&T, must be licensed by the FCC to provide
communications services at specified spectrum frequencies within defined geographic areas and must comply with FCC rules and
policies governing the use of the spectrum. The FCC’s rules have a direct impact on whether the wireless industry has sufficient
spectrum available to support the high-quality, innovative services our customers demand. Wireless licenses are issued for a fixed
time period, typically 10 to 15 years, and we must seek renewal of these licenses. While the FCC has generally renewed licenses,
the FCC has authority to both revoke a license for cause and to deny a license renewal if a renewal is not in the public interest.
Additionally, while wireless communications providers’ prices and service offerings are generally not subject to regulation, the
federal government and various states periodically consider new regulations and legislation relating to various aspects of wireless
services.
The Communications Act of 1934 and other related laws give the FCC broad authority to regulate the U.S. operations of our
satellite and interstate telecommunications services. In addition, our ILEC subsidiaries are subject to regulation by state
governments, which have the power to regulate intrastate rates and services, including local, long-distance and network access1
1
5
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
services, provided such state regulation is consistent with federal law. Some states have eliminated or reduced regulations on our
retail offerings. These subsidiaries are also subject to the jurisdiction of the FCC with respect to intercarrier compensation,
interconnection, and interstate and international rates and services, including interstate access charges. Access charges are a form of
intercarrier compensation designed to reimburse our wireline subsidiaries for the use of their networks by other carriers.
We continue to support regulatory and legislative measures and efforts at both the federal and state levels to minimize and/or
moderate regulatory burdens that are no longer appropriate in a competitive communications market and that inhibit our ability to
compete more effectively and offer services wanted and needed by our customers, including initiatives to transition services from
traditional networks to all IP-based networks. At the same time, we also seek to ensure that legacy regulations are not further
extended to broadband or wireless services, which are subject to vigorous competition.
Our subsidiaries operating outside the United States are subject to the jurisdiction of national and supranational regulatory
authorities in the market where service is provided.
For a discussion of significant regulatory issues directly affecting our operations, please see the information contained under the
headings “Operating Environment Overview” and “Regulatory Developments” of Item 7, which information is incorporated herein
by reference.
IMPORTANCE, DURATION AND EFFECT OF LICENSES
Certain of our subsidiaries own or have licenses to various patents, copyrights, trademarks and other intellectual property necessary
to conduct business. Many of our subsidiaries also hold government-issued licenses or franchises to provide wireline or wireless
services. Additional information relating to regulation affecting those rights is contained under the heading “Operating
Environment Overview,” of Item 7. We actively pursue patents, trademarks and service marks to protect our intellectual property
within the United States and abroad. We maintain a significant global portfolio of patents, trademarks and service mark
registrations. We have also entered into agreements that permit other companies, in exchange for fees and rights, and subject to
appropriate safeguards and restrictions, to utilize certain of our patents, trademarks and service marks. As we transition our network
from a switch-based network to an IP, software-based network, we have increasingly entered into licensing agreements with
software developers.
We periodically receive offers from third parties to obtain licenses for patents and other intellectual rights in exchange for royalties
or other payments. We also receive notices from third parties asserting that our products or services sold to customers or software-
based network functions infringe on their patents and other intellectual property rights. These claims, whether against us directly,
such as network functions, or against third-party suppliers of products or services that we, in turn, sell to our customers, such as
wireless handsets, could require us to pay damages, pay royalties, stop offering the relevant products or services and/or cease
network functions or other activities. While the outcome of any litigation is uncertain, we do not believe that the resolution of any
of these infringement claims or the expiration or non-renewal of any of our intellectual property rights would have a material
adverse effect on our results of operations.
MAJOR CUSTOMERS
No customer accounted for 10% or more of our consolidated revenues in 2022, 2021 or 2020.
COMPETITION
Competition continues to increase for communications and digital services from traditional and nontraditional competitors.
Technological advances have expanded the types and uses of services and products available. In addition, lack of or a reduced level
of regulation of comparable legacy services has lowered costs for alternative communications service providers. As a result, we
face continuing competition as well as some new opportunities in significant portions of our business.
Wireless We face substantial competition in our wireless businesses. Under current FCC rules, multiple licensees, who provide
wireless services on the cellular, PCS, Advanced Wireless Services, 700 MHz and other spectrum bands, may operate in each of our
U.S. service areas. Our competitors include two national wireless providers; a larger number of regional providers and resellers of
those services; and certain cable companies. In addition, we face competition from providers who offer voice, text messaging and
other services as applications on data networks. We are one of three facilities-based providers in Mexico (retail and wholesale),
with the most significant market share controlled by América Móvil. We may experience significant competition from companies
that provide similar services using other communications technologies and services. While some of these technologies and services
are now operational, others are being developed or may be developed. We compete for customers based principally on
service/device offerings, price, network quality, coverage area and customer service.
6
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Broadband The desire for high-speed data on demand, including video, is continuing to lead customers to terminate their
traditional wired or linear services and use our fiber services or competitors’ wireless, satellite and internet-based services. In most
U.S. markets, we compete for customers with large cable companies for high-speed internet and voice services, wireless broadband
providers, and other smaller telecommunications companies for both long-distance and local services.
Legacy Voice and Data We continue to lose legacy voice and data subscribers due to competitors (e.g., wireless, cable and VoIP
providers) who can provide comparable services at lower prices because they are not subject to traditional telephone industry
regulation (or the extent of regulation they are subject to is in dispute), utilize different technologies or promote a different business
model (such as advertising-based).
Additionally, we provide local and interstate telephone and switched services to other service providers, primarily large internet
service providers using the largest class of nationwide internet networks (internet backbone), wireless carriers, other telephone
companies, cable companies and systems integrators. These services are subject to additional competitive pressures from the
development of new technologies, the introduction of innovative offerings and increasing satellite, wireless, fiber-optic and cable
transmission capacity for services.
RESEARCH AND DEVELOPMENT
AT&T scientists and engineers conduct research in a variety of areas, including IP networking, advanced network design and
architecture, network and cyber security, network operations support systems and data analytics. The majority of the development
activities are performed to create new services and to invent tools and systems to manage secure and reliable networks for us and
our customers. Research and development expenses were $1,236 in 2022, $1,325 in 2021, and $1,013 in 2020.
HUMAN CAPITAL
Number of Employees As of January 31, 2023, we employed approximately 160,700 persons.
Employee Development We believe our success depends on our employees’ success and that all employees must have the skills
they need to thrive. We offer training and elective courses that give employees the opportunity to enhance their skills. We also
intend to help cultivate the next generation of talent that will lead our company into the future by providing employees with
educational opportunities through our award-winning internal training organization, AT&T University.
Labor Contracts Approximately 42% of our employees are represented by the Communications Workers of America (CWA), the
International Brotherhood of Electrical Workers (IBEW) or other unions. After expiration of the collective bargaining agreements,
work stoppages or labor disruptions may occur in the absence of new contracts or other agreements being reached. The main
contracts included the following: A contract covering approximately 7,000 Mobility employees in nine states, for which we reached
tentative agreement in February 2023. A contract covering approximately 400 employees supporting internet-based products is set
to expire in July 2023. A contract covering approximately 200 employees in Illinois is set to expire in May 2023.
Compensation and Benefits In addition to salaries, we provide a variety of benefit programs to help meet the needs of our
employees. These programs cover active and former employees and may vary by subsidiary and region. These programs include
401(k) plans, pension benefits, and health and welfare benefits, among many others. In addition to our active employee base, at
December 31, 2022, we had approximately 506,000 retirees and dependents who were eligible to receive retiree benefits.
We review our benefit plans to maintain competitive packages that reflect the needs of our workforce. We also adapt our
compensation model to provide fair and inclusive pay practices across our business. We are committed to pay equity for employees
who hold the same jobs, work in the same geographic area, and have the same levels of experience and performance.
Employee Safety We provide our employees access to flexible and convenient health and welfare programs and workplace
accommodations. We have prioritized self-care and emphasized a focus on wellness, providing personal protective equipment,
flexible scheduling or time-off options and implementing technologies to enhance the remote-work environment.
Diversity, Equity and Inclusion We believe that championing diversity and fostering inclusion does more than just make us a
better company, it contributes to a world where people are empowered to be their very best. That is why we are committed to
equality and why our company purpose is to connect people to greater possibilities. This focus on diversity emanates from our
diverse and inclusive workforce, which is a product of our unwavering commitment to ensure that employees from any and every
segment of society are treated with fairness and provided equal opportunities to advance in the company.
7
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
To have a diverse and inclusive workforce, we have put an emphasis on attracting and hiring talented people who represent a mix
of backgrounds, identities and experiences. Across the AT&T family of companies, we have employee groups that reflect our
diverse workforce. These groups are not only organized around women, people of color, LGBTQ+ individuals, people with
disabilities and veterans, but also around professionals who are experienced or interested in cybersecurity, engineering, innovation
and project management. When everyone’s unique story is celebrated, we are able to connect, create and innovate in real and
meaningful ways. It is important that our employees feel valued, have a sense of belonging and are fully engaged in our success.
ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS
In addition to the other information set forth in this document, including the matters contained under the caption “Cautionary
Language Concerning Forward-Looking Statements,” you should carefully read the matters described below. We believe that each
of these matters could materially affect our business. We recognize that most of these factors are beyond our ability to control and
therefore we cannot predict an outcome.
Macro-economic Factors:
Adverse changes in the U.S. securities markets, interest rates, rising inflation and medical costs could materially increase
our benefit plan costs and future funding requirements.
Our costs to provide current benefits and funding for future benefits are subject to increases, primarily due to continuing increases
in medical and prescription drug costs, in part due to inflation, and can be affected by lower returns on assets held by our pension
and other benefit plans, which are reflected in our financial statements for that year. In calculating the recognized benefit costs, we
have made certain assumptions regarding future investment returns, interest rates and medical costs. These assumptions could
change significantly over time and could be materially different than originally projected. Lower than assumed investment returns,
an increase in our benefit obligations, and higher than assumed medical and prescription drug costs will increase expenses.
The Financial Accounting Standards Board (FASB) requires companies to recognize the funded status of defined benefit pension
and postretirement plans as an asset or liability in their statement of financial position and to recognize changes in that funded
status in the year in which the changes occur. We have elected to reflect the annual adjustments to the funded status in our
consolidated statement of income. Therefore, an increase in our costs or adverse market conditions will have a negative effect on
our operating results.
Significant adverse changes in capital markets could result in the deterioration of our defined benefit plans’ funded status.
Inflationary pressures on costs, such as inputs for devices we sell and network components, labor and distribution costs may
impact our network construction, our financial condition or results of operations.
As a provider of telecommunications and technology services, we sell handsets, wireless data cards, wireless computing devices
and customer premises equipment manufactured by various suppliers for use with our voice and data services and depend on
suppliers to provide us, directly or through other suppliers, with items such as network equipment, customer premises equipment,
and wireless-related equipment such as mobile hotspots, handsets, wirelessly enabled computers, wireless data cards and other
connected devices for our customers. Beginning in 2021 and continuing through the early part of 2023, the costs of these inputs and
the costs of labor necessary to develop, deploy and maintain our networks and our products and services rapidly increased. In
addition, many of these inputs are subject to price fluctuations from a number of factors, including, but not limited to, market
conditions, demand for raw materials used in the production of these devices and network components, weather, climate change,
energy costs, currency fluctuations, supplier capacities, governmental actions, import and export requirements (including tariffs),
and other factors beyond our control. Inflationary and supply pressures may continue into the future and could have an adverse
impact on our ability to source materials.
Our attempts to offset these cost pressures, such as through increases in the selling prices of some of our products and services, may
not be successful. Higher product prices may result in reductions in sales volume. Consumers may be less willing to pay a price
differential for our products and may increasingly purchase lower-priced offerings, or may forego some purchases altogether,
during a period of inflationary pressure or an economic downturn. To the extent that price increases are not sufficient to offset these
increased costs adequately or in a timely manner, and/or if they result in significant decreases in sales volume, our business,
financial condition or operating results may be adversely affected. Furthermore, we may not be able to offset any cost increases
through productivity and cost-saving initiatives.
8
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Adverse changes in global financial markets could limit our ability and our larger customers’ ability to access capital or
increase the cost of capital needed to fund business operations.
During 2022, uncertainty surrounding global growth rates, inflation, an increasing interest rate environment and the impact of the
COVID-19 pandemic continued to produce volatility in the credit, currency and equity markets. Volatility may affect companies’
access to the credit markets, leading to higher borrowing costs, or, in some cases, the inability to fund ongoing operations. In
addition, we contract with large financial institutions to support our own treasury operations, including contracts to hedge our
exposure on interest rates and foreign exchange and the funding of credit lines and other short-term debt obligations, including
commercial paper. These financial institutions face stricter capital-related and other regulations in the United States and Europe, as
well as ongoing legal and financial issues concerning their loan portfolios, which may hamper their ability to provide credit or raise
the cost of providing such credit.
The U.K. Financial Conduct Authority, which regulates the London Interbank Offering Rate (LIBOR), has announced that it
intends to phase out LIBOR in 2023. Although our securities and other debt obligations may provide for alternative methods of
calculating the interest rate payable on such indebtedness, uncertainty as to the extent and manner of future changes may adversely
affect the current trading market for LIBOR-based securities and the value of variable rate indebtedness in general. A company’s
cost of borrowing is also affected by evaluations given by various credit rating agencies and these agencies have been applying
tighter credit standards when evaluating debt levels and future growth prospects. While we have been successful in continuing to
access the credit and fixed income markets when needed, adverse changes in the financial markets could render us either unable to
access these markets or able to access these markets only at higher interest costs and with restrictive financial or other conditions,
severely affecting our business operations. Additionally, downgrades of our credit rating by the major credit rating agencies could
increase our cost of borrowing and also impact the collateral we would be required to post under certain agreements we have
entered into with our derivative counterparties, which could negatively impact our liquidity. Further, valuation changes in our
derivative portfolio due to interest rates and foreign exchange rates could require us to post collateral and thus may negatively
impact our liquidity.
Our international operations increase our exposure to political instability, to changes in the international economy and to
regulation on our business and these risks could offset our expected growth opportunities.
We have international operations, particularly in Mexico, and other countries worldwide where we need to comply with a wide
variety of complex local laws, regulations and treaties. In addition, we are exposed to, among other factors, fluctuations in currency
values, changes in relationships between U.S. and foreign governments, war or other hostilities, and other regulations that may
materially affect our earnings. Involvement with foreign firms also exposes us to the risk of being unable to control the actions of
those firms and therefore exposes us to risks associated with our obligation to comply with the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act
(FCPA). Violations of the FCPA could have a material adverse effect on our operating results.
Industry-wide Factors:
Our business is subject to risks related to the COVID-19 virus.
The COVID-19 pandemic and resulting mitigation measures have caused, and may continue to cause, a negative effect on our
operating results. These effects include, but are not limited to closure of retail stores; impact on our customers’ ability to pay for our
products and services; reduction in international roaming revenue; and reduced staffing levels in call centers and field operations.
We may also incur significantly higher expenses attributable to infrastructure investments required to meet higher network
utilization from more customers consuming bandwidth from changes in work from home trends; extended cancellation periods; and
increased labor costs if the COVID-19 pandemic continues for an extended period.
The COVID-19 pandemic and mitigation measures have caused, and may continue to cause, adverse impacts on global supply
chains and economic conditions. These impacts could affect our network development, deployment and maintenance, and the
demand for our products and services. The extent to which the COVID-19 pandemic impacts our business, results of operations,
cash flows and financial condition will depend on future developments that are highly uncertain and cannot be predicted, including
new information that may emerge concerning other strains of the virus and the actions to contain its impact.
Changes to federal, state and foreign government regulations and decisions in regulatory proceedings, as well as private
litigation, could further increase our operating costs and/or alter customer perceptions of our operations, which could
materially adversely affect us.
Our subsidiaries providing wired services are subject to significant federal and state regulation while many of our competitors are
not. In addition, our subsidiaries and affiliates operating outside the United States are also subject to the jurisdiction of national and
supranational regulatory authorities in the market where service is provided. Our wireless subsidiaries are regulated to varying
degrees by the FCC and in some instances, by state and local agencies. Adverse regulations and rulings by the FCC relating to
broadband and wireless deployment could impede our ability to manage our networks and recover costs and lessen incentives to
invest in our networks. The continuing growth of IP-based services, especially when accessed by wireless
9
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
devices, has created or potentially could create conflicting regulation between the FCC and various state and local authorities,
which may involve lengthy litigation to resolve and may result in outcomes unfavorable to us. In addition, in response to the FAA
questioning whether our 5G C-band launch could impact radio altimeter equipment on airplanes, we voluntarily committed to a
series of temporary, precautionary measures, in addition to deferring turning on a limited number of towers around certain airports
to allow the FAA more time to evaluate. These measures have been subsequently modified from time to time. The FAA’s continued
evaluation may impact our planned 5G C-band launch in certain areas. In addition, increased public focus on a variety of issues
related to our operations, such as privacy issues, government requests or orders for customer data, and concerns about global
climate changes, have led to proposals or new legislation at state, federal and foreign government levels to change or increase
regulation on our operations. Enactment of new privacy laws and regulations could, among other things, adversely affect our ability
to collect and offer targeted advertisements or result in additional costs of compliance or litigation. Should customers decide that
our competitors offer a more customer-friendly environment, our competitive position, results of operations or financial condition
could be materially adversely affected.
Effects of climate change may impose risk of damage to our infrastructure, our ability to provide services, and may cause
changes in federal, state and foreign government regulation, all of which may result in potential adverse impact to our
financial results.
Extreme weather events precipitated by long-term climate change have the potential to directly damage network facilities or disrupt
our ability to build and maintain portions of our network and could potentially disrupt suppliers’ ability to provide products and
services required to provide reliable network coverage. Any such disruption could delay network deployment plans, interrupt
service for our customers, increase our costs and have a negative effect on our operating results. The potential physical effects of
climate change, such as increased frequency and severity of storms, floods, fires, freezing conditions, sea-level rise and other
climate-related events, could adversely affect our operations, infrastructure and financial results. Operational impacts resulting
from the potential physical effects of climate change, such as damage to our network infrastructure, could result in increased costs
and loss of revenue. We could incur significant costs to improve the climate resiliency of our infrastructure and otherwise prepare
for, respond to, and mitigate such physical effects of climate change. We are not able to accurately predict the materiality of any
potential losses or costs associated with the physical effects of climate change.
Further, customers, consumers, investors and other stakeholders are increasingly focusing on environmental issues, including
climate change, water use, deforestation, plastic waste and other sustainability concerns. Concern over climate change or other
environmental, social and governance (ESG) matters may result in new or increased legal and regulatory requirements to reduce or
mitigate impacts to the environment and reduce the impact of our business on climate change. Further, climate change regulations
may require us to alter our proposed business plans or increase our operating costs due to increased regulation or environmental
considerations, and could adversely affect our business and reputation.
Continuing growth in and the converging nature of wireless and broadband services will require us to deploy significant
amounts of capital and require ongoing access to spectrum in order to provide attractive services to customers.
Wireless and broadband services are undergoing rapid and significant technological changes and a dramatic increase in usage,
including, in particular, the demand for faster and seamless usage of data, including video, across mobile and fixed devices. The
COVID-19 pandemic has accelerated these changes and also resulted in higher network utilization, as more customers consume
bandwidth from changes in work and learn from home trends. We must continually invest in our networks in order to improve our
wireless and broadband services to meet this increasing demand and changes in customer expectations while remaining
competitive. Improvements in these services depend on many factors, including continued access to and deployment of adequate
spectrum and the capital needed to expand our wireline network to support transport of these services. In order to stem broadband
subscriber losses to cable competitors in our non-fiber wireline areas, we have been expanding our all-fiber wireline network. We
must maintain and expand our network capacity and coverage for transport of data, including video, and voice between cell and
fixed landline sites. To this end, we participate in spectrum auctions and continue to deploy software and other technology
advancements in order to efficiently invest in our network.
We have spent, and plan to continue spending, significant capital and other resources on the ongoing development and deployment
of our 5G and fiber wireline networks. This deployment and other network service enhancements and product launches may not
occur as scheduled or at the cost expected due to many factors, including unexpected inflation, delays in determining equipment
and wireless handset operating standards, supplier delays, software issues, increases in network and handset component costs,
regulatory permitting delays for tower sites or enhancements, or labor-related delays. Deployment of new technology also may
adversely affect the performance of the network for existing services. If we cannot acquire needed spectrum, our 5G and fiber
offerings fail to gain acceptance in the marketplace or we otherwise fail to deploy the services customers desire on a timely basis
with acceptable quality and at reasonable costs, then our ability to attract and retain customers, and, therefore, maintain and
improve our operating margins, could be materially adversely affected.
10
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Increasing competition for wireless customers could materially adversely affect our operating results.
We have multiple wireless competitors in each of our service areas and compete for customers based principally on service/device
offerings, price, network quality, coverage area and customer service. In addition, we are facing growing competition from
providers offering services using advanced wireless technologies and IP-based networks. We expect market saturation to continue
to cause the wireless industry’s customer growth rate to moderate in comparison with historical growth rates, leading to increased
competition for customers. Our share of industry sales could be reduced due to aggressive pricing or promotional strategies pursued
by competitors. We also expect that our customers’ growing demand for high-speed video and data services will place constraints
on our network capacity. These competition and capacity constraints will continue to put pressure on pricing and margins as
companies compete for potential customers. Our ability to respond will depend, among other things, on continued improvement in
network quality and customer service and our ability to price our products and services competitively as well as effective marketing
of attractive products and services. These efforts will involve significant expenses and require strategic management decisions on,
and timely implementation of, equipment choices, network deployment and service offerings.
Intellectual property rights may be inadequate to take advantage of business opportunities, which may materially adversely
affect our operations.
Effective intellectual property protection may not be available in every country where we operate. We may need to spend
significant amounts of money to protect our rights. Any impairment of our intellectual property rights, including due to changes in
U.S. or foreign intellectual property laws or the absence of effective legal protections or enforcement measures, could materially
adversely impact our operations.
Incidents leading to damage to our reputation, and any resulting lawsuits, claims or other legal proceedings, could have a
material adverse effect on our business.
We believe that our brand image, awareness and reputation strengthen our relationship with consumers and contribute significantly
to the success of our business. We strive to create a culture in which our colleagues act with integrity and respect and feel
comfortable speaking up to report instances of misconduct or other concerns. Our ability to attract and retain employees is highly
dependent upon our commitment to a diverse and inclusive workplace, ethical business practices and other qualities. Acts of
misconduct by any employee, and particularly by senior management, could erode trust and confidence and damage our reputation.
Negative public opinion could result from actual or alleged conduct by us or those currently or formerly associated with us, and
from any number of activities or circumstances, including operations, employment-related offenses (such as sexual harassment and
discrimination), regulatory compliance and actions taken by regulators or others in response to such conduct. Any damage to our
reputation or payments of significant amounts, even if reserved, could materially and adversely affect our business, reputation,
financial condition, results of operations and cash flows. We currently are, and may in the future be, named as a defendant in
lawsuits, claims and other legal proceedings that arise in the ordinary course of our business based on alleged acts of misconduct by
employees. These actions seek, among other things, compensation for alleged personal injury (including claims for loss of life),
workers’ compensation, employment discrimination, sexual harassment, workplace misconduct, wage and hour claims and other
employment-related damages, compensation for breach of contract, statutory or regulatory claims, negligence or gross negligence,
punitive damages, consequential damages, and civil penalties or other losses or injunctive or declaratory relief. The outcome of any
allegations, lawsuits, claims or legal proceedings is inherently uncertain and could result in significant costs, damage to our brands
or reputation and diversion of management’s attention from our business.
Company-Specific Financial Factors:
Customer adoption of new software-based technologies may require higher quality services from us, and meeting these
demands could create supply chain issues and could increase capital costs.
The communications industry has experienced rapid changes in the past several years. An increasing number of our customers are
using mobile devices as their primary means of viewing video. In addition, businesses and government bodies are broadly shifting
to wireless-based services for homes and infrastructure to improve services to their respective customers and constituencies. We
have spent, and continue to spend, significant capital to shift our wired network to software-based technology to manage this
demand and are expanding 5G wireless technology to address these consumer demands. We are entering into a significant number
of software licensing agreements and working with software developers to provide network functions in lieu of installing switches
or other physical network equipment in order to respond to rapid developments in wireless demand. While software-based
functionality can be changed much more quickly than, for example, physical switches, the rapid pace of development means that
we may increasingly need to rely on single-source and software solutions that have not previously been deployed in production
environments. Should this software not function as intended or our license agreements provide inadequate protection from
intellectual property infringement claims, we could be forced to either substitute (if available) or else spend time to develop
alternative technologies at a much higher cost and incur harm to our reputation for reliability, and, as a result, our ability to remain
competitive could be materially adversely affected.
11
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
We depend on various suppliers to provide equipment to operate our business and satisfy customer demand and
interruption or delay in supply can adversely impact our operating results.
We depend on suppliers to provide us, directly or through other suppliers, with items such as network equipment, customer
premises equipment and wireless-related equipment such as mobile hotspots, handsets, wirelessly enabled computers, wireless data
cards and other connected devices for our customers. These suppliers could fail to provide equipment on a timely or cost effective
basis, or fail to meet our performance expectations, for a number of reasons, including difficulties in obtaining export licenses for
certain technologies, inflationary pressures, inability to secure component parts, general business disruption, natural disasters,
safety issues, economic and political instability, including the outbreak of war and other hostilities, and public health emergencies
such as the COVID-19 pandemic. These factors have caused, and may again cause, delays in the development, manufacturing
(including the sourcing of key components) and shipment of products to the extent that we or our suppliers are impacted. In certain
limited circumstances, suppliers have been unable to supply products in a timely fashion, affecting our ability to provide products
and services precisely as and when requested by our customers. It is possible that, in some circumstances, we could be forced to
switch to a different key supplier or be unable to meet customer demand for certain products or services. Because of the cost and
time lag that can be associated with transitioning from one supplier to another, our business could be substantially disrupted if we
were required to, or chose to, replace the products of one or more key suppliers with products from another source, especially if the
replacement became necessary on short notice. Any such disruption could increase our costs, decrease our operating efficiencies
and have a negative effect on our operating results.
Increasing costs to provide services and failure to renew agreements on favorable terms, or at all, could adversely affect
operating margins.
Our operating costs, including customer acquisition and retention costs, could continue to put pressure on margins and customer
retention levels.
A number of our competitors offering comparable legacy services that rely on alternative technologies and business models are
typically subject to less regulation, and therefore are able to operate with lower costs. These competitors generally can focus on
discrete customer segments since they do not have regulatory obligations to provide universal service. Also, these competitors have
cost advantages compared to us, due in part to operating on newer, more technically advanced and lower-cost networks with a
nonunionized workforce, lower employee benefits and fewer retirees. We are transitioning services from our old copper-based
network and seeking regulatory approvals, where needed, at both the state and federal levels. If we do not obtain regulatory
approvals for our network transition or obtain approvals with onerous conditions, we could experience significant cost and
competitive disadvantages.
We may not realize or sustain the expected benefits from our business transformation initiatives and these efforts could
have a materially adverse effect on our business, operations, financial condition, results of operations and competitive
position.
We have been and will be undertaking certain transformation initiatives, including the WarnerMedia/Discovery Transaction, which
are designed to reduce costs, streamline and modernize distribution and customer service, remove redundancies and simplify and
improve processes and support functions. Our focus is on supporting added customer value with an improved customer experience.
We intend for these efficiencies to enable increased investments in our strategic areas of focus, which consist of improving
broadband connectivity (for example, fiber and 5G). We also expect these initiatives to drive efficiencies and improved margins. If
we do not successfully manage and execute these initiatives, or if they are inadequate or ineffective, we may fail to meet our
financial goals and achieve anticipated benefits, improvements may be delayed, not sustained or not realized, and our business,
operations and competitive position could be adversely affected.
Unfavorable litigation or governmental investigation results could require us to pay significant amounts or lead to onerous
operating procedures.
We are subject to a number of lawsuits both in the United States and in foreign countries, including, at any particular time, claims
relating to antitrust, patent infringement, wage and hour, personal injury, customer privacy violations, regulatory proceedings,
breach of contract, and selling and collection practices. We also spend substantial resources complying with various government
standards, which may entail related investigations and litigation. In the wireless area, we also face current and potential litigation
relating to alleged adverse health effects on customers or employees who use such technologies including, for example, wireless
devices. We may incur significant expenses defending such suits or government charges and may be required to pay amounts or
otherwise change our operations in ways that could materially adversely affect our operations or financial results.
Cyberattacks impacting our networks or systems may have a material adverse affect on our operations.
Cyberattacks, including through the use of malware, computer viruses, distributed denial of services attacks, ransomware attacks,
credential harvesting, social engineering and other means for obtaining unauthorized access to or disrupting the operation of our
networks and systems and those of our suppliers, vendors and other service providers, could have a material adverse effect on our
operations. Cyberattacks can cause equipment or network failures, loss of information, including sensitive personal information of
customers or employees or proprietary information, as well as disruptions to our or our customers’, suppliers’ or vendors’
operations, which could result in significant expenses, potential investigations and legal liability, a loss of
12
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
current or future customers and reputational damage. Our wired network in particular is becoming increasingly reliant on software
as it evolves to handle growing demands for video transmission. Cyberattacks against companies, including the Company and its
suppliers and vendors, have occurred and will continue to occur and have increased in frequency, scope and potential harm in
recent years. The development and maintenance of systems to prevent such attacks is costly and requires ongoing monitoring and
updating. While, to date, we have not been subject to cyberattacks that, individually or in the aggregate, have been material to our
operations or financial condition, the preventive actions we take to reduce the risks associated with cyberattacks may be insufficient
to repel or mitigate the effects of a major cyberattack in the future.
Natural disasters, extreme weather conditions or terrorist or other hostile acts could cause damage to our infrastructure
and result in significant disruptions to our operations.
Our business operations could be subject to interruption by equipment failures, power outages, terrorist or other hostile acts, and
natural disasters, such as flooding, hurricanes and forest fires, whether caused by discrete severe weather events and/or precipitated
by long-term climate change. Such events could cause significant damage to the infrastructure upon which our business operations
rely, resulting in degradation or disruption of service to our customers, as well as significant recovery time and expenditures to
resume operations. Our system redundancy and other measures we take to protect our infrastructure and operations from the
impacts of such events may be ineffective or inadequate to sustain our operations through all such events. Any of these occurrences
could result in lost revenues from business interruption, damage to our reputation and reduced profits.
Increases in our debt levels to fund spectrum purchases, or other strategic decisions could adversely affect our ability to
finance future debt at attractive rates and reduce our ability to respond to competition and adverse economic trends.
We have incurred debt to fund significant acquisitions, as well as spectrum purchases needed to compete in our industry. While we
believe such decisions were prudent and necessary to take advantage of both growth opportunities and respond to industry
developments, we did experience credit-rating downgrades from historical levels. Banks and potential purchasers of our publicly
traded debt may decide that these strategic decisions and similar actions we may take in the future, as well as expected trends in the
industry, will continue to increase the risk of investing in our debt and may demand a higher rate of interest, impose restrictive
covenants or otherwise limit the amount of potential borrowing. Additionally, our capital allocation plan is focused on, among other
things, managing our debt level going forward. Any failure to successfully execute this plan could adversely affect our cost of
funds, liquidity, competitive position and access to capital markets.
Our business may be impacted by changes in tax laws and regulations, judicial interpretations of the same or administrative
actions by federal, state, local and foreign taxing authorities.
Tax laws are dynamic and subject to change as new laws are passed and new interpretations of the law are issued or applied. In
many cases, the application of existing, newly enacted or amended tax laws (such as the U.S. Tax Cuts and Jobs Act of 2017 and
the Inflation Reduction Act of 2022) may be uncertain and subject to differing interpretations, especially when evaluated against
ever changing products and services provided by our global telecommunications and technology businesses. In addition, tax
legislation has been introduced or is being considered in various jurisdictions that could significantly impact our tax rate, tax
liabilities, and carrying value of deferred tax assets or deferred tax liabilities. Any of these changes could materially impact our
financial performance and our tax provision, net income and cash flows.
We are also subject to ongoing examinations by taxing authorities in various jurisdictions. Although we regularly assess the
likelihood of an adverse outcome resulting from these examinations to determine the adequacy of provisions for taxes, there can be
no assurance as to the outcome of these examinations. In the event that we have not accurately or fully described, disclosed or
determined, calculated or remitted amounts that were due to taxing authorities or if the ultimate determination of our taxes owed is
for an amount in excess of amounts previously accrued, we could be subject to additional taxes, penalties and interest, which could
materially impact our business, financial condition and operating results.
If the distribution of WarnerMedia, together with certain related transactions, were to fail to qualify for non-recognition
treatment for U.S. federal income tax purposes under audit, then we could be subject to significant tax liability.
In connection with the WarnerMedia/Discovery Transaction, AT&T received a favorable Private Letter Ruling from the IRS.
Nonetheless, the IRS or another applicable tax authority could determine on audit that the distribution by us of WarnerMedia to our
stockholders and certain related transactions should be treated as taxable transactions if it determines that any of the facts,
representations or undertakings made in connection with the request for the ruling were incorrect or are violated. We may be
entitled to indemnification from Warner Bros. Discovery (Warner Bros.) in the case of certain breaches of representations or
undertakings by Warner Bros. under the tax matters agreement related to the WarnerMedia/Discovery Transaction. However, we
could potentially be required to pay such tax prior to reimbursement from Warner Bros., and such indemnification is subject to
Warner Bros.’ credit risk. If the IRS or another tax authority were to so conclude, there could be a material adverse impact on our
business, financial condition, results of operations and cash flows.
13
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
CAUTIONARY LANGUAGE CONCERNING FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS
Information set forth in this report contains forward-looking statements that are subject to risks and uncertainties, and actual results
could differ materially. Many of these factors are discussed in more detail in the “Risk Factors” section. We claim the protection of
the safe harbor for forward-looking statements provided by the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995.
The following factors could cause our future results to differ materially from those expressed in the forward-looking statements:
•The severity, magnitude and duration of the COVID-19 pandemic and containment, mitigation and other measures taken in
response, including the potential impacts of these matters on our business and operations.
•Our inability to predict the extent to which the COVID-19 pandemic and related impacts will continue to impact our business
operations, financial performance and results of operations.
•Adverse economic, political and/or capital access changes or war or other hostilities in the markets served by us or in countries
in which we have investments and/or operations, including inflationary pressures, the impact on customer demand and our
ability and our suppliers’ ability to access financial markets at favorable rates and terms.
•Increases in our benefit plans’ costs, including increases due to adverse changes in the United States and foreign securities
markets, resulting in worse-than-assumed investment returns and discount rates; adverse changes in mortality assumptions;
adverse medical cost trends; and unfavorable or delayed implementation or repeal of healthcare legislation, regulations or
related court decisions.
•The final outcome of FCC and other federal, state or foreign government agency proceedings (including judicial review, if any,
of such proceedings) and legislative efforts involving issues that are important to our business, including, without limitation,
pending Notices of Apparent Liability; the transition from legacy technologies to IP-based infrastructure, including the
withdrawal of legacy TDM-based services; universal service; broadband deployment; wireless equipment siting regulations
and, in particular, siting for 5G service; E911 services; rules concerning digital discrimination; competition policy; privacy; net
neutrality; copyright protection; availability of new spectrum on fair and balanced terms; and wireless and satellite license
awards and renewals.
•Enactment of additional state, local, federal and/or foreign regulatory and tax laws and regulations, or changes to existing
standards and actions by tax agencies and judicial authorities including the resolution of disputes with any taxing jurisdictions,
pertaining to our subsidiaries and foreign investments, including laws and regulations that reduce our incentive to invest in our
networks, resulting in lower revenue growth and/or higher operating costs.
•U.S. and foreign laws and regulations regarding intellectual property rights protection and privacy, personal data protection and
user consent, which are complex and rapidly evolving and could result in adverse impacts to our business plans, increased
costs, or claims against us that may harm our reputation.
•Our ability to compete in an increasingly competitive industry and against competitors that can offer product/service offerings
at lower prices due to lower cost structures and regulatory and legislative actions adverse to us, including non-regulation of
comparable alternative technologies and/or government-owned or subsidized networks.
•Disruption in our supply chain for a number of reasons, including, difficulties in obtaining export licenses for certain
technology, inability to secure component parts, general business disruption, workforce shortage, natural disasters, safety
issues, vendor fraud, economic and political instability, including the outbreak of war or other hostilities, and public health
emergencies.
•The continued development and delivery of attractive and profitable wireless, and broadband offerings and devices; the extent
to which regulatory and build-out requirements apply to our offerings; our ability to match speeds offered by our competitors;
and the availability, cost and/or reliability of the various technologies and/or content required to provide such offerings.
•The availability and cost and our ability to adequately fund additional wireless spectrum and network development,
deployment and maintenance; and regulations and conditions relating to spectrum use, licensing, obtaining additional
spectrum, technical standards and deployment and usage, including network management rules.
•Our ability to manage growth in wireless data services, including network quality and acquisition of adequate spectrum at
reasonable costs and terms.
•The outcome of pending, threatened or potential litigation (which includes arbitrations), including, without limitation, patent
and product safety claims by or against third parties or claims based on alleged misconduct by employees.
•The impact from major equipment or software failures on our networks or cyber incidents; the effect of security breaches
related to the network or customer information; our inability to obtain handsets, equipment/software or have handsets,
equipment/software serviced in a timely and cost-effective manner from suppliers; or severe weather conditions or other
climate related events including flooding and hurricanes, natural disasters including earthquakes and forest fires, pandemics,
energy shortages, wars or terrorist attacks.
•The issuance by the FASB or other accounting oversight bodies of new accounting standards or changes to existing standards.
•Our response to competition and regulatory, legislative and technological developments.
•The uncertainty surrounding further congressional action regarding spending and taxation, which may result in changes in
government spending and affect the ability and willingness of businesses and consumers to spend in general.
•Our ability to realize or sustain the expected benefits of our business transformation initiatives, which are designed to reduce
costs, streamline distribution, remove redundancies and simplify and improve processes and support functions.
•Our ability to successfully complete divestitures, as well as achieve our expectations regarding the financial impact of the
completed and/or pending transactions.
Readers are cautioned that other factors discussed in this report, although not enumerated here, also could materially affect our
future earnings.
14
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
ITEM 1B. UNRESOLVED STAFF COMMENTS
Not applicable.
ITEM 2. PROPERTIES
Our properties do not lend themselves to description by character and location of principal units. At December 31, 2022, of our
total property, plant and equipment, central office equipment represented 30%; outside plant (including cable, wiring and other non-
central office network equipment) represented 26%; other equipment, comprised principally of wireless network equipment
attached to towers, furniture and office equipment and vehicles and other work equipment, represented 25%; land, building and
wireless communications towers represented 12%; and other miscellaneous property represented 7%.
For our Communications segment, substantially all of the installations of central office equipment are located in buildings and on
land we own. Many garages, administrative and business offices, wireless towers, telephone centers and retail stores are leased.
Property on which communication towers are located may be either owned or leased.
ITEM 3. LEGAL PROCEEDINGS
We are a party to numerous lawsuits, regulatory proceedings and other matters arising in the ordinary course of business. As of the
date of this report, we do not believe any pending legal proceedings to which we or our subsidiaries are subject are required to be
disclosed as material legal proceedings pursuant to this item.
ITEM 4. MINE SAFETY DISCLOSURES
Not applicable.
15
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Information about our Executive Officers
(As of February 1, 2023)
Name Age Position Held Since
John T. Stankey 60 Chief Executive Officer and President 7/2020
F. Thaddeus Arroyo 59 Chief Strategy and Development Officer 5/2022
Pascal Desroches 58 Senior Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer 4/2021
Edward W. Gillespie 61 Senior Executive Vice President - External and Legislative Affairs,
AT&T Services, Inc.4/2020
David S. Huntley 64 Senior Executive Vice President and Chief Compliance Officer 12/2014
Kellyn S. Kenny 45 Chief Marketing and Growth Officer 5/2022
Lori M. Lee 57 Global Marketing Officer and Senior Executive Vice President -
International12/2022
Jeremy Legg 53 Chief Technology Officer, AT&T Services, Inc. 5/2022
David R. McAtee II 54 Senior Executive Vice President and General Counsel 10/2015
Jeffery S. McElfresh 52 Chief Operating Officer 5/2022
Angela R. Santone 51 Senior Executive Vice President - Human Resources 12/2019
The above executive officers have held high-level managerial positions with AT&T or its subsidiaries for more than the past five
years, except for Mr. Desroches, Mr. Gillespie, Ms. Kenny, Mr. Legg, and Ms. Santone. Executive officers are not appointed to a
fixed term of office.
Mr. Desroches was previously Executive Vice President - Finance of AT&T from November 2020 to March 2021, Executive Vice
President and Chief Financial Officer of WarnerMedia from June 2018 to November 2020, and Executive Vice President and Chief
Financial Officer of Turner from January 2015 to June 2018.
Mr. Gillespie was previously Managing Director of Sard Verbinnen & Co. from June 2018 to April 2020, Founder and Principal of
Ed Gillespie Strategies from February 2009 to December 2016, and Counselor to the President for George W. Bush, Executive
Office of the President at The White House, from July 2007 to January 2009.
Ms. Kenny was previously Chief Marketing and Growth Officer, AT&T Communications, LLC from November 2020 to May 2022.
Prior to that she was Global Chief Marketing Officer of Hilton Worldwide Holdings from January 2018 to June 2020 and Vice
President of Marketing for Uber Technologies from April 2016 to January 2018.
Mr. Legg was previously Chief Technology Officer - AT&T Technology Services of AT&T from June 2020 to April 2022, Chief
Technology Officer of WarnerMedia from December 2018 to June 2020, and Chief Technology Officer of Turner from June 2015 to
December 2018.
Ms. Santone was previously Chief Administrative Officer of AT&T from May 2019 to December 2019, Executive Vice President
and Global Chief Human Resources Officer of Turner from February 2016 to April 2019, and Senior Vice President and Chief
Human Resources Officer of Turner from June 2013 to January 2016.
16
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
PART II
ITEM 5. MARKET FOR REGISTRANT’S COMMON EQUITY, RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS AND ISSUER
PURCHASES OF EQUITY SECURITIES
Our common stock is listed on the New York Stock Exchange under the ticker symbol “T”. The number of stockholders of record
as of December 31, 2022 and 2021 was 784,110 and 817,330. The number of stockholders of record as of February 8, 2023, was
781,511. We declared dividends on common stock, on a quarterly basis, totaling $1.11 per share in 2022 and $2.08 per share in
2021.
STOCK PERFORMANCE GRAPH
The comparison above assumes $100 invested on December 31, 2017, in AT&T common stock and the following Standard &
Poor’s (S&P) Indices: S&P 500 Index and S&P 500 Communication Services Index. Total return equals stock price appreciation
plus reinvestment of dividends.
17
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Our Board of Directors has approved the following authorization to repurchase common stock: March 2014 authorization program
for 300 million shares, with 144 million outstanding at December 31, 2022. To implement this authorization, we used open market
repurchases, relying on Rule 10b5-1 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, where feasible. We also used accelerated share
repurchase agreements with large financial institutions to repurchase our stock. We will continue to fund any share repurchases
through a combination of cash from operations, borrowings dependent on market conditions, or cash from the disposition of certain
non-strategic investments.
Our 2023 financing activities will focus on managing our debt level and paying dividends, subject to approval by our Board of
Directors. We plan to fund our financing uses of cash through a combination of cash from operations, issuance of debt and asset
sales. The timing and mix of any debt issuance and/or refinancing will be guided by credit market conditions and interest rate
trends.
A summary of our repurchases of common stock during the fourth quarter of 2022 is as follows:
ISSUER PURCHASES OF EQUITY SECURITIES
(a) (b) (c) (d)
PeriodTotal Number of
Shares (or Units)
PurchasedAverage Price Paid Per
Share (or Unit)Total Number of
Shares (or Units)
Purchased
as Part of Publicly
Announced Plans or
ProgramsMaximum Number (or
Approximate Dollar
Value) of Shares (or
Units) That May Yet Be
Purchased Under The
Plans or Programs
October 1, 2022 -
October 31, 2022 400,261 $ 15.23 — 143,731,972
November 1, 2022 -
November 30, 2022 344,935 $ 18.41 — 143,731,972
December 1, 2022 -
December 31, 2022 146,267 $ 19.16 — 143,731,972
Total 891,463 $ 17.10 — 
In March 2014, our Board of Directors approved an authorization to repurchase up to 300 million shares of our common stock. The
authorization has no expiration date.
Of the shares purchased, 891,463 shares were acquired through the withholding of taxes on the vesting of restricted stock and performance
shares or in respect of the exercise price of options.
Of the shares repurchased or transferred, no shares were transferred from AT&T  maintained Voluntary Employee Benefit Association
(VEBA) trusts.
ITEM 6. [RESERVED]
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF
OPERATIONS
OVERVIEW
AT&T Inc. is referred to as “we,” “AT&T” or the “Company” throughout this document. AT&T products and services are provided
or offered by subsidiaries and affiliates of AT&T Inc. under the AT&T brand and not by AT&T Inc., and the names of the particular
subsidiaries and affiliates providing the services generally have been omitted. AT&T is a holding company whose subsidiaries and
affiliates operate worldwide in the telecommunications and technology industries. You should read this discussion in conjunction
with the consolidated financial statements and accompanying notes (Notes). Unless otherwise noted, this discussion refers only to
our continuing operations and does not include discussion of balances or activity of WarnerMedia, Vrio, Xandr and Playdemic Ltd.
(Playdemic), which are part of discontinued operations.
Our Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations included in this document generally
discusses 2022 and 2021 items and year-to-year comparisons between 2022 and 2021. Discussions of 2020 items and year-to-year
comparisons between 2021 and 2020 that are not included in this document can be found in “Management’s Discussion and
Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations” in Part II, Item 7 of our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year
ended December 31, 2021.1,2,3 1
1
2
3
18
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
On April 8, 2022, we closed our transaction to combine substantially all of our WarnerMedia segment (WarnerMedia) with a
subsidiary of Discovery, Inc (Discovery). Upon the separation and distribution of WarnerMedia, the WarnerMedia business met the
criteria for discontinued operations. For discontinued operations, we also evaluated transactions that were components of AT&T’s
single plan of a strategic shift, including dispositions that did not individually meet the criteria due to materiality, and have
determined discontinued operations to be comprised of WarnerMedia, Vrio, Xandr and Playdemic. These businesses are reflected in
the accompanying financial statements as discontinued operations, including for periods prior to the consummation of the
WarnerMedia/Discovery transaction. (See Notes 6 and 23)
On July 31, 2021, we closed our transaction with TPG Capital (TPG) to form a new company named DIRECTV Entertainment
Holdings, LLC (DIRECTV). With the close of the transaction, we separated our Video business, comprised of our U.S. video
operations, and began accounting for our investment in DIRECTV under the equity method. (See Note 6)
We have two reportable segments: Communications and Latin America. Our segment results presented in Note 4 and discussed
below follow our internal management reporting. Each segment’s percentage calculation of total segment operating revenue is
derived from our segment results table in Note 4. Segment operating income is attributable to our Communications segment due to
operating losses in Latin America. Percentage increases and decreases that are not considered meaningful are denoted with a dash.
Percent Change
2022 2021 2020 2022 vs. 2021 2021 vs. 2020
Operating Revenues
Communications $ 117,067 $ 114,730 $ 109,965 2.0  % 4.3 %
Latin America 3,144 2,747 2,562 14.5 7.2 
Corporate and Other:
Corporate 530 731 766 (27.5) (4.6)
Video — 15,513 28,610 — (45.8)
Held-for-sale and other reclassifications — 453 1,414 — (68.0)
Eliminations and consolidations — (136) (267) — 49.1 
AT&T Operating Revenues $ 120,741 $ 134,038 $ 143,050 (9.9)% (6.3)%
Operating Income
Communications $ 29,107 $ 28,393 $ 29,062 2.5 % (2.3)%
Latin America (326) (510) (587) 36.1 13.1 
Segment Operating Income 28,781 27,883 28,475 3.2 (2.1)
Corporate (2,570) (1,644) (1,398) (56.3) (17.6)
Video — 2,491 2,174 — 14.6 
Held-for-sale and other reclassifications — 143 681 — (79.0)
Reclassification of prior service credits (2,691) (2,680) (2,442) (0.4) (9.7)
Certain significant items (28,107) (296) (19,118) — 98.5 
AT&T Operating Income (Loss) $ (4,587)$ 25,897 $ 8,372 — % — %
The Communications segment accounted for approximately 97% of our 2022 total segment operating revenues compared to 98%
in 2021 and accounted for all segment operating income in 2022 and 2021. This segment provides services to businesses and
consumers located in the U.S. and businesses globally. Our business strategies reflect bundled product offerings that cut across
product lines and utilize shared assets. This segment contains the following business units:
•Mobility provides nationwide wireless service and equipment.
•Business Wireline provides advanced ethernet-based fiber services, IP Voice and managed professional services, as well as
traditional voice and data services and related equipment to business customers.
•Consumer Wireline provides broadband services, including fiber connections that provide our multi-gig services to residential
customers in select locations. Consumer Wireline also provides legacy telephony voice communication services.
The Latin America segment accounted for approximately 3% of our 2022 total segment operating revenues compared to 2% in
2021. This segment provides wireless services and equipment in Mexico.
19
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
Consolidated Results Our financial results from continuing operations are summarized in the following table. We then discuss
factors affecting our overall results from continuing operations. Additional analysis is discussed in our “Segment Results” section.
We also discuss our expected revenue and expense trends for 2023 in the “Operating Environment and Trends of the Business”
section. Certain prior-period amounts have been reclassified to conform to the current period’s presentation.
Percent Change
2022 2021 20202022 vs.
20212021 vs.
2020
Operating revenues
Service $ 97,831 $111,565 $124,057 (12.3) % (10.1) %
Equipment 22,910 22,473 18,993 1.9 18.3 
Total Operating Revenues 120,741 134,038 143,050 (9.9) (6.3)
Operating expenses
Operations and support 79,809 90,076 96,468 (11.4) (6.6)
Asset impairments and
abandonments
    and restructuring 27,498 213 15,687 — (98.6)
Depreciation and amortization 18,021 17,852 22,523 0.9 (20.7)
Total Operating Expenses 125,328 108,141 134,678 15.9 (19.7)
Operating Income (Loss) (4,587) 25,897 8,372 — — 
Interest expense 6,108 6,716 7,727 (9.1) (13.1)
Equity in net income of
affiliates 1,791 603 89 — — 
Other income (expense) – net 5,810 9,387 (1,088) (38.1) — 
Income (Loss) from Continuing
Operations Before Income
Taxes (3,094) 29,171 (354) — — 
Income (Loss) from Continuing
Operations $ (6,874)$ 23,776 $ (1,522) — % — %
OVERVIEW
Operating revenues decreased in 2022 and 2021. The 2022 decline reflects the July 31, 2021 separation of the U.S. video
business, other business divestitures that were not included in discontinued operations and lower Business Wireline revenues driven
by lower demand for legacy services and product simplification. Partially offsetting declines were higher Mobility service and
equipment revenues and, to a lesser extent, gains in broadband service in our Communications segment and growth in Mexico
wireless operations.
The 2021 decline reflects the 2021 separation of the U.S. video business and the October 2020 sale of wireless and wireline
operations in Puerto Rico and the U.S. Virgin Islands. Also contributing to revenue declines was lower Business Wireline revenues
due in part to higher demand for pandemic-related connectivity in the prior year. Partially offsetting declines were higher Mobility
equipment and service revenues and gains in broadband service, and growth in Mexico wireless operations including favorable
foreign exchange impacts.
Operations and support expenses decreased in 2022 and 2021. The 2022 decline reflects the separation of U.S. video and lower
personnel costs associated with ongoing transformation initiatives, partially offset by higher bad debt expense, the elimination of
Connect America Fund Phase II (CAF II) government credits and increased wholesale network access charges. Wireless equipment
costs were up slightly, with higher sales volumes and the sale of higher-priced smartphones largely offset by lower 3G shutdown
costs in 2022. In the first quarter of 2022, we updated the expected economic lives of customer relationships, which extended the
amortization period of deferred acquisition and fulfillment costs and reduced expenses approximately $395, with $150 recorded to
Mobility, $115 to Business Wireline and $130 to Consumer Wireline.
The 2021 decline reflects our 2021 business divestitures, lower bad debt expense and lower personnel costs associated with our
transformation initiatives. Declines were mostly offset by increased domestic wireless equipment expense from higher volumes.
Asset impairments and abandonments and restructuring increased in 2022 and decreased in 2021. The increase in 2022 was
primarily due to $24,812 of noncash goodwill impairments associated with our Business Wireline, Consumer Wireline and Mexico
reporting units and were driven by higher interest rates consistent with the macroeconomic environment, with secular
20
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
declines also impacting Business Wireline growth rates (see Note 9). The increase in 2022 also included $1,413 of wireline conduit
asset abandonments (see Note 7) and $1,273 of restructuring and other impairment charges due to updated network build plans
stemming from spectrum acquired in recent auctions, severance charges associated with transformation initiatives and impairment
of personal protective equipment inventory.
Impairment charges in 2021 were lower than 2020, reflecting a fourth-quarter 2020 impairment charge of $15,508 resulting from
our assessment of the recoverability of the long-lived assets and goodwill associated with our U.S. video business.
Depreciation and amortization expense increased in 2022 and decreased in 2021.
Depreciation expense increased $218, or 1.2%, in 2022. The increase was primarily due to ongoing capital investment for strategic
initiatives such as fiber and network upgrades and expansion, partially offset by higher estimated lives of our fiber assets (see Note
7). Depreciation expense decreased $1,394, or 7.3%, in 2021, primarily due to ceasing depreciation on U.S. video held-for-sale
assets.
Amortization expense decreased $49, or 22.5%, in 2022 and $3,277, or 93.8%, in 2021. Lower amortization reflects our accelerated
method of amortization of intangible assets from previous acquisitions and ceasing amortization on U.S. video held-for-sale assets
in 2021.
Operating income decreased in 2022 and increased in 2021. Our operating margin was (3.8)% in 2022, compared to 19.3% in
2021 and 5.9% in 2020.
Interest expense decreased in 2022 primarily due to lower debt balances and higher capitalized interest associated with spectrum
acquisitions, partially offset by higher interest rates. Interest expense decreased in 2021 primarily due to lower interest rates and
higher capitalized interest associated with spectrum acquisitions, partially offset by higher debt balances.
Equity in net income of affiliates increased in 2022 and 2021, primarily due to the close of our transaction with TPG related to the
U.S. video business, which resulted in our accounting for our investment in DIRECTV under the equity method of accounting
beginning August 1, 2021 (see Notes 6, 10 and 19).
Other income (expense) – net decreased in 2022 and increased in 2021. The decrease in 2022 was primarily due to lower actuarial
gains ($1,999 in 2022 compared to $4,140 in 2021), lower pension and postretirement benefit credits and lower returns on other
benefit-related investments. Pension and postretirement benefit credits decreased as a result of higher assumed discount rates and
lower returns on benefit plan assets. Our 2022 benefit expense also includes approximately $280 favorable impact from a
retirement benefit plan change, with $230 resulting from prior service credits (approximately $100 for Business Wireline, $80 for
Consumer Wireline and $40 for Mobility) (see Note 14).
The increase in 2021 was primarily due to the recognition of $4,140 in actuarial gains, compared to losses of $4,169 in 2020, and
the recognition of $1,405 of debt redemption costs in 2020. Also contributing to increased income in 2021 were higher net pension
and postretirement benefit credits from higher prior service credit amortization (see Note 14).
Income tax expense decreased in 2022 and increased in 2021. The 2022 decrease was primarily driven by lower income before
income tax offset by impairments of goodwill (see Note 9), which are not deductible for tax purposes.
The increase in 2021 was primarily due to increased income before income taxes, offset primarily by the Coronavirus Aid, Relief,
and Economic Security Act (CARES Act) benefit of U.S. federal Net Operating Loss (NOL) carryback and benefits of divestitures
in 2021.
Our effective tax rate was (122.2)% in 2022, 18.5% in 2021, and (329.9)% in 2020. The effective tax rate was impacted by our
goodwill impairments associated with our Business Wireline, Consumer Wireline and Mexico reporting units in 2022, and Video
goodwill impairment in 2020, which are not deductible for tax purposes.
21
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Segment Results Our segments are strategic business units that offer different products and services over various technology
platforms and/or in different geographies that are managed accordingly. We also evaluate segment performance based on EBITDA
and/or EBITDA margin, which is defined as operating income excluding depreciation and amortization. EBITDA is used as part of
our management reporting and we believe EBITDA to be a relevant and useful measurement to our investors as it measures the
cash generation potential of our business units. EBITDA does not give effect to depreciation and amortization expenses incurred in
operating income nor is it burdened by cash used for debt service requirements and thus does not reflect available funds for
distributions, reinvestment or other discretionary uses. EBITDA margin is EBITDA divided by total revenues.
In the first quarter of 2022, we reclassified into “Corporate” certain administrative costs borne by AT&T where the business units
do not influence decision making to conform with the current period presentation. This recast increased Corporate operations and
support expenses by approximately $270 and $1,310 for full-year 2021 and 2020, respectively. Correspondingly, this recast lowered
administrative expenses for the Communications segment, with no change on a consolidated basis.
COMMUNICATIONS SEGMENT Percent Change
2022 2021 20202022 vs.
20212021 vs.
2020
Segment Operating Revenues
Mobility $ 81,780 $ 78,254 $ 72,564 4.5  % 7.8  %
Business Wireline 22,538 23,937 25,083 (5.8) (4.6)
Consumer Wireline 12,749 12,539 12,318 1.7 1.8 
Total Segment Operating Revenues $ 117,067 $ 114,730 $ 109,965 2.0 % 4.3 %
Segment Operating Income
Mobility $ 24,528 $ 23,370 $ 22,801 5.0 % 2.5 %
Business Wireline 3,252 4,027 4,799 (19.2) (16.1)
Consumer Wireline 1,327 996 1,462 33.2 (31.9)
Total Segment Operating Income $ 29,107 $ 28,393 $ 29,062 2.5  % (2.3) %
Selected Subscribers and Connections
December 31,
(000s) 2022 2021 2020
Mobility subscribers 217,397 201,791 182,558 
Total domestic broadband connections 15,386 15,504 15,384 
Network access lines in service 5,213 6,177 7,263 
U-verse VoIP connections 2,930 3,333 3,816 
Operating revenues increased in 2022, driven by increases in our Mobility and Consumer Wireline business units, partially offset
by a decrease in our Business Wireline business unit. The increases are primarily driven by wireless service and equipment revenue
growth and gains in broadband service. Business Wireline continues to reflect lower demand for legacy services and product
simplification.
Operating income increased in 2022 and decreased in 2021. The 2022 operating income reflects an increase in operating income
from our Mobility and Consumer Wireline business units, partially offset by declines in our Business Wireline business unit. Our
Communications segment operating income margin was 24.9% in 2022, 24.7% in 2021 and 26.4% in 2020.
22
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Communications Business Unit Discussion
Mobility Results
Percent Change
2022 2021 20202022 vs.
20212021 vs.
2020
Operating revenues
Service $ 60,499 $ 57,590 $ 55,542 5.1  % 3.7 %
Equipment 21,281 20,664 17,022 3.0 21.4 
Total Operating Revenues 81,780 78,254 72,564 4.5 7.8 
Operating expenses
Operations and support 49,054 46,762 41,677 4.9 12.2 
Depreciation and amortization 8,198 8,122 8,086 0.9 0.4 
Total Operating Expenses 57,252 54,884 49,763 4.3 10.3 
Operating Income $ 24,528 $ 23,370 $ 22,801 5.0 % 2.5 %
The following tables highlight other key measures of performance for Mobility:
Subscribers
Percent Change
(in 000s) 2022 2021 20202022 vs.
20212021 vs.
2020
Postpaid 84,700 81,534 77,154 3.9 % 5.7 %
Postpaid phone 69,596 67,260 64,216 3.5 4.7 
Prepaid 19,176 19,028 18,102 0.8 5.1 
Reseller 6,043 6,113 6,535 (1.1) (6.5)
Connected devices 107,478 95,116 80,767 13.0 17.8 
Total Mobility Subscribers 217,397 201,791 182,558 7.7  % 10.5  %
Includes data-centric devices such as session-based tablets, monitoring devices and primarily wholesale automobile systems.
Wireless subscribers at December 31, 2022 excludes the impact of 10,176 subscriber and connected device disconnections resulting from
our 3G network shutdown in February 2022. Postpaid disconnections were 897, including 437 phone, 234 prepaid, 749 reseller subscribers,
and 8,296 connected devices.
Mobility Net Additions
Percent Change
(in 000s) 2022 2021 20202022 vs.
20212021 vs.
2020
Postpaid Phone Net Additions 2,868 3,196 1,457 (10.3) % —  %
Total Phone Net Additions 3,272 3,850 1,640 (15.0) — 
Postpaid 4,091 4,482 2,183 (8.7) — 
Prepaid 479 956 379 (49.9) — 
Reseller 462 (534) (449) — (18.9)
Connected devices 20,594 14,328 14,785 43.7 (3.1)
Mobility Net Subscriber Additions 25,626 19,232 16,898 33.2  % 13.8  %
Postpaid Churn 0.97  % 0.94  % 0.98  % 3  BP (4) BP
Postpaid Phone-Only Churn 0.81  % 0.76  % 0.79  % 5  BP (3) BP
Excludes migrations and acquisition-related additions during the period.
In addition to postpaid phones, includes tablets and wearables and other . Tablet net adds (losses) were 203, 28 and (512) for the years
ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively . Wearables and other net adds were 1,020, 1,258 and 1,238 for the years ended
December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively .
Includes data-centric devices such as session-based tablets, monitoring devices and primarily wholesale automobile systems. Excludes
postpaid tablets and other postpaid data devices. Wholesale connected car net adds were approximately 9,980, 7,875 and 9,890 for the
years ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively .
Calculated by dividing the aggregate number of wireless subscribers who canceled service during a month by the total number of wireless
subscribers at the beginning of that month. The churn rate for the period is equal to the average of the churn rate for each month of that
period, excluding the impact of disconnections resulting from our 3G network shutdown in February 2022.1
2
1
2
2
3
1
4
4
1
2
3
4
23
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Service revenue increased during 2022, largely due to growth from subscriber gains and postpaid average revenue per subscriber
(ARPU) growth.
ARPU
ARPU increased in 2022 and reflects pricing actions, improved international roaming and customers shifting to higher priced
unlimited plans, partially offset by the impact of higher promotional discount amortization (see Note 5).
Churn
The effective management of subscriber churn is critical to our ability to maximize revenue growth and to maintain and improve
margins. Postpaid churn and postpaid phone-only churn were higher in 2022 due to a return to pre-pandemic customer behavior,
as well as pricing actions and the resulting increase in both voluntary and involuntary disconnects.
Equipment revenue increased in 2022, primarily driven by a higher volume of devices sold and a mix of higher-priced postpaid
smartphones.
Operations and support expenses increased in 2022, largely driven by growth in equipment sales and associated expenses, bad
debt expense, higher network costs, the elimination of CAF II government credits, and higher HBO Max licensing fees and FirstNet
costs. In the first quarter of 2022, we updated our analysis of economic lives of customer relationships and extended the
amortization period of Mobility deferred customer contract costs, which decreased expense approximately $150.
Depreciation expense increased in 2022, primarily due to ongoing capital spending for network upgrades and expansion, partially
offset by ceasing use of 3G network assets.
Operating income increased in 2022 and 2021. Our Mobility operating income margin was 30.0% in 2022, 29.9% in 2021 and
31.4% in 2020. Our Mobility EBITDA margin was 40.0% in 2022, 40.2% in 2021 and 42.6% in 2020.
Subscriber Relationships
As the wireless industry has matured, with nearly full penetration of smartphones in the U.S. population, future wireless growth
will depend on our ability to offer innovative services, plans and devices that bundle product offerings and take advantage of our
5G wireless network. We believe 5G opens up vast possibilities of connecting sensors, devices, and autonomous things, commonly
referred to as the Internet of Things (IoT). More and more, these devices are performing use cases that require high bandwidth,
ultra-reliability and low latency that only 5G and edge computing can bring. To support higher mobile data usage, our priority is to
best utilize a wireless network that has sufficient spectrum and capacity to support these innovations on as broad a geographic basis
as possible.
Business Wireline Results
Percent Change
2022 2021 20202022 vs.
20212021 vs.
2020
Operating revenues
Service $ 21,891 $ 23,224 $ 24,313 (5.7)% (4.5)%
Equipment 647 713 770 (9.3) (7.4)
Total Operating Revenues 22,538 23,937 25,083 (5.8) (4.6)
Operating expenses
Operations and support 13,972 14,718 15,068 (5.1) (2.3)
Depreciation and amortization 5,314 5,192 5,216 2.3 (0.5)
Total Operating Expenses 19,286 19,910 20,284 (3.1) (1.8)
Operating Income $ 3,252 $ 4,027 $ 4,799 (19.2)% (16.1)%
Service revenues decreased in 2022, driven by lower demand for legacy voice and data services and product simplification. Also
contributing to the decline was lower revenues from the government sector. We expect these trends to continue. Partially offsetting
revenue declines was growth in connectivity services and revenues of approximately $200 from intellectual property sales in 2022.
Equipment revenues decreased in 2022, driven by declines in legacy and non-core services which we expect to continue.
24
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Operations and support expenses decreased in 2022, primarily due to our continued efforts to drive efficiencies in our network
operations through automation, reductions in customer support expenses through digitization and proactive rationalization of low
profit margin products, and lower personnel costs associated with ongoing transformation initiatives. Expense declines were also
driven by credits from a third-quarter 2022 retirement benefit plan change and lower amortization of deferred fulfillment costs,
including our first-quarter 2022 updates to the estimated economic lives of subscribers, which decreased expense approximately
$115 in 2022. The declines were partially offset by higher wholesale access network costs. As part of our transformation activities,
we expect continued operations and support expense improvements into 2023 as we further size our operations in alignment with
the strategic direction of the business.
Depreciation expense increased in 2022, primarily due to ongoing capital investment for strategic initiatives such as fiber and
network upgrades and expansion, partially offset by updates to extend the estimated lives of our fiber assets (see Note 7).
Operating income decreased in 2022 and 2021. Our Business Wireline operating income margin was 14.4% in 2022, 16.8% in
2021 and 19.1% in 2020. Our Business Wireline EBITDA margin was 38.0% in 2022, 38.5% in 2021 and 39.9% in 2020.
Consumer Wireline Results
Percent Change
2022 2021 20202022 vs.
20212021 vs.
2020
Operating revenues
Broadband $ 9,669 $ 9,085 $ 8,534 6.4 % 6.5 %
Legacy voice and data services 1,746 1,977 2,213 (11.7) (10.7)
Other service and equipment 1,334 1,477 1,571 (9.7) (6.0)
Total Operating Revenues 12,749 12,539 12,318 1.7 1.8 
Operating expenses
Operations and support 8,253 8,448 7,942 (2.3) 6.4 
Depreciation and amortization 3,169 3,095 2,914 2.4 6.2 
Total Operating Expenses 11,422 11,543 10,856 (1.0) 6.3 
Operating Income $ 1,327 $ 996 $ 1,462 33.2 % (31.9)%
The following tables highlight other key measures of performance for Consumer Wireline:
Connections
Percent Change
(in 000s) 2022 2021 20202022 vs.
20212021 vs.
2020
Broadband Connections
Total Broadband and DSL Connections 13,991 14,160 14,100 (1.2)% 0.4 %
Broadband 13,753 13,845 13,693 (0.7) 1.1 
Fiber Broadband Connections 7,215 5,992 4,951 20.4 21.0 
Voice Connections
Retail Consumer Switched Access Lines 2,028 2,423 2,862 (16.3) (15.3)
U-verse Consumer VoIP Connections 2,311 2,736 3,231 (15.5) (15.3)
Total Retail Consumer Voice Connections 4,339 5,159 6,093 (15.9)% (15.3)%
25
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Broadband Net Additions
Percent Change
(in 000s) 2022 2021 20202022 vs.
20212021 vs.
2020
Total Broadband and DSL Net Additions (169) 60 (19) — % — %
Broadband Net Additions (92) 152 95 — 60.0 
Fiber Broadband Net Additions 1,223 1,041 1,064 17.5 % (2.2)%
Broadband revenues increased in 2022, driven by an increase in fiber customers, which we expect to continue for the foreseeable
future as we invest further in building our fiber footprint, partially offset by declines in copper-based broadband services.
Legacy voice and data service revenues decreased in 2022, reflecting the continued decline in the number of customers, which we
expect to continue.
Other service and equipment revenues decreased in 2022, reflecting the continued decline in the number of VoIP customers,
which we expect to continue.
Operations and support expenses decreased in 2022, primarily driven by lower network and customer support costs, credits from
a third-quarter 2022 retirement benefit plan change and lower HBO Max licensing fees. Also contributing to the decline was lower
amortization of deferred fulfillment costs, including our first-quarter 2022 updates to the estimated economic lives of
broadband/fiber subscribers, which decreased expenses approximately $130 in 2022. These declines were partially offset by the
elimination of CAF II government credits, higher bad debt expense and advertising costs.
Depreciation expense increased in 2022, primarily due to ongoing capital investment for strategic initiatives such as fiber and
network upgrades and expansion, partially offset by updates to the estimated lives of our fiber assets (see Note 7).
Operating income increased in 2022 and decreased in 2021. Our Consumer Wireline operating income margin was 10.4% in 2022,
7.9% in 2021 and 11.9% in 2020. Our Consumer Wireline EBITDA margin was 35.3% in 2022, 32.6% in 2021 and 35.5% in 2020.
LATIN AMERICA SEGMENT Percent Change
2022 2021 20202022 vs.
20212021 vs.
2020
Operating revenues
Service $ 2,162 $ 1,834 $ 1,656 17.9  % 10.7 %
Equipment 982 913 906 7.6 0.8 
Total Operating Revenues 3,144 2,747 2,562 14.5 7.2 
Operating expenses
Operations and support 2,812 2,652 2,636 6.0 0.6 
Depreciation and amortization 658 605 513 8.8 17.9 
Total Operating Expenses 3,470 3,257 3,149 6.5 3.4 
Operating Income (Loss) $ (326)$ (510)$ (587) 36.1 % 13.1 %
26
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
The following tables highlight other key measures of performance for Mexico:
Subscribers
Percent Change
(in 000s) 2022 2021 20202022 vs.
20212021 vs.
2020
Postpaid 4,925 4,807 4,696 2.5 % 2.4 %
Prepaid 16,204 15,057 13,758 7.6 9.4 
Reseller 474 498 489 (4.8) 1.8 
Mexico Wireless Subscribers 21,603 20,362 18,943 6.1 % 7.5 %
Mexico Wireless Net Additions
Percent Change
(in 000s) 2022 2021 20202022 vs.
20212021 vs.
2020
Postpaid 118 111 (407) 6.3 % — %
Prepaid 1,147 1,299 174 (11.7) — 
Reseller (24) 9 118 — (92.4)
Mexico Wireless Net Additions 1,241 1,419 (115) (12.5)% — %
Service revenues increased in 2022, reflecting growth in wholesale services, subscribers and ARPU.
Equipment revenues increased in 2022, due to higher equipment sales.
Operations and support expenses increased in 2022, due to higher acquisition costs, bad debt and network expenses.
Approximately 5% of Mexico expenses are U.S. dollar-based, with the remainder in the local currency.
Depreciation expense increased in 2022, reflecting higher in-service assets.
Operating income improved in 2022 and 2021. Our Mexico operating income margin was (10.4)% in 2022, (18.6)% in 2021 and
(22.9)% in 2020. Our Mexico EBITDA margin was 10.6% in 2022, 3.5% in 2021 and (2.9)% in 2020.
OPERATING ENVIRONMENT AND TRENDS OF THE BUSINESS
2023 Revenue Trends We expect revenue growth in our wireless and broadband businesses as customers demand instant
connectivity and higher speeds made possible by wireless network enhancements through 5G deployment and our fiber network
expansion. We believe that our simplified go-to-market strategy for 5G in underpenetrated markets will continue to contribute to
wireless subscriber and service revenue growth and that expansion of our fiber footprint and our multi-gig offerings will drive
greater demand for broadband services on our fast-growing fiber network.
As we expand our fiber reach, we will be orienting our business portfolio to leverage this opportunity to offset continuing declines
in legacy Business Wireline products by growing connectivity with small to mid-sized businesses. We plan to use our strong fiber
and wireless assets, broad distribution and converged product offers to strengthen our overall market position. We will continue to
rationalize our product portfolio with a longer-term shift of the business to fiber and mobile connectivity, and growth in value-
added services.
2023 Expense Trends We expect the spending required to support growth initiatives, primarily our continued deployment of fiber
and 5G to pressure expense trends in 2023. To the extent customers further upgrade their handsets in 2023, the expenses associated
with those device sales are expected to contribute to higher costs. During 2023, we will also continue to prioritize efficiency, led by
our cost transformation initiative. These investments will help prepare us to meet increased customer demand for enhanced wireless
and broadband services, including video streaming, augmented reality and “smart” technologies. The software benefits of our 5G
wireless technology should result in a more efficient use of capital and lower network-related expenses in the coming years.
We continue to transform our operations to be more efficient and effective. We are restructuring businesses, sunsetting legacy
networks, improving customer service and ordering functions through digital transformation, sizing our support costs and staffing
with current activity levels, and reassessing overall benefit costs. Cost savings and asset sales align with our focus on debt
reduction.
27
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Market Conditions The U.S. stock market experienced volatility and contraction in 2022. Several factors, including the continued
impact from the global pandemic, have resulted in changes in demand in business communication services. The global pandemic
has caused, and could again cause, delays in the development, manufacturing (including the sourcing of key components) and
shipment of products, as well as continued tight labor market and actual or perceived inflation. Most of our products and services
are not directly affected by the imposition of tariffs on Chinese goods. However, we expect ongoing pressure on pricing during
2023 as we respond to the geopolitical and macroeconomic environment and our competitive marketplace, especially in wireless
services.
Included on our consolidated balance sheets are assets held by benefit plans for the payment of future benefits. Our pension plans
are subject to funding requirements of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended (ERISA). We expect
only minimal ERISA contribution requirements to our pension plans for 2023. Investment returns on these assets depend largely on
trends in the economy, and a weakness in the equity, fixed income and real asset markets could require us to make future
contributions to the pension plans. In addition, our policy of recognizing actuarial gains and losses related to our pension and other
postretirement plans in the period in which they arise subjects us to earnings volatility caused by changes in market conditions;
however, these actuarial gains and losses do not impact segment performance as they are required to be recorded in “Other income
(expense) – net.” Changes in our discount rate, which are tied to changes in the bond market, and changes in the performance of
equity markets, may have significant impacts on the valuation of our pension and other postretirement obligations at the end of
2023 (see “Critical Accounting Policies and Estimates”).
OPERATING ENVIRONMENT OVERVIEW
AT&T subsidiaries operating within the United States are subject to federal and state regulatory authorities. AT&T subsidiaries
operating outside the United States are subject to the jurisdiction of national and supranational regulatory authorities in the markets
where service is provided.
In the Telecommunications Act of 1996 (Telecom Act), Congress established a national policy framework intended to bring the
benefits of competition and investment in advanced telecommunications facilities and services to all Americans by opening all
telecommunications markets to competition and reducing or eliminating regulatory burdens that harm consumer welfare.
Nonetheless, over the ensuing two decades, the Federal Communications Commission (FCC) and some state regulatory
commissions have maintained or expanded certain regulatory requirements that were imposed decades ago on our traditional
wireline subsidiaries when they operated as legal monopolies. More recently, the FCC has pursued a more deregulatory agenda,
eliminating a variety of antiquated and unnecessary regulations and streamlining its processes in a number of areas. We continue to
support regulatory and legislative measures and efforts, at both the state and federal levels, to reduce inappropriate regulatory
burdens that inhibit our ability to compete effectively and offer needed services to our customers, including initiatives to transition
services from traditional networks to all IP-based networks. At the same time, we also seek to ensure that legacy regulations are not
further extended to broadband or wireless services, which are subject to vigorous competition.
Internet The FCC currently classifies fixed and mobile consumer broadband services as information services, subject to light-touch
regulation. However, some states have adopted legislation or issued executive orders that would reimpose net neutrality rules
repealed by the FCC. Suits were filed concerning such laws in California and Vermont. The California suit was dismissed without
prejudice on May 4, 2022, and the California statute is now in effect. The litigation challenging the Vermont statute has been stayed
pending the Second Circuit’s disposition of an appeal by the State of New York of an order enjoining enforcement of a New York
statute regulating broadband rates on the ground that such statute is preempted by federal law. We expect additional states may seek
to impose net neutrality requirements in the future.
On November 15, 2021, the Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act (IIJA) was signed into law. The legislation appropriates
$65,000 to support broadband deployment and adoption. The National Telecommunications and Information Agency (NTIA) is
responsible for distributing more than $48,000 of this funding, including $42,500 in state grants for broadband deployment projects
in unserved and underserved areas. NTIA established initial requirements for this program in May 2022 and is expected to
announce state grant allocations in 2023. The IIJA also appropriated $14,200 for establishment of the Affordable Connectivity
Program (ACP), an FCC-administered monthly, low-income broadband benefit program, replacing the Emergency Broadband
Benefit program (established in December 2020 by the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021). Qualifying customers can receive
up to thirty dollars per month (or seventy-five dollars per month for those on Tribal lands) to assist with their internet bill. AT&T is
a participating provider in the ACP program and will consider participating in the deployment program where appropriate. The IIJA
includes various provisions that have resulted in FCC proceedings regarding ACP program administration and consumer protection,
reform of the existing universal support program, and broadband labeling and equal access.
Privacy-related legislation continues to be adopted or considered in a number of jurisdictions. Legislative, regulatory and litigation
actions could result in increased costs of compliance, further regulation or claims against broadband internet access service
providers and others, and increased uncertainty in the value and availability of data.
28
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Wireless Industry-wide network densification and 5G technology expansion efforts, which are needed to satisfy extensive demand
for video and internet access, will involve significant deployment of “small cell” equipment. This increases the importance of local
permitting processes that allow for the placement of small cell equipment in the public right-of-way on reasonable timelines and
terms. The FCC has adopted multiple Orders streamlining federal, state, and local wireless structure review processes that had the
tendency to delay and impede deployment of small cell and related infrastructure used to provide telecommunications and
broadband services. During 2020-2021, we have also deployed 5G nationwide on “low band” spectrum on macro towers. Executing
on the recent spectrum purchase, we announced ongoing construction and continuing deployment of 5G on C-band spectrum in
2022 and beyond.
EXPECTED GROWTH AREAS
Over the next few years, we expect our growth to come from wireless and IP-based fiber broadband services. We provide integrated
services to diverse groups of customers in the U.S. on an integrated telecommunications network utilizing different technological
platforms. In 2023, our key initiatives include:
•Continuing our wireless subscriber momentum and 5G deployment, with expansion of 5G service, including to
underpenetrated markets.
•Improving fiber penetration, accelerating subscriber growth and increasing broadband revenues.
•Continuing to drive efficiencies and a competitive advantage through cost transformation initiatives and product simplification.
Wireless We expect to continue to deliver revenue growth in the coming years. We are in a period of rapid growth in wireless video
usage and believe that there are substantial opportunities available for next-generation converged services that combine
technologies and services. As of December 31, 2022, we served 239 million wireless subscribers in North America, with more than
217 million in the United States.
Our LTE technology covers over 441 million people in North America, and in the United States, we cover all major metropolitan
areas and over 337 million people. We also provide 4G coverage using another technology (HSPA+), and when combined with our
upgraded backhaul network, we provide enhanced network capabilities and superior mobile broadband speeds for data and video
services. In December 2018, we introduced the nation’s first commercial mobile 5G service and expanded that deployment
nationwide in July 2020. At December 31, 2022, our network covers more than 285 million people with 5G technology in the
United States and North America.
Our networks covering both the U.S. and Mexico have enabled our customers to use wireless services without roaming on other
companies’ networks. We believe this seamless access will prove attractive to customers and provide a significant growth
opportunity. At December 31, 2022, we provided LTE coverage to over 104 million people in Mexico.
Integration of Data and Broadband Services As the communications industry has evolved into internet-based technologies
capable of blending wireline and wireless services, we plan to focus on expanding our wireless network capabilities and provide
broadband offerings that allow customers to integrate their home or business fixed services with their mobile service. In January
2022, we launched our multi-gig rollout, which brings the fastest internet to AT&T Fiber customers with symmetrical 2 gig and 5
gig tiers. We will continue to develop and provide unique integrated mobile and broadband/fiber solutions.
REGULATORY DEVELOPMENTS
Set forth below is a summary of the most significant regulatory proceedings that directly affected our operations during 2022.
Industry-wide regulatory developments are discussed above in Operating Environment Overview. While these issues may apply
only to certain subsidiaries, the words “we,” “AT&T” and “our” are used to simplify the discussion. The following discussions are
intended as a condensed summary of the issues rather than as a comprehensive legal analysis and description of all of these specific
issues.
International Regulation Our subsidiaries operating outside the United States are subject to the jurisdiction of regulatory
authorities in the territories in which the subsidiaries operate. Our licensing, compliance and advocacy initiatives in foreign
countries primarily enable the provision of enterprise (i.e., large business) services globally and wireless services in Mexico.
The General Data Protection Regulation went into effect in Europe in May of 2018. AT&T processes and handles personal data of
its customers and subscribers, employees of its enterprise customers and its employees. This regulation created a range of new
compliance obligations and significantly increased financial penalties for noncompliance.
Federal Regulation We have organized our following discussion by service impacted.
Internet The FCC currently classifies fixed and mobile consumer broadband services as information services, subject to light-touch
regulation. The D.C. Circuit upheld the FCC’s current classification, although it remanded three discrete issues to the FCC for
further consideration. These issues related to the effect of the FCC’s decision to classify broadband services as
29
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
information services on public safety, the regulation of pole attachments, and universal service support for low-income consumers
through the Lifeline program. Because no party sought Supreme Court review of the D.C. Circuit’s decision to uphold the FCC’s
classification of broadband as an information service, that decision is final.
In October 2020, the FCC adopted an order addressing the three issues remanded by the D.C. Circuit for further consideration.
After considering those issues, the FCC concluded there were no grounds to depart from its determination that fixed and mobile
consumer broadband services should be classified as information services. An appeal of the FCC’s remand decision is pending.
Some states have adopted legislation or issued executive orders that would reimpose net neutrality rules repealed by the FCC. Suits
were filed concerning such laws in California and Vermont. The California suit was dismissed without prejudice on May 4, 2022,
and the California statute is now in effect. The litigation challenging the Vermont statute has been stayed pending the Second
Circuit’s disposition of an appeal by the State of New York of an order enjoining enforcement of a New York statute regulating
broadband rates on the ground that such statute is preempted by federal law. We expect additional states may seek to impose net
neutrality requirements in the future.
On November 15, 2021, President Biden signed the IIJA into law. The legislation appropriates funds to support broadband
deployment and adoption. The NTIA is responsible for distributing the majority of these funds primarily through state grants for
broadband deployment projects in unserved and underserved areas, and to a lesser extent for middle mile broadband infrastructure,
and digital equity programs. On May 13, 2022, NTIA issued three Notices of Funding Opportunity for these initiatives – the
Broadband Equity, Access, and Deployment Program, the Enabling Middle Mile Broadband Infrastructure Program, and the State
Digital Equity Program. NTIA will continue to administer and implement these programs. The IIJA also appropriated funds for
establishment of the ACP, an FCC-administered monthly, low-income broadband benefit program, replacing the Emergency
Broadband Benefit program. Qualifying customers can receive reimbursements to assist with their internet bill. AT&T is a
participating provider in the ACP program and will consider participating in the deployment program where appropriate. The IIJA
includes various provisions that have resulted in FCC proceedings regarding ACP program administration and consumer protection,
reform of the existing universal support program, and broadband labeling and equal access.
Privacy-related legislation continues to be adopted or considered in a number of jurisdictions. Legislative, regulatory and litigation
actions could result in increased costs of compliance, further regulation or claims against broadband internet access service
providers and others, and increased uncertainty in the value and availability of data.
Wireless and Broadband In June and November 2020, the FCC issued a Declaratory Ruling clarifying the limits on state and local
authority to deny applications to modify existing structures to accommodate wireless facilities. Appeals of the November 2020
order remain pending in the Ninth Circuit Court of Appeals, following multiple requests by the FCC to hold the appeal in abeyance
until the Senate confirms a fifth FCC Commissioner. If sustained on appeal, these FCC decisions will remove state and local
regulatory barriers and reduce the costs of the infrastructure needed for 5G and FirstNet deployments, which will enhance our
ability to place small cell facilities on utility poles, expand existing facilities to accommodate public safety services, and replace
legacy facilities and services with advanced broadband infrastructure and services. During 2022, we have also deployed 5G
nationwide on “low band” spectrum on macro towers. Executing on the recent spectrum purchase, we continued deploying 5G
nationwide on “low band” spectrum.
In March 2020, the FCC released its order setting rules for certain spectrum bands (C-band) for 5G operations. In that order, the
FCC concluded that C-band 5G services that met the agency’s technical limits on power and emissions would not cause harmful
interference with aircraft operations. In reliance on that order, AT&T bid a total of $23,406 and was awarded 1,621 C-band licenses,
including 40 MHz available for deployment in December 2021, with the remainder available for deployment no later than
December 2023. In late 2021, the Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) questioned whether the C-band launch could impact radio
altimeter equipment on airplanes, which operate on spectrum bands over 400 MHz away from the spectrum AT&T launched in
2022 and 220 MHz away from spectrum AT&T plans to launch in 2023. In response, to allow the FAA more time to evaluate,
AT&T and Verizon delayed their planned December 2021 5G C-band launch by six weeks and voluntarily committed to a series of
temporary, precautionary measures, in addition to deferring turning on a limited number of towers around certain airports. These
measures have been subsequently modified from time to time. We continue to work with the FAA to reduce the temporary measures
with C-band deployments as aircraft equipment is upgraded.
In recent years, the FCC took several actions to make spectrum available for 5G services, including the auction of 280 MHz of mid-
band spectrum previously used for satellite service (the “C Band” auction) and 39 GHz band spectrum. AT&T obtained spectrum in
these auctions (see “Other Business Matters”). The FCC also made 150 MHz of mid-band CBRS spectrum available, to be shared
with Federal incumbents, which enjoy priority. In addition, the FCC recently completed Auction 110, in which AT&T won 40 MHz
of 3.45 GHz spectrum nationwide at a cost of $9,079.
30
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
ACCOUNTING POLICIES AND STANDARDS
Critical Accounting Policies and Estimates Because of the size of the financial statement line items they relate to or the extent of
judgment required by our management, some of our accounting policies and estimates have a more significant impact on our
consolidated financial statements than others.
Pension and Postretirement Benefits Our actuarial estimates of retiree benefit expense and the associated significant weighted-
average assumptions are discussed in Note 14. Our assumed weighted-average discount rates for both pension and postretirement
benefits of 5.20%, at December 31, 2022, reflect the hypothetical rate at which the projected benefit obligations could be
effectively settled or paid out to participants. We determined our discount rate based on a range of factors, including a yield curve
composed of the rates of return on several hundred high-quality, fixed income corporate bonds available at the measurement date
and corresponding to the related expected durations of future cash outflows for the obligations. These bonds had an average rating
of at least Aa3 or AA- by the nationally recognized statistical rating organizations, denominated in U.S. dollars, and generally not
callable, convertible or index linked. For the year ended December 31, 2022, when compared to the year ended December 31, 2021,
we increased our pension discount rate by 2.20%, resulting in a decrease in our pension plan benefit obligation of $11,738, and
increased our postretirement discount rate by 2.40%, resulting in a decrease in our postretirement benefit obligation of $2,102.
Our expected long-term rate of return was 6.75% on pension plan assets and 4.50% on postretirement plan assets for 2022. We have
increased our expected return on plan assets to 7.50% on pension plan assets and 6.50% on postretirement plan assets for 2023,
reflecting higher long-term capital market expectations for equities and higher yields for bonds. Our expected return on plan assets
is calculated using the actual fair value of plan assets. If all other factors were to remain unchanged, we expect that a 0.50%
decrease in the expected long-term rate of return would cause 2023 combined pension and postretirement cost to increase $201,
which under our accounting policy would be adjusted to actual returns in the current year upon remeasurement of our retiree benefit
plans.
We recognize gains and losses on pension and postretirement plan assets and obligations immediately in “Other income (expense) –
net” in our consolidated statements of income. These gains and losses are generally measured annually as of December 31, and
accordingly, will normally be recorded during the fourth quarter, unless an earlier remeasurement is required. Should actual
experience differ from actuarial assumptions, the projected pension benefit obligation and net pension cost and accumulated
postretirement benefit obligation and postretirement benefit cost would be affected in future years. See Note 14 for additional
discussions regarding our assumptions.
Depreciation Our depreciation of assets, including use of composite group depreciation for certain subsidiaries and estimates of
useful lives, is described in Notes 1 and 7.
If all other factors were to remain unchanged, we expect that a one-year increase in the useful lives of our plant in service would
have resulted in a decrease of approximately $2,653 in our 2022 depreciation expense and that a one-year decrease would have
resulted in an increase of approximately $3,778 in our 2022 depreciation expense. See Notes 7 and 8 for depreciation and
amortization expense applicable to property, plant and equipment, including our finance lease right-of-use assets.
Asset Valuations and Impairments
Goodwill and other indefinite-lived intangible assets are not amortized but tested at least annually on October 1 for impairment. For
impairment testing, we estimate fair values using models that predominantly rely on the expected cash flows to be derived from the
reporting unit or use of the asset. Long-lived assets are reviewed for impairment whenever events or circumstances indicate that the
book value may not be recoverable over the remaining life. Inputs underlying the expected cash flows include, but are not limited
to, subscriber counts, revenue per user, capital investment and acquisition costs per subscriber, and ongoing operating costs. We
based our assumptions on a combination of our historical results, trends, business plans and marketplace participant data.
Annual Goodwill Testing
Goodwill is tested on a reporting unit basis by comparing the estimated fair value of each reporting unit to its book value. If the fair
value exceeds the book value, then no impairment is measured. We estimate fair values using an income approach (also known as a
discounted cash flow model) and a market multiple approach. The income approach utilizes our future cash flow projections with a
perpetuity value discounted at an appropriate weighted average cost of capital. The market multiple approach uses the multiples of
publicly traded companies whose services are comparable to those offered by the reporting units.
As of October 1, 2022, the calculated fair value of the Mobility reporting unit exceeded its book value and no additional testing was
necessary. If either the projected rate of long-term growth of Mobility cash flows or revenues declined by 0.5%, or if the weighted
average cost of capital increased by 0.5%, the fair value would still be higher than the book value of the goodwill. In
31
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
the event of a 10% drop in the fair value of the Mobility reporting unit, the fair value still would have exceeded the book value of
the reporting unit.
Our 2022 annual goodwill impairment analysis resulted in noncash impairment charges related to our Business Wireline, Consumer
Wireline and Mexico reporting units. The decline in fair values was primarily due to changes in the macroeconomic environment,
namely increased weighted-average cost of capital. Also, inflation pressure and lower projected cash flows driven by secular
declines, predominantly at Business Wireline, impacted the fair values. Future sustained declines in macroeconomic or business
conditions, or higher discount rates or declines in the value of AT&T stock could result in goodwill impairment charges in future
periods. A summary of business unit goodwill impairment by segment and sensitivity analysis is as follows:
Communications Latin America
Business Consumer
Wireline Wireline Mexico
Goodwill as of October 1, 2022: $ 17,903 $ 30,155 $ 826 
Impairment charge (13,478) (10,508) (826)
Remaining Goodwill at December 31, 2022 $ 4,425 $ 19,647 $ — 
Sensitivity analysis, approximate hypothetical impairment charge:
Weighted-average cost of capital increase of 25 BP $ 1,200 $ 2,200 $ — 
Projected terminal growth rate decline of 25 BP 700 1,400 — 
Projected long-term EBITDA margin decline of 100 BP 1,500 1,300 — 
U.S. Wireless Licenses
The fair value of U.S. wireless licenses is assessed using a discounted cash flow model (the Greenfield Approach) and a qualitative
corroborative market approach based on auction prices, depending upon auction activity. The Greenfield Approach assumes a
company initially owns only the wireless licenses and makes investments required to build an operation comparable to current use.
These licenses are tested annually for impairment on an aggregated basis, consistent with their use on a national scope for the
United States. For impairment testing, we assume subscriber and revenue growth will trend up to projected levels, with a long-term
growth rate reflecting expected long-term inflation trends. We assume churn rates will initially exceed our current experience but
decline to rates that are in line with industry-leading churn. We used a discount rate of 9.50%, based on the optimal long-term
capital structure of a market participant and its associated cost of debt and equity for the licenses, to calculate the present value of
the projected cash flows. If either the projected rate of long-term growth of cash flows or revenues declined by 0.5%, or if the
discount rate increased by 0.5%, the fair values of these wireless licenses would still be higher than the book value of the licenses.
The fair value of these wireless licenses exceeded their book values by more than 10%.
Other Finite-Lived Intangibles
Customer relationships, licenses in Mexico and other finite-lived intangible assets are reviewed for impairment whenever events or
circumstances indicate that the book value may not be recoverable over their remaining life. For this analysis, we compare the
expected undiscounted future cash flows attributable to the asset to its book value. When the asset’s book value exceeds
undiscounted future cash flows, an impairment is recorded to reduce the book value of the asset to its estimated fair value (see
Notes 7 and 9).
Income Taxes Our estimates of income taxes and the significant items giving rise to the deferred assets and liabilities are shown in
Note 13 and reflect our assessment of actual future taxes to be paid on items reflected in the financial statements, giving
consideration to both timing and probability of these estimates. Actual income taxes could vary from these estimates due to future
changes in income tax law or the final review of our tax returns by federal, state or foreign tax authorities.
We use our judgment to determine whether it is more likely than not that we will sustain positions that we have taken on tax returns
and, if so, the amount of benefit to initially recognize within our financial statements. We regularly review our uncertain tax
positions and adjust our unrecognized tax benefits (UTBs) in light of changes in facts and circumstances, such as changes in tax
law, interactions with taxing authorities and developments in case law. These adjustments to our UTBs may affect our income tax
expense. Settlement of uncertain tax positions may require use of our cash.
New Accounting Standards
See Note 1 for discussion of recently issued or adopted accounting standards.
32
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
OTHER BUSINESS MATTERS
Spectrum Auctions On January 14, 2022, the FCC announced that we were the winning bidder for 1,624 3.45 GHz licenses in
Auction 110. We provided the FCC an upfront deposit of $123 in the third quarter of 2021 and paid the remaining $8,956 in the
first quarter of 2022, for a total of $9,079. We received the licenses in May 2022, and classified the auction deposits and related
capitalized interest as “Licenses – Net” on our December 31, 2022 consolidated balance sheet.
On February 24, 2021, the FCC announced that AT&T was the winning bidder for 1,621 C-Band licenses, comprised of a total of
80 MHz nationwide, including 40 MHz in Phase I. We provided to the FCC an upfront deposit of $550 in 2020 and cash payments
totaling $22,856 in the first quarter of 2021, for a total of $23,406. We received the licenses in July 2021 and classified the auction
deposits, related capitalized interest and billed relocation costs as “Licenses – Net” on our December 31, 2021 consolidated balance
sheet. In December 2021, we paid $955 of Incentive Payments for the clearing of Phase I spectrum and estimate that we will be
responsible for an additional $2,112 upon clearing of Phase II spectrum, expected by the end of 2023. Additionally, we are
responsible for approximately $1,100 of compensable relocation costs over the next several years as the spectrum is being cleared
by satellite operators, of which we paid $650 in the fourth quarter of 2021 and $98 in the third quarter of 2022.
WarnerMedia On April 8, 2022, we completed the separation and distribution of our WarnerMedia business, and merger of
Magallanes, Inc. (Spinco), an AT&T subsidiary formed to hold the WarnerMedia business, with a subsidiary of Discovery, Inc.,
which was renamed Warner Bros. Discovery, Inc. (WBD). Each AT&T shareholder was entitled to receive 0.241917 shares of
WBD common stock for each share of AT&T common stock held as of the record date, which represented approximately 71% of
WBD. In connection with and in accordance with the terms of the Separation and Distribution Agreement (SDA), prior to the
distribution and merger, AT&T received approximately $40,400, which includes $38,800 of Spinco cash and $1,600 of debt
retained by WarnerMedia. During the second quarter of 2022, assets of approximately $121,100 and liabilities of $70,600 were
removed from our balance sheet as well as $45,041 of retained earnings and $5,632 of additional paid-in capital associated with the
transaction. Additionally, in August 2022, we and WBD finalized the post-closing adjustment, pursuant to Section 1.3 of the SDA,
which resulted in a $1,200 payment to WBD in the third quarter of 2022 and was reflected in the December 31, 2022 balance sheet
as an adjustment to additional paid-in capital. The payment is accounted for as cash used in financing activities in our statement of
cash flows in third quarter of 2022. (See Note 6)
AT&T, Spinco and Discovery entered into a Tax Matters Agreement, which governs the parties’ rights, responsibilities and
obligations with respect to tax liabilities and benefits, the preservation of the expected tax-free status of the transactions
contemplated by the SDA, and other matters regarding taxes.
Additionally, we entered into an adjusted HBO Max agreement with WBD that provides us with expanded distribution rights and
additional flexibility to market and sell the service in a cost-efficient manner. Under the terms of the agreement, beginning June 1,
2022, we are permitted to include HBO Max in our customer offerings in exchange for a licensing fee. Furthermore, AT&T has the
right, but not the obligation, to market and distribute HBO Max to its customers in plans, bundles, and promotional offers.
Xandr On June 6, 2022, we completed the sale of the marketplace component of Xandr to Microsoft Corporation. Xandr was
reflected in our historical financial statements as discontinued operations. (See Note 6)
Gigapower, LLC On December 22, 2022, we agreed to form Gigapower, LLC (Gigapower), a joint venture with BlackRock
Alternatives, to provide a fiber network to Internet service providers and other businesses across the U.S. that serve customers
outside of our traditional 21-state wireline footprint. The transaction is subject to customary closing conditions, including
regulatory approvals. Upon closing the joint venture, we expect to deconsolidate Gigapower’s operations.
Labor Contracts As of January 31, 2023, we employed approximately 160,700 persons. Approximately 42% of our employees are
represented by the Communications Workers of America (CWA), the International Brotherhood of Electrical Workers (IBEW) or
other unions. After expiration of the collective bargaining agreements, work stoppages or labor disruptions may occur in the
absence of new contracts or other agreements being reached. The main contracts included the following:
•A contract covering approximately 7,000 Mobility employees in nine states, for which we reached tentative agreement in
February 2023.
•A contract covering approximately 400 employees supporting internet-based products is set to expire in July 2023.
•A contract covering approximately 200 Mobility employees in Illinois is set to expire in May 2023.
Inflation Reduction Act The Inflation Reduction Act of 2022 (Inflation Reduction Act) was enacted on August 16, 2022. The
Inflation Reduction Act imposes a new 15% corporate alternative minimum tax (CAMT) on “applicable corporations” for taxable
years beginning after December 31, 2022. The CAMT is imposed to the extent the alternative minimum tax exceeds a company’s
regular tax liability. A corporation that pays alternative minimum tax is eligible for a credit against income tax in future years.
Subject to future regulatory guidance, we currently do not believe the CAMT will have a material impact on our 2023 tax liability.
33
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
OECD On October 8, 2021, the Organization for Economic Co-operation and Development (OECD) announced the OECD/G20
Inclusive Framework on Base Erosion and Profit Shifting which agreed to a two-pillar solution to address tax challenges arising
from digitalization of the economy. On December 20, 2021, the OECD released Pillar Two Model Rules defining the global
minimum tax, which calls for the taxation of large corporations at a minimum rate of 15%. The OECD continues to release
additional guidance on the two-pillar framework with widespread implementation anticipated by 2024. There can be no assurance
that these new rules will not increase our taxes in these countries and have an adverse impact on our provision for income taxes,
when enacted or enforced by participating countries in which we do business.
Environmental We are subject from time to time to judicial and administrative proceedings brought by various governmental
authorities under federal, state or local environmental laws. We reference in our Forms 10-Q and 10-K certain environmental
proceedings that could result in monetary sanctions (exclusive of interest and costs) of three hundred thousand dollars or more.
However, we do not believe that any of those currently pending will have a material adverse effect on our results of operations.
LIQUIDITY AND CAPITAL RESOURCES
Continuing operations for the years ended December 31, 2022 2021 2020
Cash provided by operating activities $ 35,812 $ 37,170 $ 37,484 
Cash used in investing activities (26,899) (32,489) (13,447)
Cash (used in) provided by financing activities (59,564) 1,894 (31,031)
At December 31, 2022 2021
Cash and cash equivalents $ 3,701 $ 19,223 
Total debt 135,890 175,631 
We had $3,701 in cash and cash equivalents available at December 31, 2022, decreasing $15,522 since December 31, 2021 and
returning to historical levels with the close of the WarnerMedia/Discovery transaction. Cash and cash equivalents included cash of
$866 and money market funds and other cash equivalents of $2,835. Approximately $1,045 of our cash and cash equivalents were
held by our foreign entities in accounts predominantly outside of the U.S. and may be subject to restrictions on repatriation.
In 2022, cash inflows were primarily provided by cash receipts from operations, including cash from our sale and transfer of our
receivables to third parties, cash received in connection with the separation and distribution of the WarnerMedia business, issuance
of commercial paper and long-term debt and distributions from DIRECTV. These inflows were exceeded by cash used to meet the
needs of the business, including, but not limited to, payment of operating expenses, spectrum acquisitions, funding capital
expenditures and vendor financing payments, repayment of short-term borrowings and long-term debt, and dividend payments to
stockholders. We maintain availability under our credit facilities and our commercial paper program to meet our short-term
liquidity requirements.
Refer to “Contractual Obligations” discussion below for additional information regarding our cash requirements.
Cash Provided by Operating Activities from Continuing Operations
During 2022, cash provided by operating activities was $35,812 compared to $37,170 in 2021, reflecting the separation of
DIRECTV and working capital impacts, including higher payments for wireless devices tied to accelerated subscriber growth.
We actively manage the timing of our supplier payments for operating items to optimize the use of our cash. Among other things,
we seek to make payments on 90-day or greater terms, while providing the suppliers with access to bank facilities that permit
earlier payments at their cost. In addition, for payments to a key supplier, as part of our working capital initiatives, we have
arrangements that allow us to extend the stated payment terms by up to 90 days at an additional cost to us (referred to as supplier
financing). The net impact of supplier financing was to improve cash from operating activities $851 in 2022 and $25 in 2021. All
supplier financing payments are due within one year.
Cash Used in or Provided by Investing Activities from Continuing Operations
During 2022, cash used in investing activities totaled $26,899, consisting primarily of $19,626 (including interest during
construction) for capital expenditures, and $10,200 for acquisitions of licenses won in Auction 110 and associated capitalized
34
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
interest. In 2022, we received a return of investment of $2,649 from DIRECTV representing distributions in excess of cumulative
equity in earnings from DIRECTV (see Note 10).
For capital improvements, we have negotiated favorable vendor payment terms of 120 days or more (referred to as vendor
financing) with some of our vendors, which are excluded from capital expenditures and reported as financing activities. Vendor
financing payments were $4,697 in 2022, compared to $4,596 in 2021. Capital expenditures in 2022 were $19,626, and when
including $4,697 cash paid for vendor financing, capital investment was $24,323 ($4,182 higher than the prior year).
The vast majority of our capital expenditures are spent on our networks, including product development and related support
systems. In 2022, we placed $5,817 of equipment in service under vendor financing arrangements (compared to $5,282 in 2021)
and approximately $320 of assets related to the FirstNet build (compared to $750 in 2021). Total reimbursements from the
government for FirstNet were approximately $260 for 2022 and $865 for 2021.
The amount of our capital expenditures is influenced by demand for services and products, capacity needs and network
enhancements. Our capital expenditures and vendor financing payments were elevated in 2022, reflecting strategic investments. In
2023, we expect that our capital investment, which includes capital expenditures and cash paid for vendor financing, will be
consistent with 2022 levels.
Cash Used in or Provided by Financing Activities from Continuing Operations
In 2022, cash used in financing activities totaled $59,564 and was comprised of debt issuances and repayments, payments of
dividends, and vendor financing payments. We also paid approximately $1,211 in cash on the note payable to DIRECTV, with $130
due as of December 31, 2022 (see Note 19).
A tabular summary of our debt activity during 2022 is as follows:
First
QuarterSecond
QuarterThird
QuarterFourth
QuarterFull Year
2022
Net commercial paper borrowings $ 1,471 $ (5,219)$ (724)$ (1,337)$ (5,809)
Issuance of Notes and Debentures:
Private Financing $ — $ — $ 750 $ — $ 750 
2025 Term Loan — — — 2,500 2,500 
Other 479 — — — 479 
Debt Issuances $ 479 $ — $ 750 $ 2,500 $ 3,729 
Repayments:
2021 Syndicated Term Loan $ — $ (7,350)$ — $ — $ (7,350)
BAML Bilateral Term Loan - Tranche A — (1,000) — — (1,000)
Private financing — (750) — (750) (1,500)
Repayments of other short-term borrowings $ — $ (9,100)$ — $ (750)$ (9,850)
USD notes $ (123)$(18,957)$ — $ (287)$(19,367)
Euro notes — (3,343) — — (3,343)
BAML Bilateral Term Loan - Tranche B — (1,000) — — (1,000)
Other (667) (123) (199) (419) (1,408)
Repayments of long-term debt $ (790)$(23,423)$ (199)$ (706)$(25,118)
On April 1 1, 2022, we issued notices for the redemption in full of all of the outstanding approximately $9,042 aggregate principal amount of
various global notes due 2022 to 2026 with coupon rates ranging from 2.625% to 4.450% (Make-Whole Notes). The Make-Whole Notes
were redeemed on the redemption dates set forth in the notices of redemption, at “make whole” redemption prices calculated as set forth in
the respective redemption notices in the second quarter .
Includes $7,954 of cash paid toward the $8,822 aggregate principal amount of various notes that were tendered for cash in May 2022. The
notes had interest rates ranging between 3.100% and 8.750% and original maturities ranging from 2026 to 2061.
Includes $287 of principal repayment on a $592 zero coupon note that matured in November 2022. The other $305 was applied to operating
cash flows related to interest expense that accreted to the note over its life.
The weighted average interest rate of our long-term debt portfolio, including credit agreement borrowings and the impact of
derivatives, was approximately 4.1% as of December 31, 2022 and 3.8% as of December 31, 2021. We had $133,207 of total notes
and debentures outstanding at December 31, 2022, which included Euro, British pound sterling, Canadian dollar, Mexican peso,
Australian dollar, and Swiss franc denominated debt that totaled approximately $35,525.1, 2, 3
1
2
3
35
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
At December 31, 2022, we had $7,467 of debt maturing within one year, consisting of $866 of commercial paper borrowings and
$6,601 of long-term debt issuances.
During 2022, we paid $4,697 of cash under our vendor financing program, compared to $4,596 in 2021. Total vendor financing
payables included in our December 31, 2022 consolidated balance sheet were $6,147, with $4,592 due within one year (in
“Accounts payable and accrued liabilities”) and the remainder predominantly due within five years (in “Other noncurrent
liabilities”).
At December 31, 2022, we had approximately 144 million shares remaining from our share repurchase authorizations approved by
the Board of Directors in 2014. During 2022, we repurchased approximately 34 million shares under the March 2014 authorization.
We paid dividends on common shares and preferred shares of $9,859 in 2022, compared with $15,068 in 2021. Dividends on
common stock declared by our Board of Directors, on a quarterly basis, totaled $1.11 per share in 2022 and $2.08 per share in
2021. Our dividend policy considers the expectations and requirements of stockholders, capital funding requirements of AT&T and
long-term growth opportunities. On February 1, 2022, we announced that our Board of Directors approved an expected annual
dividend level of $1.11 per common share, or approximately $8,000 per year, following the close of the WarnerMedia/Discovery
transaction.
In the fourth quarter of 2022, all outstanding AT&T Mobility II LLC (Mobility preferred interests) were put to us (approximately
$8,000), with approximately one-third redeemed in the fourth quarter; approximately 107 million interests are expected to be
redeemed primarily in October 2023 and 107 million redeemed in October 2024, per the terms of the agreement, unless the interests
are called or the puts are accepted by AT&T prior to those dates. With the certainty of redemption, the remaining Mobility preferred
interests were reclassified from equity to a liability at fair value, with approximately $2,670 recorded in current as “Accounts
payable and accrued liabilities” and $2,670 recorded in “Other noncurrent liabilities.” In the fourth quarter of 2022, we paid
approximately $2,600 cash to redeem the Mobility preferred interests put to us on October 24, 2022. (See Note 16)
Our 2023 financing activities will focus on managing our debt level and paying dividends, subject to approval by our Board of
Directors. We plan to fund our financing uses of cash through a combination of cash from operations, issuance of debt, and asset
sales. The timing and mix of any debt issuance and/or refinancing will be guided by credit market conditions and interest rate
trends.
Credit Facilities
The following summary of our various credit and loan agreements does not purport to be complete and is qualified in its entirety by
reference to each agreement filed as exhibits to our Annual Report on Form 10-K.
We use credit facilities as a tool in managing our liquidity status. In November 2022, we terminated one of our revolving credit
agreements and amended and restated the other. We currently have one $12,000 revolving credit agreement that terminates on
November 18, 2027 (Revolving Credit Agreement). No amounts were outstanding as of December 31, 2022.
On January 29, 2021, we entered into a $14,700 Term Loan Credit Agreement (2021 Syndicated Term Loan), with Bank of
America, N.A., as agent. On March 23, 2021, we borrowed $7,350 under the 2021 Syndicated Term Loan and the remaining $7,350
of lenders’ commitments were terminated. In the first quarter of 2022, the maturity date of the 2021 Syndicated Term Loan was
extended to December 31, 2022. On April 13, 2022, the 2021 Syndicated Term Loan was paid off and terminated.
In March 2021, we entered into and drew on a $2,000 term loan credit agreement (BAML Bilateral Term Loan) consisting of (i) a
$1,000 facility originally due December 31, 2021 (BAML Tranche A Facility) and subsequently extended to December 31, 2022 in
the fourth quarter of 2021, and (ii) a $1,000 facility due December 31, 2022 (BAML Tranche B Facility), with Bank of America,
N.A., as agent. On April 13, 2022, the BAML Bilateral Term Loan was paid off and terminated.
In November 2022, we entered into and drew on a $2,500 term loan agreement due February 16, 2025 (2025 Term Loan), with
Mizuho Bank, Ltd., as agent. As of December 31, 2022, $2,500 was outstanding under this agreement.
We also utilize other external financing sources, which include various credit arrangements supported by government agencies to
support network equipment purchases as well as a commercial paper program.
Each of our credit and loan agreements contains covenants that are customary for an issuer with an investment grade senior debt
credit rating. Our Revolving Credit Agreement and 2025 Term Loan include a net debt-to-EBITDA financial ratio covenant
requiring AT&T to maintain, as of the last day of each fiscal quarter, a ratio of not more than 3.75-to-1. Other loan agreements
include a net debt-to-EBITDA financial ratio covenant requiring AT&T to maintain, as of the last day of each fiscal quarter
36
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
through June 30, 2023 a ratio of not more than 4.0-to-1, and a ratio of not more than 3.5-to-1 for any fiscal quarter thereafter. As of
December 31, 2022, we were in compliance with the covenants for our credit facilities.
Collateral Arrangements
Most of our counterparty collateral arrangements require cash collateral posting by AT&T only when derivative market values
exceed certain thresholds. Under these arrangements, which cover the majority of our approximately $38,800 derivative portfolio,
counterparties are still required to post collateral. During 2022, we posted approximately $760 of cash collateral, on a net basis.
Cash postings under these arrangements vary with changes in credit ratings and netting agreements. (See Note 12)
Other
Our total capital consists of debt (long-term debt and debt maturing within one year) and stockholders’ equity. Our capital structure
does not include debt issued by our equity method investments. At December 31, 2022, our debt ratio was 56.1%, compared to
48.9% at December 31, 2021 and 46.4% at December 31, 2020. The debt ratio is affected by the same factors that affect total
capital, and reflects our recent debt issuances, repayments and reclassifications related to redemption of noncontrolling interests.
A significant amount of our cash outflows for continuing operations is related to tax items, acquisition of spectrum through FCC
auctions and benefits paid for current and former employees:
•Total taxes incurred, collected and remitted by AT&T during 2022 and 2021, were $16,630 and $17,119. These taxes include
income, franchise, property, sales, excise, payroll, gross receipts and various other taxes and fees.
•Total domestic spectrum acquired primarily through FCC auctions, including cash, exchanged spectrum and auction deposits
was approximately $10,200 in 2022, $25,400 in 2021 and $2,800 in 2020.
•Total health and welfare benefits provided to certain active and retired employees and their dependents totaled approximately
$3,200 in 2022 and $3,390 in 2021, with $788 paid from plan assets in 2022 compared to $1,163 in 2021. Of those benefits,
approximately $2,840 related to medical and prescription drug benefits in 2022 compared to $2,990 in 2021. In addition, in
2022, we prefunded $500 for future benefit payments versus $685 in 2021. We paid $5,854 of pension benefits out of plan
assets in 2022 compared to $5,942 in 2021.
Contractual Obligations
Our contractual obligations as of December 31, 2022, and the estimated timing of payment, are in the following table:
Payments Due By Period
TotalLess than
1 Year1-3
Years3-5
YearsMore than
5 Years
Long-term debt obligations $ 147,673 $ 6,929 $ 14,898 $ 14,897 $ 110,949 
Interest payments on long-term debt 101,559 6,062 10,910 9,818 74,769 
Purchase obligations 27,015 12,313 11,424 2,457 821 
Operating lease obligations 26,468 4,657 7,746 5,132 8,933 
FirstNet sustainability payments 17,205 195 390 3,255 13,365 
Unrecognized tax benefits 8,323 486 — — 7,837 
Other finance obligations 13,788 5,391 2,830 1,787 3,780 
Mobility preferred interests 5,340 2,670 2,670 — — 
Total Contractual Obligations $ 347,371 $ 38,703 $ 50,868 $ 37,346 $ 220,454 
Represents principal or payof f amounts of notes, debentures and credit agreement borrowings at maturity (see Note 1 1). Foreign debt
includes the impact from hedges, when applicable.
Includes credit agreement borrowings.
We expect to fund the purchase obligations with cash provided by operations or through incremental borrowings. Consists of commitments
primarily related to spectrum acquisitions and other commercial commitments. The minimum commitment for certain obligations is based on
termination penalties that could be paid to exit the contracts. (See Note 21)
Represents operating lease payments (see Note 8).
Represents contractual commitment to make sustainability payments over the 25-year contract. These sustainability payments represent our
commitment to fund FirstNet’ s operating expenses and future reinvestment in the network, which we own and operate. FirstNet has a
statutory requirement to reinvest funds that exceed the agency’ s operating expenses, which we anticipate to be $15,000. (See Note 20)
The noncurrent portion of the UTBs is included in the “More than 5 Years” column, as we cannot reasonably estimate the timing or amounts
of additional cash payments, if any , at this time (see Note 13).
Represents future minimum payments under the Crown Castle and other arrangements (see Note 18), payables subject to extended payment
terms (see Note 22), finance lease payments (see Note 8) and note payable to DIRECTV  (see Note 19).
See Note 16.1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
37
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Certain items were excluded from this table because the year of payment is unknown and could not be reliably estimated, we
believe the obligations are immaterial, or the settlement of the obligation will not require the use of cash. These items include:
deferred income tax liability of $57,032 (see Note 13); net postemployment benefit obligations of $8,433 (including current
portion); and other noncurrent liabilities of $11,035.
ITEM 7A. QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE DISCLOSURES ABOUT MARKET RISK
We are exposed to market risks primarily from changes in interest rates and foreign currency exchange rates. These risks, along
with other business risks, impact our cost of capital. It is our policy to manage our debt structure and foreign exchange exposure in
order to manage capital costs, control financial risks and maintain financial flexibility over the long term. In managing market risks,
we employ derivatives according to documented policies and procedures, including interest rate swaps, interest rate locks, foreign
currency exchange contracts and combined interest rate foreign currency contracts (cross-currency swaps). We do not use
derivatives for trading or speculative purposes. We do not foresee significant changes in the strategies we use to manage market
risk in the near future.
One of the most significant assumptions used in estimating our postretirement benefit obligations is the assumed weighted-average
discount rate, which is the hypothetical rate at which the projected benefit obligations could be effectively settled or paid out to
participants. We determined our discount rate based on a range of factors, including a yield curve composed of the rates of return
on several hundred high-quality, fixed income corporate bonds available at the measurement date and corresponding to the related
expected durations of future cash outflows for the obligations. In recent years, the discount rates have been increasingly volatile,
and on average have been lower than in historical periods. Lower discount rates used to measure our pension and postretirement
plans result in higher obligations. Future increases in these rates could result in lower obligations, improved funded status and
actuarial gains.
Interest Rate Risk
The majority of our financial instruments are medium- and long-term fixed-rate notes and debentures. Changes in interest rates can
lead to significant fluctuations in the fair value of these instruments. The principal amounts by expected maturity, average interest
rate and fair value of our liabilities that are exposed to interest rate risk are described in Notes 11 and 12. In managing interest
expense, we control our mix of fixed and floating rate debt through term loans, floating rate notes, and interest rate swaps. We have
established interest rate risk limits that we closely monitor by measuring interest rate sensitivities in our debt and interest rate
derivatives portfolios.
Most of our foreign-denominated long-term debt has been swapped from fixed-rate or floating-rate foreign currencies to fixed-rate
U.S. dollars at issuance through cross-currency swaps, removing interest rate risk and foreign currency exchange risk associated
with the underlying interest and principal payments. Likewise, periodically we enter into interest rate locks to partially hedge the
risk of increases in the benchmark interest rate during the period leading up to the probable issuance of fixed-rate debt. We expect
gains or losses in our cross-currency swaps and interest rate locks to offset the losses and gains in the financial instruments they
hedge.
We had no interest rate swaps and no interest rate locks at December 31, 2022.
Foreign Exchange Risk
We principally use foreign exchange contracts to hedge costs and debt denominated in foreign currencies. We are also exposed to
foreign currency exchange risk through our foreign affiliates and equity investments in foreign companies.
Through cross-currency swaps, most of our foreign-denominated debt has been swapped from fixed-rate or floating-rate foreign
currencies to fixed-rate U.S. dollars at issuance, removing interest rate and foreign currency exchange risk associated with the
underlying interest and principal payments. We expect gains or losses in our cross-currency swaps to offset the gains and losses in
the financial instruments they hedge. We had cross-currency swaps with a notional value of $38,213 and a fair value of $(5,982)
outstanding at December 31, 2022.
For the purpose of assessing specific risks, we use a sensitivity analysis to determine the effects that market risk exposures may
have on the fair value of our financial instruments and results of operations. We had foreign exchange forward contracts with a
notional value of $617 and a fair value of $(23) outstanding at December 31, 2022.
38
AT&T  Inc.
Report of Management
The consolidated financial statements have been prepared in conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles. The
integrity and objectivity of the data in these financial statements, including estimates and judgments relating to matters not
concluded by year end, are the responsibility of management, as is all other information included in the Annual Report, unless
otherwise indicated.
The financial statements of AT&T Inc. (AT&T) have been audited by Ernst & Young LLP, Independent Registered Public
Accounting Firm. Management has made available to Ernst & Young LLP all of AT&T’s financial records and related data, as well
as the minutes of stockholders’ and directors’ meetings. Furthermore, management believes that all representations made to Ernst &
Young LLP during its audit were valid and appropriate.
Management maintains disclosure controls and procedures that are designed to ensure that information required to be disclosed by
AT&T is recorded, processed, summarized, accumulated and communicated to its management, including its principal executive
and principal financial officers, to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosure, and reported within the time periods
specified by the Securities and Exchange Commission’s rules and forms.
Management also seeks to ensure the objectivity and integrity of its financial data by the careful selection of its managers, by
organizational arrangements that provide an appropriate division of responsibility and by communication programs aimed at
ensuring that its policies, standards and managerial authorities are understood throughout the organization.
The Audit Committee of the Board of Directors meets periodically with management, the internal auditors and the independent
auditors to review the manner in which they are performing their respective responsibilities and to discuss auditing, internal
accounting controls and financial reporting matters. Both the internal auditors and the independent auditors periodically meet alone
with the Audit Committee and have access to the Audit Committee at any time.
Assessment of Internal Control
The management of AT&T is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over financial reporting, as
defined in Rule 13a-15(f) or 15d-15(f) under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. AT&T’s internal control system was designed to
provide reasonable assurance to the company’s management and Board of Directors regarding the preparation and fair presentation
of published financial statements.
AT&T management assessed the effectiveness of the company’s internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2022.
In making this assessment, it used the criteria set forth by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway
Commission (COSO) in Internal Control – Integrated Framework (2013 framework). Based on its assessment, AT&T management
believes that, as of December 31, 2022, the company’s internal control over financial reporting is effective based on those criteria.
Ernst & Young LLP, the independent registered public accounting firm that audited the financial statements included in this Annual
Report, has issued an attestation report on the company’s internal control over financial reporting.
/s/John T. Stankey /s/Pascal Desroches .
John T. Stankey Pascal Desroches
Chief Executive Officer
   and PresidentSenior Executive Vice President
   and Chief Financial Officer
39
AT&T  Inc.
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
To the Stockholders and the Board of Directors of AT&T Inc.
Opinion on the Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of AT&T Inc. (the Company) as of December 31, 2022 and 2021,
the related consolidated statements of income, comprehensive income, cash flows and changes in stockholders’ equity for each of
the three years in the period ended December 31, 2022, and the related notes and financial statement schedule listed in Item 15(a)
(collectively referred to as the “consolidated financial statements”). In our opinion, the consolidated financial statements present
fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of the Company at December 31, 2022 and 2021, and the results of its
operations and its cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2022, in conformity with U.S. generally
accepted accounting principles.
We also have audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States)
(PCAOB), the Company’s internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2022, based on criteria established in
Internal Control—Integrated Framework issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission
(2013 framework) and our report dated February 13, 2023 expressed an unqualified opinion thereon.
Basis for Opinion
These financial statements are the responsibility of the Company’s management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on the
Company’s financial statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the PCAOB and are required
to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and
regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the
audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to error
or fraud. Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the financial statements,
whether due to error or fraud, and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test
basis, evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the financial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the
accounting principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the
financial statements. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
Critical Audit Matters
The critical audit matters communicated below are matters arising from the current period audit of the financial statements that
were communicated or required to be communicated to the audit committee and that: (1) relate to accounts or disclosures that are
material to the financial statements and (2) involved our especially challenging, subjective or complex judgments. The
communication of critical audit matters does not alter in any way our opinion on the consolidatedfinancial statements, taken as a
whole, and we are not, by communicating the critical audit matters below, providing separate opinions on the critical audit matters
or on the accounts or disclosures to which they relate.
Discount rates used in determining pension and postretirement benefit obligations
Description of the
MatterAt December 31, 2022, the Company’s defined benefit pension obligation was $42,828 million and exceeded
the fair value of pension plan assets of $40,874 million, resulting in an unfunded benefit obligation of $1,954
million. Additionally, at December 31, 2022, the Company’s postretirement benefit obligation was $7,280
million and exceeded the fair value of postretirement plan assets of $2,160 million, resulting in an unfunded
benefit obligation of $5,120 million. As explained in Note 14 to the consolidated financial statements, the
Company updates the assumptions used to measure the defined benefit pension and postretirement benefit
obligations, including discount rates, at December 31 or upon a remeasurement event. The Company
determines the discount rates used to measure the obligations based on the development of a yield curve using
high-quality corporate bonds selected to yield cash flows that correspond to the expected timing and amount
of the expected future benefit payments. 
40
AT&T  Inc.
Auditing the defined benefit pension and postretirement benefit obligations was complex due to the
judgmental nature of the actuarial assumptions made by management, primarily the discount rate, used in the
Company’s measurement process. The discount rate has a significant effect on the measurement of the
defined benefit pension and postretirement benefit obligations, and auditing the discount rate was complex
because it required an evaluation of the credit quality of the corporate bonds used to develop the discount rate
and the correlation of those bonds’ cash inflows to the timing and amount of future expected benefit
payments.
How We
Addressed the
Matter in Our
AuditWe obtained an understanding, evaluated the design and tested the operating effectiveness of certain controls
over management’s review of the determination of the discount rates used in the defined benefit pension and
postretirement benefit obligations calculations.
To test the determination of the discount rate used in the calculation of the defined benefit pension and
postretirement benefit obligations, we performed audit procedures that focused on evaluating, with the
assistance of our actuarial specialists, the determination of the discount rates, among other procedures. For
example, we evaluated the selected yield curve used to determine the discount rates applied in measuring the
defined benefit pension and postretirement benefit obligations. As part of this assessment, we considered the
credit quality of the corporate bonds that comprised the yield curve and compared the timing and amount of
cash flows at maturity with the expected amounts and duration of the related benefit payments.
Evaluation of goodwill for impairment
Description of the
MatterAt December 31, 2022, the Company’s goodwill balance was $67,895 million. As discussed in Note 1 to the
consolidated financial statements, reporting unit goodwill is tested at least annually for impairment.
Estimating fair values in connection with these impairment evaluations involves the utilization of discounted
cash flow and market multiple approaches. As described in Note 9 to the consolidated financial statements,
impairment charges of $13,478 million in the Business Wireline reporting unit, $10,508 million in the
Consumer Wireline reporting unit and $826 million in the Mexico reporting unit were recorded during the
year.
Auditing management’s annual goodwill impairment test for the Consumer Wireline and Business Wireline
reporting units was complex because the estimation of fair values involves subjective management
assumptions, such as projected terminal growth rates, projected long-term EBITDA margins, and weighted
average cost of capital, and complex valuation methodologies, such as the discounted cash flow and market
multiple approaches. Assumptions used in these valuation models are forward-looking, and changes in these
assumptions can have a material effect on the determination of fair value.
How We Addressed
the
Matter in Our
AuditWe obtained an understanding, evaluated the design and tested the operating effectiveness of certain controls
over the Company’s impairment evaluation processes. Our procedures included testing controls over
management’s review of the valuation models and its determination of the significant assumptions described
above.
Our audit procedures to test management’s impairment evaluations included, among others, assessing the
valuation methodologies and significant assumptions discussed above and the underlying data used to
develop such assumptions. For example, we compared the significant assumptions to current industry, market
and economic trends, and other guideline companies in the same industry. Where appropriate, we evaluated
whether changes to the Company’s business and other factors would affect the significant assumptions. We
also assessed the historical accuracy of management’s estimates and performed independent sensitivity
analyses. We involved our valuation specialists to assist us in evaluating the methodologies and auditing the
assumptions used to calculate the estimated fair values of the Company’s reporting units.
/s/ Ernst & Young LLP
We have served as the Company’s auditor since 1999.
Dallas, Texas
February 13, 2023 41
AT&T  Inc.
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
To the Stockholders and the Board of Directors of AT&T Inc.
Opinion on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
We have audited AT&T Inc.’s internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2022, based on criteria established in
Internal Control—Integrated Framework issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission
(2013 framework) (the COSO criteria). In our opinion, AT&T Inc. (the Company) maintained, in all material respects, effective
internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2022, based on the COSO criteria.
We also have audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States)
(PCAOB), the 2022 consolidated financial statements of the Company and our report dated February 13, 2023 expressed an
unqualified opinion thereon.
Basis for Opinion
The Company’s management is responsible for maintaining effective internal control over financial reporting and for its assessment
of the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting included in the accompanying Report of Management. Our
responsibility is to express an opinion on the Company’s internal control over financial reporting based on our audit. We are a
public accounting firm registered with the PCAOB and are required to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance
with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the
PCAOB.
We conducted our audit in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the
audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether effective internal control over financial reporting was maintained in all material
respects.
Our audit included obtaining an understanding of internal control over financial reporting, assessing the risk that a material
weakness exists, testing and evaluating the design and operating effectiveness of internal control based on the assessed risk, and
performing such other procedures as we considered necessary in the circumstances. We believe that our audit provides a reasonable
basis for our opinion.
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
A company’s internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability
of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted
accounting principles. A company’s internal control over financial reporting includes those policies and procedures that (1) pertain
to the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of
the company; (2) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial
statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the company are
being made only in accordance with authorizations of management and directors of the company; and (3) provide reasonable
assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the company’s assets that
could have a material effect on the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. Also,
projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become inadequate because
of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
/s/ Ernst & Young LLP
Dallas, Texas
February 13, 2023 42
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA
Consolidated Statements of Income
2022 2021 2020
Operating Revenues
Service $97,831 $111,565 $124,057 
Equipment 22,910 22,473 18,993 
Total operating revenues 120,741 134,038 143,050 
Operating Expenses
Cost of revenues
Equipment 24,009 23,685 19,585 
Broadcast, programming and operations — 8,106 16,077 
Other cost of revenues (exclusive of depreciation
and amortization shown separately below) 26,839 28,616 29,989 
Selling, general and administrative 28,961 29,669 30,817 
Asset impairments and abandonments and restructuring 27,498 213 15,687 
Depreciation and amortization 18,021 17,852 22,523 
Total operating expenses 125,328 108,141 134,678 
Operating Income (Loss) (4,587) 25,897 8,372 
Other Income (Expense)
Interest expense (6,108) (6,716) (7,727)
Equity in net income of affiliates 1,791 603 89 
Other income (expense) – net 5,810 9,387 (1,088)
Total other income (expense) 1,493 3,274 (8,726)
Income (Loss) from Continuing Operations Before Income Taxes (3,094) 29,171 (354)
Income tax expense on continuing operations 3,780 5,395 1,168 
Income (Loss) from Continuing Operations (6,874) 23,776 (1,522)
Loss from discontinued operations, net of tax (181) (2,297) (2,299)
Net Income (Loss) (7,055) 21,479 (3,821)
Less: Net Income Attributable to Noncontrolling Interest (1,469) (1,398) (1,355)
Net Income (Loss) Attributable to AT&T $(8,524)$20,081 $(5,176)
Less: Preferred Stock Dividends (203) (207) (193)
Net Income (Loss) Attributable to Common Stock $(8,727)$19,874 $(5,369)
Basic Earnings (Loss) Per Share from continuing operations $ (1.10)$ 3.07 $ (0.45)
Basic Loss Per Share from discontinued operations $ (0.03)$ (0.30)$ (0.30)
Basic Earnings (Loss) Per Share Attributable to Common Stock $ (1.13)$ 2.77 $ (0.75)
Diluted Earnings (Loss) Per Share from continuing operations $ (1.10)$ 3.02 $ (0.45)
Diluted Loss Per Share from discontinued operations $ (0.03)$ (0.29)$ (0.30)
Diluted Earnings (Loss) Per Share Attributable to Common Stock $ (1.13)$ 2.73 $ (0.75)
The accompanying notes are an integral part of the consolidated financial statements.
43
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income
2022 2021 2020
Net income (loss) $(7,055)$21,479 $(3,821)
Other comprehensive income (loss), net of tax:
Foreign Currency:
Translation adjustment (includes $0, $(2) and $(59) attributable to noncontrolling
interest), net of taxes of $90, $(44) and $(42) 346 (127) (929)
Reclassification adjustment included in net income (loss), net of taxes of
$0, $204 and $0 — 2,087 — 
Distributions of WarnerMedia, net of taxes of $(38), $0 and $0 (182) — — 
Securities:
Net unrealized gains (losses), net of taxes of $(49), $(21) and $27 (143) (63) 78 
Reclassification adjustment included in net income (loss), net of taxes of $3, $(1)
and $(5) 8 (3) (15)
Derivative Instruments:
Net unrealized gains (losses), net of taxes of $(183), $(192) and $(212) (648) (715) (811)
Reclassification adjustment included in net income (loss), net of taxes of $25, $19
and $18 96 72 69 
Distributions of WarnerMedia, net of taxes of $(12), $0 and $0 (24) — — 
Defined benefit postretirement plans:
Net prior service (cost) credit arising during period, net of taxes of $583, $(8)
and $735 1,787 (34) 2,250 
Amortization of net prior service credit included in net income (loss), net of taxes of
$(663), $(660) and $(601) (2,028) (2,020) (1,841)
Distributions of WarnerMedia, net of taxes of $5, $0 and $0 25 — — 
Other comprehensive income (loss) (763) (803) (1,199)
Total comprehensive income (loss) (7,818) 20,676 (5,020)
Less: Total comprehensive income attributable to noncontrolling interest (1,469) (1,396) (1,296)
Total Comprehensive Income (Loss) Attributable to AT&T $(9,287)$19,280 $(6,316)
The accompanying notes are an integral part of the consolidated financial statements.
44
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Consolidated Balance Sheets
December 31,
2022 2021
Assets
Current Assets
Cash and cash equivalents $ 3,701 $ 19,223 
Accounts receivable – net of related allowance for credit loss of $588 and $658 11,466 12,313 
Inventories 3,123 3,325 
Prepaid and other current assets 14,818 16,131 
Assets from discontinued operations — 119,776 
Total current assets 33,108 170,768 
Property, Plant and Equipment – Net 127,445 121,649 
Goodwill – Net 67,895 92,740 
Licenses – Net 124,092 113,830 
Other Intangible Assets – Net 5,354 5,391 
Investments in and Advances to Equity Affiliates 3,533 6,168 
Operating Lease Right-Of-Use Assets 21,814 21,824 
Other Assets 19,612 19,252 
Total Assets $ 402,853 $ 551,622 
Liabilities and Stockholders’ Equity
Current Liabilities
Debt maturing within one year $ 7,467 $ 24,620 
Note payable to DIRECTV 130 1,245 
Accounts payable and accrued liabilities 42,644 39,095 
Advanced billings and customer deposits 3,918 3,966 
Dividends payable 2,014 3,749 
Liabilities from discontinued operations — 33,555 
Total current liabilities 56,173 106,230 
Long-Term Debt 128,423 151,011 
Deferred Credits and Other Noncurrent Liabilities
Deferred income taxes 57,032 53,767 
Postemployment benefit obligation 7,260 12,560 
Operating lease liabilities 18,659 18,956 
Other noncurrent liabilities 28,849 25,243 
Total deferred credits and other noncurrent liabilities 111,800 110,526 
Stockholders’ Equity
Preferred stock ($1 par value, 10,000,000 authorized at December 31, 2022
and December 31, 2021):
Series A (48,000 issued and outstanding at December 31, 2022 and December 31, 2021) — — 
Series B (20,000 issued and outstanding at December 31, 2022 and December 31, 2021) — — 
Series C (70,000 issued and outstanding at December 31, 2022 and December 31, 2021) — — 
Common stock ($1 par value, 14,000,000,000 authorized at December 31, 2022 and
December 31, 2021: issued 7,620,748,598 at December 31, 2022 and December 31, 2021) 7,621 7,621 
Additional paid-in capital 123,610 130,112 
Retained (deficit) earnings (19,415) 42,350 
Treasury stock (493,156,816 at December 31, 2022 and 479,684,705 at December 31, 2021, at cost) (17,082) (17,280)
Accumulated other comprehensive income 2,766 3,529 
Noncontrolling interest 8,957 17,523 
Total stockholders’ equity 106,457 183,855 
Total Liabilities and Stockholders’ Equity $ 402,853 $ 551,622 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of the consolidated financial statements.
45
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows
2022 2021 2020
Operating Activities
Income (loss) from continuing operations $ (6,874 )$ 23,776  $ (1,522 )
Adjustments to reconcile income (loss) from continuing operations to net cash provided by operating
activities from continuing operations:
Depreciation and amortization 18,021  17,852  22,523  
Provision for uncollectible accounts 1,865  1,241  1,798  
Deferred income tax expense 2,975  7,412  2,145  
Net (gain) loss on investments, net of impairments 381 (369) (970)
Pension and postretirement benefit expense (credit) (3,237 ) (3,857 ) (2,992 )
Actuarial (gain) loss on pension and postretirement benefits (1,999 ) (4,143 ) 4,169  
Asset impairments and abandonments and restructuring 27,498  213 15,687  
Changes in operating assets and liabilities:
Receivables 727 (1,125 ) 1,079  
Other current assets (674) (1,288 ) (2,138 )
Accounts payable and other accrued liabilities (1,109 ) (1,570 ) (1,895 )
Equipment installment receivables and related sales 154 (271) (1,428 )
Deferred customer contract acquisition and fulfillment costs (947) 18 382 
Postretirement claims and contributions (823) (822) (985)
Other – net (146) 103 1,631  
Total adjustments 42,686  13,394  39,006  
Net Cash Pr ovided by Operating Activities fr om Continuing Operations 35,812  37,170  37,484  
Investing Activities
Capital expenditures (19,626 ) (15,545 ) (14,690 )
Acquisitions, net of cash acquired (10,200 ) (25,453 ) (1,625 )
Dispositions 199 7,136  2,472  
Distributions from DIRECTV  in excess of cumulative equity in earnings 2,649  1,323  — 
Other – net 79 50 396 
Net Cash Used in Investing Activities fr om Continuing Operations (26,899 ) (32,489 ) (13,447 )
Financing Activities
Net change in short-term borrowings with original maturities of three months or less (519) 1,316  (17)
Issuance of other short-term borrowings 3,955  21,856  9,440  
Repayment of other short-term borrowings (18,345 ) (7,510 ) (9,467 )
Issuance of long-term debt 2,979  9,931  31,988  
Repayment of long-term debt (25,118) (3,039 ) (39,062 )
Note payable to DIRECTV , net of payments (1,211) 1,341  — 
Payment of vendor financing (4,697 ) (4,596 ) (2,966 )
Issuance of preferred stock — — 3,869  
Purchase of treasury stock (890) (202) (5,498 )
Issuance of treasury stock 28 96 105 
Issuance of preferred interests in subsidiaries — — 1,979  
Redemption of preferred interest in subsidiary (2,665 ) — (1,950 )
Dividends paid (9,859 ) (15,068 ) (14,956 )
Other – net (3,222 ) (2,231 ) (4,496 )
Net Cash (Used in) Pr ovided by Financing Activities fr om Continuing Operations (59,564 ) 1,894  (31,031 )
Net (decrease) increase in cash and cash equivalents and restricted cash from continuing operations (50,651 ) 6,575  (6,994 )
Cash flows fr om Discontinued Operations:
Cash (used in) provided by operating activities (3,789 ) 4,788  5,645  
Cash provided by (used in) investing activities 1,094  399 (102)
Cash provided by (used in) financing activities 35,823  (316) (974)
Net increase (decrease) in cash and cash equivalents and restricted cash from discontinued operations 33,128  4,871  4,569  
Net (decrease) increase in cash and cash equivalents and restricted cash (17,523 ) 11,446  (2,425 )
Cash and cash equivalents and restricted cash beginning of year 21,316  9,870  12,295  
Cash and Cash Equivalents and Restricted Cash End of Year $ 3,793  $ 21,316  $ 9,870  
The accompanying notes are an integral part of the consolidated financial statements.
46
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars and shares in millions except per share amounts
Consolidated Statements of Changes in Stockholders’ Equity
2022 2021 2020
Shares Amount Shares Amount Shares Amount
Preferred Stock – Series A
Balance at beginning of year — $ — — $ — — $ — 
Balance at end of year — $ — — $ — — $ — 
Preferred Stock – Series B
Balance at beginning of year — $ — — $ — — $ — 
Balance at end of year — $ — — $ — — $ — 
Preferred Stock – Series C
Balance at beginning of year — $ — — $ — — $ — 
Balance at end of year — $ — — $ — — $ — 
Common Stock
Balance at beginning of year 7,621 $ 7,621 7,621 $ 7,621 7,621 $ 7,621 
Balance at end of year 7,621 $ 7,621 7,621 $ 7,621 7,621 $ 7,621 
Additional Paid-In Capital
Balance at beginning of year $ 130,112 $ 130,175 $ 126,279 
Distribution of WarnerMedia (6,832) — — 
Repurchase and acquisition of
common stock — — 67 
Issuance of preferred stock — — 3,869 
Issuance of treasury stock (171) (76) (62)
Share-based payments (162) 13 18 
Acquisition or reclassification of
interests held by noncontrolling
owners 663 — 4 
Balance at end of year $ 123,610 $ 130,112 $ 130,175 
Retained (Deficit) Earnings
Balance at beginning of year $ 42,350 $ 37,457 $ 57,936 
Cumulative effect of accounting
changes and other adjustments — — (293)
Adjusted beginning balance 42,350 37,457 57,643 
Net income (loss) attributable to AT&T (8,524) 20,081 (5,176)
Distribution of WarnerMedia (45,041) — — 
Preferred stock dividends (207) (224) (139)
Common stock dividends ($1.11, $2.08
and $2.08 per share) (7,993) (14,964) (14,871)
Balance at end of year $ (19,415) $ 42,350 $ 37,457 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of the consolidated financial statements.
47
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars and shares in millions except per share amounts
Consolidated Statements of Changes in Stockholders’ Equity - continued
2022 2021 2020
Shares Amount Shares Amount Shares Amount
Treasury Stock
Balance at beginning of year (480)$ (17,280) (495)$ (17,910) (366)$ (13,085)
Repurchase and acquisition of
common stock (44) (890) (8) (237) (150) (5,631)
Issuance of treasury stock 31 1,088 23 867 21 806 
Balance at end of year (493)$ (17,082) (480)$ (17,280) (495)$ (17,910)
Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income
Attributable to AT&T, net of tax
Balance at beginning of year $ 3,529 $ 4,330 $ 5,470 
Other comprehensive income (loss)
attributable to AT&T (763) (801) (1,140)
Balance at end of year $ 2,766 $ 3,529 $ 4,330 
Noncontrolling Interest
Balance at beginning of year $ 17,523 $ 17,567 $ 17,713 
Cumulative effect of accounting
changes and other adjustments — — (7)
Adjusted beginning balance 17,523 17,567 17,706 
Net income attributable to
noncontrolling interest 1,469 1,398 1,355 
Issuance and acquisition (disposition) of
noncontrolling owners (21) 7 1,979 
Redemption of noncontrolling interest (2,665) — (1,950)
Reclassification of noncontrolling
interest (5,997) — — 
Distributions (1,352) (1,447) (1,464)
Translation adjustments attributable to
noncontrolling interest, net of taxes — (2) (59)
Balance at end of year $ 8,957 $ 17,523 $ 17,567 
Total Stockholders’ Equity at
beginning of year $ 183,855 $ 179,240 $ 201,934 
Total Stockholders’ Equity at
end of year $ 106,457 $ 183,855 $ 179,240 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of the consolidated financial statements.
48
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
NOTE 1. SUMMARY OF SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Basis of Presentation Throughout this document, AT&T Inc. is referred to as “AT&T,” “we” or the “Company.” The consolidated
financial statements include the accounts of the Company and subsidiaries and affiliates which we control. AT&T is a holding
company whose subsidiaries and affiliates operate worldwide in the telecommunications and technology industries.
On April 8, 2022, we completed the separation of our WarnerMedia business, which represented substantially all of our
WarnerMedia segment, in a Reverse Morris Trust transaction, under which Magallanes, Inc. (Spinco), a formerly wholly-owned
subsidiary of AT&T that held the WarnerMedia business, was distributed to AT&T stockholders via a pro rata dividend, followed by
the combination of Spinco with a subsidiary of Discovery, Inc. (Discovery), which was renamed Warner Bros. Discovery, Inc.
(WBD). (See Note 6)
Upon the separation and distribution, the WarnerMedia business met the criteria for discontinued operations. For discontinued
operations, we also evaluated transactions that were components of AT&T’s single plan of a strategic shift, including dispositions
that previously did not individually meet the criteria due to materiality, and have determined discontinued operations to be
comprised of WarnerMedia, Vrio, Xandr and Playdemic Ltd. (Playdemic). These businesses are reflected in the accompanying
financial statements as discontinued operations, including for periods prior to the consummation of the WarnerMedia/Discovery
transaction. (See Notes 6 and 23)
On July 31, 2021, we closed our transaction with TPG Capital (TPG) to form a new company named DIRECTV Entertainment
Holdings, LLC (DIRECTV). With the close of the transaction, we separated and deconsolidated our Video business, comprised of
our U.S. video operations, and began accounting for our investment in DIRECTV under the equity method (see Notes 6, 10 and
19).
All significant intercompany transactions are eliminated in the consolidation process. Investments in subsidiaries and partnerships
which we do not control but have significant influence are accounted for under the equity method. Earnings from certain
investments accounted for using the equity method are included in our results on a one quarter lag. We also record our
proportionate share of our equity method investees’ other comprehensive income (OCI) items, including translation adjustments.
We treat distributions received from equity method investees as returns on investment and classify them as cash flows from
operating activities until those distributions exceed our cumulative equity in the earnings of that investment. We treat the excess
amount as a return of investment and classify it as cash flows from investing activities.
The preparation of financial statements in conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) requires
management to make estimates and assumptions, including other estimates of fair value, probable losses and expenses, that affect
the amounts reported in the financial statements and accompanying notes. Actual results could differ from those estimates.
Moreover, unfavorable changes in market conditions, including interest rates, could adversely impact those estimates and result in
asset impairments. Certain prior-period amounts have been conformed to the current period’s presentation. Unless otherwise noted,
the information in Notes 1 through 22 and 24 refer only to our continuing operations and do not include discussion of balances or
activity of WarnerMedia, Vrio, Xandr and Playdemic, which are part of discontinued operations.
Adopted and New Accounting Standards
Convertible Instruments Beginning with 2022 interim reporting, we adopted, through retrospective application, the Financial
Accounting Standards Board’s (FASB) Accounting Standards Update (ASU) No. 2020-06, “Debt—Debt With Conversion and
Other Options (Subtopic 470-20) and Derivatives and Hedging—Contracts in Entity’s Own Equity (Subtopic 815-40): Accounting
for Convertible Instruments and Contracts in an Entity’s Own Equity” (ASU 2020-06). ASU 2020-06 requires that instruments
which may be settled in cash or stock are presumed settled in stock in calculating diluted earnings per share. While our intent is to
settle the Series A Cumulative Perpetual Membership Interests in AT&T Mobility II LLC (Mobility preferred interests) in cash,
settlement of this instrument in AT&T shares would result in additional dilutive impact, the magnitude of which is influenced by
the fair value of the Mobility preferred interests and the average AT&T common stock price during the reporting period, which
could vary from period-to-period (see Note 16).
49
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
The following table presents the impact of the adoption of ASU 2020-06 on our diluted earnings per share from continuing
operations:
 
Historical
Accounting
MethodEffect of
Adoption of
ASU 2020-06Under ASU
2020-06 
 
Diluted earnings per share from continuing operations:
Year ended December 31, 2022 $ (1.10)$ — $ (1.10)
Year ended December 31, 2021 $ 3.07 $ (0.05)$ 3.02 
Year ended December 31, 2020 $ (0.45)$ — $ (0.45)
See Note 2 for a discussion of the numerator and denominator adjustments.
Reference Rate Reform In March 2020, the FASB issued ASU No. 2020-04, “Reference Rate Reform (Topic 848): Facilitation of
the Effects of Reference Rate Reform on Financial Reporting” (ASU 2020-04, as amended), which provides optional expedients,
and allows for certain exceptions to existing GAAP, for contract modifications triggered by the expected market transition of
certain benchmark interest rates to alternative reference rates. ASU 2020-04 applies to contracts, hedging relationships, certain
derivatives and other arrangements that reference the London Interbank Offering Rate (LIBOR) or any other rates ending after
December 31, 2024. ASU 2020-04, as amended, became effective immediately. We do not believe our adoption of ASU 2020-04,
including optional expedients, will materially impact our financial statements.
Government Assistance In November 2021, the FASB issued ASU No. 2021-10, “Government Assistance (Topic 832): Disclosures
by Business Entities about Government Assistance” (ASU 2021-10), which requires annual disclosures (e.g., terms and conditions,
accounting treatment, impacted financial statement lines), in the notes to the financial statements, about transactions with a
government that are accounted for by applying a grant or contribution accounting model by analogy to other guidance. We adopted
ASU 2021-10 effective for the annual reporting period ended December 31, 2022, as required, under prospective application, with
no required updates to our disclosures.
Credit Losses As of January 1, 2020, we adopted, through modified retrospective application, ASU No. 2016-13, “Financial
Instruments—Credit Losses (Topic 326): Measurement of Credit Losses on Financial Instruments,” or Accounting Standards
Codification (ASC) 326 (ASC 326), which replaces the incurred loss impairment methodology under prior GAAP with an expected
credit loss model. ASC 326 affects trade receivables, loans, contract assets, certain beneficial interests, off-balance-sheet credit
exposures not accounted for as insurance and other financial assets that are not subject to fair value through net income, as defined
by the standard. Under the expected credit loss model, we are required to consider future economic trends to estimate expected
credit losses over the lifetime of the asset. Upon adoption on January 1, 2020, we recorded a $293 reduction to “Retained
earnings,” $395 increase to “Allowances for credit losses” applicable to our trade and loan receivables, $10 reduction of contract
assets, $105 reduction of net deferred income tax liability and $7 reduction of “Noncontrolling interest.” Our adoption of ASC 326
did not have a material impact on our financial statements.
Supplier Finance Obligations In September 2022, the FASB issued ASU No. 2022-04, “Liabilities – Supplier Finance Programs
(Subtopic 405-50): Disclosure of Supplier Finance Program Obligations” (ASU 2022-04), which establishes interim and annual
reporting disclosure requirements about a company’s supplier finance programs for its purchase of goods and services. Interim and
annual requirements include disclosure of outstanding amounts under the obligations as of the end of the reporting period, and
annual requirements include a rollforward of those obligations for the annual reporting period, as well as a description of payment
and other key terms of the programs. ASU 2022-04 will be effective for interim and annual periods beginning after December 15,
2022, with retrospective application, except for the annual rollforward requirement, which becomes effective for annual periods
beginning after December 15, 2023, with prospective application. The standard allows early adoption of all requirements. In the
year of adoption, the disclosure of payment and other key terms under the programs and outstanding balances under the obligations
will also apply to interim reporting dates. We are in the process of evaluating the impact of our adoption of ASU 2022-04.
Accounting Policies
Income Taxes We record deferred income taxes for temporary differences between the carrying amounts of assets and liabilities for
financial reporting purposes and the computed tax basis of those assets and liabilities. We record valuation allowances against the
deferred tax assets (included, together with our deferred income tax assets, as part of our reportable net1
1
50
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
deferred income tax liabilities on our consolidated balance sheets), for which the realization is uncertain. We review these items
regularly in light of changes in federal, state and foreign tax laws and changes in our business.
As of January 1, 2021, we adopted, with modified retrospective application, the FASB’s ASU No. 2019-12, “Income Taxes (Topic
740): Simplifying the Accounting for Income Taxes” (ASU 2019-12), which simplified income tax accounting requirements in
areas deemed costly and complex. ASU 2019-12 did not have a material impact on our financial statements.
Cash and Cash Equivalents Cash and cash equivalents include all highly liquid investments with original maturities of three
months or less. The carrying amounts approximate fair value. At December 31, 2022, we held $866 in cash and $2,835 in money
market funds and other cash equivalents. Of our total cash and cash equivalents, $1,045 resided in foreign jurisdictions, some of
which is subject to restrictions on repatriation.
Allowance for Credit Losses We record expense to maintain an allowance for credit losses for estimated losses that result from the
failure or inability of our customers to make required payments deemed collectible from the customer when the service was
provided or product was delivered. When determining the allowances for trade receivables and loans, we consider the probability of
recoverability of accounts receivable based on past experience, taking into account current collection trends and general economic
factors, including bankruptcy rates. We also consider future economic trends to estimate expected credit losses over the lifetime of
the asset. Credit risks are assessed based on historical write-offs, net of recoveries, as well as an analysis of the aged accounts
receivable balances with allowances generally increasing as the receivable ages. Accounts receivable may be fully reserved for
when specific collection issues are known to exist, such as catastrophes or pending bankruptcies.
Inventories Inventories primarily consist of wireless devices and accessories and are valued at the lower of cost or net realizable
value.
Property, Plant and Equipment Property, plant and equipment is stated at cost, except for assets acquired using acquisition
accounting, which are initially recorded at fair value (see Note 7). The cost of additions and substantial improvements to property,
plant and equipment is capitalized, and includes internal compensation costs for these projects. The cost of maintenance and repairs
of property, plant and equipment is charged to operating expenses. Property, plant and equipment costs are depreciated using
straight-line methods over their estimated economic lives. Certain subsidiaries follow composite group depreciation methodology.
Accordingly, when a portion of their depreciable property, plant and equipment is retired in the ordinary course of business, the
gross book value is reclassified to accumulated depreciation, and no gain or loss is recognized on the disposition of these assets.
Property, plant and equipment is reviewed for recoverability whenever events or changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying
amount of an asset group may not be recoverable. We recognize an impairment loss when the carrying amount of a long-lived asset
is not recoverable. The carrying amount of a long-lived asset is not recoverable if it exceeds the sum of the undiscounted cash flows
expected to result from the use and eventual disposition of the asset. (See Note 7)
The liability for the fair value of an asset retirement obligation is recorded in the period in which it is incurred if a reasonable
estimate of fair value can be made. In periods subsequent to initial measurement, we recognize period-to-period changes in the
liability resulting from the passage of time and revisions to either the timing or the amount of the original estimate. The increase in
the carrying value of the associated long-lived asset is depreciated over the corresponding estimated economic life.
Software Costs We capitalize certain costs incurred in connection with developing or obtaining internal-use software. Capitalized
software costs are included in “Property, Plant and Equipment – Net” on our consolidated balance sheets. In addition, there is
certain network software that allows the equipment to provide the features and functions unique to the AT&T network, which we
include in the cost of the equipment categories for financial reporting purposes.
We amortize our capitalized software costs over a three-year to seven-year period, reflecting the estimated period during which
these assets will remain in service.
Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets We have the following major classes of intangible assets: goodwill; licenses, which include
Federal Communications Commission (FCC) and other wireless licenses; trademarks and trade names; customer lists; and various
other finite-lived intangible assets (see Note 9).
Goodwill represents the excess of consideration paid over the fair value of identifiable net assets acquired in business
combinations. Wireless licenses provide us with the exclusive right to utilize certain radio frequency spectrum to provide wireless
communications services. While wireless licenses are issued for a fixed period of time (generally ten years), renewals
51
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
of domestic wireless licenses have occurred routinely and at nominal cost. We have determined that there are currently no legal,
regulatory, contractual, competitive, economic or other factors that limit the useful lives of our FCC wireless licenses.
We amortize our wireless licenses in Mexico over their average remaining economic life of 25 years.
We acquired the rights to the AT&T and other trade names in previous acquisitions, classifying certain of those trade names as
indefinite-lived. We have the effective ability to retain these exclusive rights permanently at a nominal cost.
Goodwill, FCC wireless licenses and other indefinite-lived intangible assets are not amortized but are tested at least annually for
impairment (see Note 9). The testing is performed on the value as of October 1 each year and compares the book values of the
assets to their fair values. Goodwill is tested by comparing the carrying amount of each reporting unit, deemed to be our principal
operating segments or one level below them, to the fair value using both discounted cash flow as well as market multiple
approaches. FCC wireless licenses are tested on an aggregate basis, consistent with our use of the licenses on a national scope,
using a discounted cash flow approach. Trade names are tested by comparing their book values to their fair values calculated using
a discounted cash flow approach on a presumed royalty rate derived from the revenues related to each brand name.
Intangible assets that have finite useful lives are amortized over their estimated economic lives (see Note 9). Customer lists and
relationships are amortized using primarily the sum-of-the-months-digits method of amortization over the period in which those
relationships are expected to contribute to our future cash flows. Finite-lived trademarks and trade names are amortized using the
straight-line method over the estimated useful life of the assets. The remaining finite-lived intangible assets are generally amortized
using the straight-line method. These assets, along with other long-lived assets, are reviewed for recoverability whenever events or
changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying amount of an asset group may not be recoverable.
Advertising Costs We expense advertising costs for products and services or for promoting our corporate image as incurred (see
Note 22).
Foreign Currency Translation Our foreign subsidiaries and foreign investments generally report their earnings in their local
currencies. We translate their foreign assets and liabilities at exchange rates in effect at the balance sheet dates. We translate their
revenues and expenses using average rates during the year. The resulting foreign currency translation adjustments are recorded as a
separate component of accumulated OCI in our consolidated balance sheets (see Note 3).
We hedge a portion of the foreign currency exchange risk involved in certain foreign currency-denominated transactions, which we
explain further in our discussion of our methods of managing our foreign currency risk (see Note 12).
Pension and Other Postretirement Benefits See Note 14 for a comprehensive discussion of our pension and postretirement
benefits, including a discussion of the actuarial assumptions, our policy for recognizing the associated gains and losses and our
method used to estimate service and interest cost components.
52
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
NOTE 2. EARNINGS PER SHARE
A reconciliation of the numerators and denominators of basic and diluted earnings per share is shown in the table below:
Year Ended December 31, 2022 2021 2020
Numerators
Numerator for basic earnings per share:
Income (loss) from continuing operations, net of tax $ (6,874)$ 23,776 $ (1,522)
Net income from continuing operations attributable to
noncontrolling interests (1,469) (1,485) (1,470)
Preferred Stock Dividends (203) (207) (193)
Income (loss) from continuing operations attributable to
common stock (8,546) 22,084 (3,185)
Adjustment to carrying value of noncontrolling interest 663 — — 
Numerator for basic earnings per share from continuing operations (7,883) 22,084 (3,185)
Loss from discontinued operations, net of tax (181) (2,297) (2,299)
Loss from discontinued operations attributable
to noncontrolling interests — 87 115 
Loss from discontinued operations
attributable to common stock (181) (2,210) (2,184)
Numerator for basic earnings per share $ (8,064)$ 19,874 $ (5,369)
Dilutive potential common shares:
Mobility preferred interests 526 560 560 
Share-based payment 17 22 23 
Numerator for diluted earnings per share $ (7,521)$ 20,456 $ (4,786)
Denominators (000,000)
Denominator for basic earnings per share:
Weighted average number of common shares outstanding 7,166 7,168 7,157 
Dilutive potential common shares:
Mobility preferred interests (in shares) 378 304 283 
Share-based payment (in shares) 43 31 26 
Denominator for diluted earnings per share 7,587 7,503 7,466 
For 2022, in the calculation of basic earnings per share, income (loss) attributable to common stock for continuing operations and total
company has been increased by $ 663 from adjustment to carrying value of noncontrolling interest. (See Note 16)
For 2022 and 2020, dilutive potential common shares are not included in the computation of diluted earnings per share because their ef fect is
antidilutive as a result of the net loss.
Upon the adoption of ASU 2020-06 in the first quarter of 2022, the ability to settle our Mobility preferred interests in stock is
reflected in our diluted earnings per share calculation, unless the effect is antidilutive. While our intent is to settle the Mobility
preferred interests in cash, the ability to settle this instrument in AT&T shares will result in additional dilutive impact, the
magnitude of which is influenced by the fair value of the Mobility preferred interests and the average AT&T common stock price
during the reporting period, which could vary from period-to-period. The numerator includes an adjustment to add back to income
from continuing operations the earned distributions on the Mobility preferred interests, included in net income attributable to
noncontrolling interest, and the denominator includes the potential issuance of AT&T common stock to settle the Mobility preferred
interests outstanding. (See Notes 1 and 16)1
1
2
2
2
1
2
53
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
NOTE 3. OTHER COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
Changes in the balances of each component included in accumulated OCI are presented below. All amounts are net of tax and
exclude noncontrolling interest.
Foreign
Currency
Translation
AdjustmentNet Unrealized
Gains (Losses) on
Available-for-
Sale
SecuritiesNet Unrealized
Gains (Losses)
on
Derivative
InstrumentsDefined Benefit
Postretirement
PlansAccumulated
Other
Comprehensive
Income
Balance as of December 31, 2019$ (3,056) $ 48 $ (37)$ 8,515$ 5,470 
Other comprehensive income
(loss) before reclassifications (870) 78 (811) 2,250 647 
Amounts reclassified from
accumulated OCI — 1(15)169 2(1,841)3(1,787)
Net other comprehensive
income (loss) (870) 63 (742) 409 (1,140)
Balance as of December 31, 2020 (3,926) 111 (779) 8,924 4,330 
Other comprehensive income
(loss) before reclassifications (125) (63) (715) (34) (937)
Amounts reclassified from
accumulated OCI 2,087 1,4(3)172 2(2,020)3136 
Net other comprehensive
income (loss) 1,962 (66) (643) (2,054) (801)
Balance as of December 31, 2021 (1,964) 45 (1,422) 6,870 3,529 
Other comprehensive income
(loss) before reclassifications 346 (143) (648) 1,787 1,342 
Amounts reclassified from
accumulated OCI — 18 196 2(2,028)3(1,924)
Distribution of WarnerMedia (182) — (24) 25 (181)
Net other comprehensive
income (loss) 164 (135) (576) (216) (763)
Balance as of December 31,
2022 $ (1,800) $ (90)$ (1,998)$ 6,654 $ 2,766 
(Gains) losses are included in “Other income (expense) – net” in the consolidated statements of income.
(Gains) losses are primarily included in “Interest expense” in the consolidated statements of income (see Note 12).
The amortization of prior service credits associated with postretirement benefits is included in “Other income (expense) – net” in the
consolidated statements of income (see Note 14).
Represents unrealized foreign currency translation adjustments at Vrio that were released upon sale. (See Note 6)
NOTE 4. SEGMENT INFORMATION
Our segments are comprised of strategic business units or other operations that offer products and services to different customer
segments over various technology platforms and/or in different geographies that are managed accordingly. We have two reportable
segments: Communications and Latin America.
We also evaluate segment and business unit performance based on EBITDA and/or EBITDA margin, which is defined as operating
income excluding depreciation and amortization. EBITDA is used as part of our management reporting and we believe EBITDA to
be a relevant and useful measurement to our investors as it measures the cash generation potential of our business units. EBITDA
does not give effect to depreciation and amortization expenses incurred in operating income nor is it burdened by cash used for debt
service requirements and thus does not reflect available funds for distributions, reinvestment or other discretionary uses. EBITDA
margin is EBITDA divided by total revenue.1
2
3
4
54
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
In the first quarter of 2022, we reclassified into “Corporate” certain administrative costs borne by AT&T where the business units
do not influence decision making to conform with the current period presentation. This recast increased Corporate operations and
support expenses by approximately $270 and $1,310 for full-year 2021 and 2020, respectively. Correspondingly, this recast lowered
administrative expenses for the Communications segment and Video (our former U.S. video operations contributed to DIRECTV in
July 2021), with no change on a consolidated basis.
The Communications segment provides wireless and wireline telecom and broadband services to consumers located in the U.S.
and businesses globally. Our business strategies reflect bundled product offerings that cut across product lines and utilize shared
assets. This segment contains the following business units:
•Mobility provides nationwide wireless service and equipment.
•Business Wireline provides advanced ethernet-based fiber services, IP Voice and managed professional services, as well as
traditional voice and data services and related equipment to business customers.
•Consumer Wireline provides broadband services, including fiber connections that provide our multi-gig services to residential
customers in select locations. Consumer Wireline also provides legacy telephony voice communication services.
The Latin America segment provides wireless services and equipment in Mexico.
Corporate and Other reconciles our segment results to consolidated operating income and income before income taxes.
Corporate includes:
•DTV-related retained costs, which are costs previously allocated to the Video business that were retained after the transaction,
net of reimbursements from DIRECTV under transition service agreements.
•Parent administration support, which includes costs borne by AT&T where the business units do not influence decision
making.
•Securitization fees associated with our sales of receivables (see Note 17).
•Value portfolio, which are businesses no longer integral to our operations or which we no longer actively market.
Other items consist of:
•Video, which includes our former U.S. video operations that were contributed to DIRECTV on July 31, 2021, and our share of
DIRECTV’s earnings as equity in net income of affiliates (see Note 19).
•Held-for-sale and other reclassifications, which includes our former Crunchyroll, Government Solutions and wireless and
wireline operations in Puerto Rico and the U.S. Virgin Islands.
•Reclassification of prior service credits, which includes the reclassification of prior service credit amortization, where we
present the impact of benefit plan amendments in our business unit results. Prior service credit amortization is presented in
“Other income (expense) – net” in the consolidated statements of income and therefore has no impact on consolidated
operating income or EBITDA.
•Certain significant items, which includes items associated with the merger and integration of acquired or divested businesses,
including amortization of intangible assets, employee separation charges associated with voluntary and/or strategic offers, asset
impairments and abandonments and restructuring, and other items for which the segments are not being evaluated.
•Eliminations and consolidations, removed transactions involving dealings between Mobility and our Video business, prior to
the July 31, 2021 separation of Video.
“Interest expense” and “Other income (expense) – net” are managed only on a total company basis and are, accordingly, reflected
only in consolidated results.
55
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
For the year ended December 31, 2022
RevenuesOperations
and Support
Expenses EBITDADepreciation
and
AmortizationOperating
Income
(Loss)
Communications
Mobility $ 81,780 $ 49,054 $ 32,726 $ 8,198 $ 24,528 
Business Wireline 22,538 13,972 8,566 5,314 3,252 
Consumer Wireline 12,749 8,253 4,496 3,169 1,327 
Total Communications 117,067 71,279 45,788 16,681 29,107 
Latin America - Mexico 3,144 2,812 332 658 (326)
Segment Total 120,211 74,091 46,120 17,339 28,781 
Corporate and Other
Corporate:
DTV-related retained costs 8 737 (729) 549 (1,278)
Parent administration support (32) 1,199 (1,231) 16 (1,247)
Securitization fees 65 419 (354) — (354)
Value portfolio 489 139 350 41 309 
Total Corporate 530 2,494 (1,964) 606 (2,570)
Reclassification of prior service
credits — 2,691 (2,691) — (2,691)
Certain significant items — 28,031 (28,031) 76 (28,107)
Total Corporate and Other 530 33,216 (32,686) 682 (33,368)
AT&T Inc. $ 120,741 $ 107,307 $ 13,434 $ 18,021 $ (4,587)
56
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
For the year ended December 31, 2021
RevenuesOperations
and Support
Expenses EBITDADepreciation
and
AmortizationOperating
Income
(Loss)
Communications
Mobility $ 78,254 $ 46,762 $ 31,492 $ 8,122 $ 23,370 
Business Wireline 23,937 14,718 9,219 5,192 4,027 
Consumer Wireline 12,539 8,448 4,091 3,095 996 
Total Communications 114,730 69,928 44,802 16,409 28,393 
Latin America - Mexico 2,747 2,652 95 605 (510)
Segment Total 117,477 72,580 44,897 17,014 27,883 
Corporate and Other
Corporate:
DTV-related retained costs 49 243 (194) 236 (430)
Parent administration support (18) 1,523 (1,541) 36 (1,577)
Securitization fees 61 89 (28) — (28)
Value portfolio 639 208 431 40 391 
Total Corporate 731 2,063 (1,332) 312 (1,644)
Video 15,513 12,666 2,847 356 2,491 
Held-for-sale and other
reclassifications 453 310 143 — 143 
Reclassification of prior service
credits — 2,680 (2,680) — (2,680)
Certain significant items — 126 (126) 170 (296)
Eliminations and consolidations (136) (136) — — — 
Total Corporate and Other 16,561 17,709 (1,148) 838 (1,986)
AT&T Inc. $ 134,038 $ 90,289 $ 43,749 $ 17,852 $ 25,897 
57
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
For the year ended December 31, 2020
RevenuesOperations
and Support
Expenses EBITDADepreciation
and
AmortizationOperating
Income
(Loss)
Communications
Mobility $ 72,564 $ 41,677 $ 30,887 $ 8,086 $ 22,801 
Business Wireline 25,083 15,068 10,015 5,216 4,799 
Consumer Wireline 12,318 7,942 4,376 2,914 1,462 
Total Communications 109,965 64,687 45,278 16,216 29,062 
Latin America - Mexico 2,562 2,636 (74) 513 (587)
Segment Total 112,527 67,323 45,204 16,729 28,475 
Corporate and Other
Corporate:
Parent administration support (62) 1,681 (1,743) 12 (1,755)
Securitization fees 53 72 (19) — (19)
Value portfolio 775 335 440 64 376 
Total Corporate 766 2,088 (1,322) 76 (1,398)
Video 28,610 24,174 4,436 2,262 2,174 
Held-for-sale and other
reclassifications 1,414 718 696 15 681 
Reclassification of prior service
credits — 2,442 (2,442) — (2,442)
Certain significant items — 15,677 (15,677) 3,441 (19,118)
Eliminations and consolidations (267) (267) — — — 
Total Corporate and Other 30,523 44,832 (14,309) 5,794 (20,103)
AT&T Inc. $ 143,050 $ 112,155 $ 30,895 $ 22,523 $ 8,372 
58
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
The following table is a reconciliation of operating income (loss) to “Income (Loss) from Continuing Operations Before Income
Taxes” reported in our consolidated statements of income:
2022 2021 2020
Communications $ 29,107 $ 28,393 $ 29,062 
Latin America (326) (510) (587)
Segment Operating Income 28,781 27,883 28,475 
Reconciling Items:
Corporate (2,570) (1,644) (1,398)
Video — 2,491 2,174 
Held-for-sale and other reclassifications — 143 681 
Transaction and other costs (425) (41) (1,064)
Amortization of intangibles acquired (76) (170) (3,427)
Asset impairments and abandonments and restructuring (27,498) (213) (15,687)
Gain on spectrum transaction — — 900 
Benefit-related gains (losses) (108) 128 160 
Reclassification of prior service credits (2,691) (2,680) (2,442)
AT&T Operating Income (Loss) (4,587) 25,897 8,372 
Interest Expense 6,108 6,716 7,727 
Equity in net income of affiliates 1,791 603 89 
Other income (expense) – net 5,810 9,387 (1,088)
Income (Loss) from Continuing Operations Before Income Taxes $ (3,094)$ 29,171 $ (354)
Included as a reduction of “Selling, general and administrative” expense in the consolidated statements of income.
The following table sets forth revenues earned from customers, and property, plant and equipment located in different geographic
areas:
2022 2021 2020
RevenuesNet Property,
Plant &
Equipment RevenuesNet Property,
Plant &
Equipment RevenuesNet Property,
Plant &
Equipment
United States $ 116,006 $ 123,305 $ 129,157 $ 117,690 $ 138,188 $ 116,926 
Mexico 3,210 3,718 2,824 3,460 2,651 3,528 
Asia/Pacific Rim 592 124 747 136 816 170 
Europe 584 201 907 249 1,022 347 
Latin America 217 74 251 82 212 94 
Other 132 23 152 32 161 39 
Total $ 120,741 $ 127,445 $ 134,038 $ 121,649 $ 143,050 $ 121,104 1
1
59
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
The following table presents assets, investments in equity affiliates and capital expenditures by segment:
At or for the years ended December
31,2022 2021
AssetsInvestments
in
Equity
Method
InvesteesCapital
Expenditures AssetsInvestments
in
Equity
Method
InvesteesCapital
Expenditures
Communications $471,444 $ — $ 18,962 $448,757 $ — $ 14,691 
Latin America 8,408 — 360 8,874 — 319 
Corporate and eliminations (76,999) 3,533 304 93,991 6,168 535 
Total $402,853 $ 3,533 $ 19,626 $551,622 $ 6,168 $ 15,545 
Includes $ 119,776  of assets from discontinued operations at December 31, 2021.
NOTE 5. REVENUE RECOGNITION
We report our revenues net of sales taxes and record certain regulatory fees, primarily Universal Service Fund (USF) fees, on a net
basis. No customer accounted for more than 10% of consolidated revenues in 2022, 2021 or 2020.
Wireless, Advanced Data, Legacy Voice & Data Services and Equipment Revenue
We offer service-only contracts and contracts that bundle equipment used to access the services and/or with other service offerings.
Some contracts have fixed terms and others are cancellable on a short-term basis (i.e., month-to-month arrangements).
Examples of service revenues include wireless, strategic services (e.g., virtual private network service), and legacy voice and data
(e.g., traditional local and long-distance). These services represent a series of distinct services that is considered a separate
performance obligation. Service revenue is recognized when services are provided, based upon either usage (e.g., minutes of
traffic/bytes of data processed) or period of time (e.g., monthly service fees).
Some of our services require customer premises equipment that, when combined and integrated with AT&T’s specific network
infrastructure, facilitates the delivery of service to the customer. In evaluating whether the equipment is a separate performance
obligation, we consider the customer’s ability to benefit from the equipment on its own or together with other readily available
resources and if so, whether the service and equipment are separately identifiable (i.e., is the service highly dependent on, or highly
interrelated with the equipment). When equipment is a separate performance obligation, we record the sale of equipment when title
has passed and the products are accepted by the customer. For devices sold through indirect channels (e.g., national dealers),
revenue is recognized when the dealer accepts the device, not upon activation.
Our equipment and service revenues are predominantly recognized on a gross basis, as most of our services do not involve a third
party and we typically control the equipment that is sold to our customers.
Revenue recognized from fixed term contracts that bundle services and/or equipment is allocated based on the standalone selling
price of all required performance obligations of the contract (i.e., each item included in the bundle). Promotional discounts are
attributed to each required component of the arrangement, resulting in recognition over the contract term. Standalone selling prices
are determined by assessing prices paid for service-only contracts (e.g., arrangements where customers bring their own devices)
and standalone device pricing.
We offer the majority of our customers the option to purchase certain wireless devices in installments over a specified period of
time, and, in many cases, they may be eligible to trade in the original equipment for a new device and have the remaining unpaid
balance paid or settled. For customers that elect these equipment installment payment programs, at the point of sale, we recognize
revenue for the entire amount of revenue allocated to the customer receivable net of fair value of the trade-in right guarantee. The
difference between the revenue recognized and the consideration received is recorded as a note receivable when the devices are not
discounted and our right to consideration is unconditional. When installment sales include promotional discounts (e.g., “buy one
get one free” or equipment discounts with trade-in of a device), the difference between revenue recognized and consideration
received is recorded as a contract asset to be amortized over the contract term.
Less commonly, we offer certain customers highly discounted devices when they enter into a minimum service agreement term. For
these contracts, we recognize equipment revenue at the point of sale based on a standalone selling price allocation. The1
1
60
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
difference between the revenue recognized and the cash received is recorded as a contract asset that will amortize over the contract
term.
Our contracts allow for customers to frequently modify their arrangement, without incurring penalties in many cases. When a
contract is modified, we evaluate the change in scope or price of the contract to determine if the modification should be treated as a
new contract or if it should be considered a change of the existing contract. We generally do not have significant impacts from
contract modifications.
Revenues from transactions between us and our customers are recorded net of revenue-based regulatory fees and taxes. Cash
incentives given to customers are recorded as a reduction of revenue. Nonrefundable, upfront service activation and setup fees
associated with service arrangements are deferred and recognized over the associated service contract period or customer
relationship life.
Revenue Categories
The following tables set forth reported revenue by category and by business unit:
For the year ended December 31, 2022
 Communications  
 MobilityBusiness
WirelineConsumer
WirelineLatin
AmericaCorporate &
Other Elim. Total
Wireless service $60,499 $ — $ — $2,162 $ 13 $ — $ 62,674 
Business service — 21,891 — — — — 21,891 
Broadband — — 9,669 — — — 9,669 
Legacy voice and data — — 1,746 — 323 — 2,069 
Other — — 1,334 — 194 — 1,528 
Total Service 60,499 21,891 12,749 2,162 530 — 97,831 
Equipment 21,281 647 — 982 — — 22,910 
Total $81,780 $22,538 $ 12,749 $3,144 $ 530 $ — $120,741 
For the year ended December 31, 2021
Communications
MobilityBusiness
WirelineConsumer
WirelineLatin
AmericaCorporate
& Other Elim. Total
Wireless service $57,590 $ — $ — $1,834 $ 74 $ — $ 59,498 
Video service — — — — 15,423 — 15,423 
Business service — 23,224 — — 70 — 23,294 
Broadband — — 9,085 — — — 9,085 
Legacy voice and data — — 1,977 — 429 — 2,406 
Other — — 1,384 — 611 (136) 1,859 
Total Service 57,590 23,224 12,446 1,834 16,607 (136) 111,565 
Equipment 20,664 713 93 913 90 — 22,473 
Total $78,254 $23,937 $ 12,539 $2,747 $ 16,697 $(136)$134,038 
61
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
For the year ended December 31, 2020
Communications
MobilityBusiness
WirelineConsumer
WirelineLatin
AmericaCorporate
& Other Elim. Total
Wireless service $55,542 $ — $ — $1,656 $ 528 $ — $ 57,726 
Video service — — — — 28,465 — 28,465 
Business service — 24,313 — — 314 — 24,627 
Broadband — — 8,534 — — — 8,534 
Legacy voice and data — — 2,213 — 554 — 2,767 
Other — — 1,564 — 641 (267) 1,938 
Total Service 55,542 24,313 12,311 1,656 30,502 (267) 124,057 
Equipment 17,022 770 7 906 288 — 18,993 
Total $72,564 $25,083 $ 12,318 $2,562 $ 30,790 $(267)$143,050 
Deferred Customer Contract Acquisition and Fulfillment Costs
Costs to acquire and fulfill customer contracts, including commissions on service activations, for our Mobility, Business Wireline
and Consumer Wireline services, are deferred and amortized over the contract period or expected customer relationship life, which
typically ranges from three years to five years.
During the first quarter of 2022, we updated our analysis of expected economic lives of customer relationships. As of January 1,
2022, we extended the amortization period for deferred acquisition and fulfillment contract costs within Mobility, Consumer
Wireline and Business Wireline to better reflect the estimated economic lives of the relationships. These changes in accounting
estimate decreased other cost of revenues approximately $395, or $0.04 per diluted share from continuing operations for the year
ended December 31, 2022.
The following table presents the deferred customer contract acquisition and fulfillment costs included on our consolidated balance
sheets at December 31:
Consolidated Balance Sheets 2022 2021
Deferred Acquisition Costs
Prepaid and other current assets $ 2,893 $ 2,551 
Other Assets 3,913 3,247 
Total deferred customer contract acquisition costs $ 6,806 $ 5,798 
Deferred Fulfillment Costs
Prepaid and other current assets $ 2,481 $ 2,600 
Other Assets 4,206 4,148 
Total deferred customer contract fulfillment costs $ 6,687 $ 6,748 
The following table presents deferred customer contract acquisition and fulfillment cost amortization included in “Other cost of
revenue” for the years ended December 31:
Consolidated Statements of Income 2022 2021
Deferred acquisition cost amortization $ 2,935 $ 2,965 
Deferred fulfillment cost amortization 2,688 4,014 
Includes deferred acquisition amortization of $ 409 and deferred fulfillment cost amortization of $ 1,162  from our separated Video business
for the year ended December 31, 2021.
Contract Assets and Liabilities
A contract asset is recorded when revenue is recognized in advance of our right to bill and receive consideration. The contract asset
will decrease as services are provided and billed. For example, when installment sales include promotional discounts (e.g., “buy
one get one free”) the difference between revenue recognized and consideration received is recorded as a contract asset to be
amortized over the contract term.1
1
62
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Our contract assets primarily relate to our wireless businesses. Promotional equipment sales where we offer handset credits, which
are allocated between equipment and service in proportion to their standalone selling prices, when customers commit to a specified
service period result in additional contract assets recognized. These contract assets will amortize over the service contract period,
resulting in lower future service revenue.
When consideration is received in advance of the delivery of goods or services, a contract liability is recorded. Reductions in the
contract liability will be recorded as we satisfy the performance obligations.
The following table presents contract assets and liabilities on our consolidated balance sheets at December 31:
Consolidated Balance Sheets 2022 2021
Contract asset $ 5,512 $ 4,389 
   Current portion in “Prepaid and other current assets” 2,941 2,582
Contract liability 4,170 4,133
   Current portion in “Advanced billings and customer deposits” 3,816 3,776
Our contract asset balance in 2022 reflects increased promotional equipment sales in our wireless business. We expect the
amortization of these promotional costs to flatten in 2023.
Our beginning of period contract liabilities recorded as customer contract revenue during 2022 was $3,795.
Remaining Performance Obligations
Remaining performance obligations represent services we are required to provide to customers under bundled or discounted
arrangements, which are satisfied as services are provided over the contract term. In determining the transaction price allocated, we
do not include non-recurring charges and estimates for usage, nor do we consider arrangements with an original expected duration
of less than one year, which are primarily prepaid wireless and residential internet agreements.
Remaining performance obligations associated with business contracts reflect recurring charges billed, adjusted to reflect estimates
for sales incentives and revenue adjustments. Performance obligations associated with wireless contracts are estimated using a
portfolio approach in which we review all relevant promotional activities, calculating the remaining performance obligation using
the average service component for the portfolio and the average device price. As of December 31, 2022, the aggregate amount of
the transaction price allocated to remaining performance obligations was $35,800, of which we expect to recognize
approximately 76% by the end of 2024, with the balance recognized thereafter.
NOTE 6. ACQUISITIONS, DISPOSITIONS AND OTHER ADJUSTMENTS
Acquisitions
Spectrum Auctions On January 14, 2022, the Federal Communications Commission (FCC) announced that we were the winning
bidder for 1,624 3.45 GHz licenses in Auction 110. We provided the FCC an upfront deposit of $123 in the third quarter of 2021
and paid the remaining $8,956 in the first quarter of 2022, for a total of $9,079. We funded the purchase price using cash and short-
term investments. We received the licenses in May 2022 and classified the auction deposits and related capitalized interest as
“Licenses – Net” on our December 31, 2022 consolidated balance sheet.
In February 2021, the FCC announced that AT&T was the winning bidder for 1,621 C-Band licenses, comprised of a total of 80
MHz nationwide, including 40 MHz in Phase I. We provided to the FCC an upfront deposit of $550 in 2020 and cash payments
totaling $22,856 in the first quarter of 2021, for a total of $23,406. We received the licenses in July 2021 and classified the auction
deposits, related capitalized interest and billed relocation costs as “Licenses – Net” on our December 31, 2021 consolidated balance
sheet. In December 2021, we paid $955 of Incentive Payments upon clearing of Phase I spectrum and estimate that we will pay
$2,112 upon clearing of Phase II spectrum, expected by the end of 2023. Additionally, we are responsible for approximately $1,100
of compensable relocation costs over the next several years as the spectrum is being cleared by satellite operators, of which we paid
$650 in the fourth quarter of 2021 and $98 in the third quarter of 2022. Funding for the purchase price of the spectrum included a
combination of cash on hand and short-term investments, as well as short- and long-term debt.
63
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Cash paid, including spectrum deposits (net of refunds), capitalized interest, and any payments for incentive and relocation costs
are included in “Acquisitions, net of cash acquired” on our consolidated statements of cash flows. Interest is capitalized until the
spectrum is ready for its intended use.
In June 2020, we completed the acquisition of $2,379 of 37/39 GHz spectrum in an FCC auction. Prior to the auction, we
exchanged the 39 GHz licenses with a book value of approximately $300 that were previously acquired through FiberTower
Corporation for vouchers to be applied against the winning bids and recorded a $900 gain in the first quarter of 2020. These
vouchers yielded a value of approximately $1,200, which was applied toward our gross bids. In the second quarter of 2020, we
made the final cash payment of $949, bringing the total cash payment to $1,186.
Dispositions
Video Business On July 31, 2021, we closed our transaction with TPG to form a new company named DIRECTV, which is jointly
governed by a board with representation from both AT&T and TPG, with TPG having tie-breaking authority on certain key
decisions, most significantly the appointment and removal of the CEO.
In connection with the transaction, we contributed our U.S. Video business unit to DIRECTV for $4,250 of junior preferred units,
an additional distribution preference of $4,200 and a 70% economic interest in common units (collectively “equity
considerations”). TPG contributed approximately $1,800 in cash to DIRECTV for $1,800 of senior preferred units and a 30%
economic interest in common units. See Note 10 for additional information on our accounting for our investment in DIRECTV.
Upon close of the transaction in the third quarter of 2021, we received approximately $7,170 in cash from DIRECTV ($7,600, net
of $430 cash on hand) and transferred $195 of DIRECTV debt. Approximately $1,800 of the cash received is reported as cash
received from financing activities in our consolidated statement of cash flows, as it relates to a note payable to DIRECTV, for
which payment is tied to our agreement to cover net losses under the remaining term of the NFL SUNDAY TICKET contract up to
a cap of $2,100 over the remaining period of the contract (see Note 19). The remainder of the net proceeds is reported as cash from
investing activities. This transaction did not result in a material gain or loss.
In the first quarter of 2021, we applied held-for-sale accounting treatment to the assets and liabilities of the U.S. video business,
and, accordingly, included the assets in “Prepaid and other current assets,” and the related liabilities in “Accounts payable and
accrued liabilities,” on our consolidated balance sheet, up until the close of the transaction. The held-for-sale classification also
resulted in ceasing depreciation and amortization on the designated assets.
The assets and liabilities of the Video operations, transferred to DIRECTV upon close of the transaction, were as follows:
   Current assets $ 4,893 
   Property, plant and equipment – net 2,673 
   Licenses – net 5,798 
   Other intangible assets – net 1,634 
   Other assets 1,787 
Total Video assets $ 16,785 
   Current liabilities $ 4,267 
   Long-term debt 206 
   Other noncurrent liabilities 343 
Total Video liabilities $ 4,816 
Central European Media Enterprises Ltd. (CME) On October 13, 2020, we completed the sale of our 65.3% interest in CME, a
European broadcasting company, for approximately $1,100. This disposition did not result in a material gain or loss.
Operations in Puerto Rico On October 31, 2020, we completed the sale of our wireless and wireline operations in Puerto Rico and
the U.S. Virgin Islands for approximately $1,950 and recorded a pre-tax loss of $82. The proceeds were used to redeem $1,950 of
cumulative preferred interests in a subsidiary that held notes secured by the proceeds of this sale.
64
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Dispositions Reflected as Discontinued Operations
WarnerMedia On April 8, 2022, we completed the separation and distribution of our WarnerMedia business, and merger of
Spinco, an AT&T subsidiary formed to hold the WarnerMedia business, with a subsidiary of Discovery, Inc., which was renamed
Warner Bros. Discovery, Inc (WBD). Each AT&T shareholder was entitled to receive 0.241917 shares of WBD common stock for
each share of AT&T common stock held as of the record date, which represented approximately 71% of WBD. In connection with
and in accordance with the terms of the Separation and Distribution Agreement (SDA), prior to the distribution and merger, AT&T
received approximately $40,400, which includes $38,800 of Spinco cash and $1,600 of debt retained by WarnerMedia. During the
second quarter of 2022, assets of approximately $121,100 and liabilities of $70,600 were removed from our balance sheet as well
as $45,041 of retained earnings and $5,632 of additional paid-in capital associated with the transaction. Additionally, in August
2022, we and WBD finalized the post-closing adjustment, pursuant to Section 1.3 of the SDA, which resulted in a $1,200 payment
to WBD in the third quarter of 2022 and was reflected in the balance sheet as an adjustment to additional paid-in capital. (See Note
23)
AT&T, Spinco and Discovery entered into a Tax Matters Agreement, which governs the parties’ rights, responsibilities and
obligations with respect to tax liabilities and benefits, the preservation of the expected tax-free status of the transactions
contemplated by the SDA, and other matters regarding taxes.
Xandr On June 6, 2022, we completed the sale of the marketplace component of Xandr to Microsoft Corporation. Xandr was
reflected in our historical financial statements as discontinued operations.
Vrio On November 15, 2021, we completed the sale of our Latin America video operations, Vrio, to Grupo Werthein and recorded a
note receivable of $610 to be paid over four years, of which $300 is in the form of seller financing and the remainder is related to
working capital adjustments. In the second quarter of 2021, we classified the Vrio disposal group as held-for-sale and reported the
disposal group at fair value less cost to sell, which resulted in a noncash, pre-tax impairment charge of $4,555, including
approximately $2,100 related to accumulated foreign currency translation adjustments and $2,500 related to property, plant and
equipment and intangible assets. Approximately $80 of the impairment was attributable to noncontrolling interest. The assets and
liabilities removed from our consolidated balance sheet included $851 of Vrio held-for-sale assets primarily related to deferred
customer contract acquisition and fulfillment costs, prepaids and other deferred charges, and $2,872 of related liabilities primarily
for reserves associated with accumulated foreign currency translation adjustments, which reversed against accumulated other
comprehensive income upon close of the transaction. This disposition did not result in a net material gain or loss.
Otter Media During the third quarter of 2021, we disposed of substantially all of the assets of Otter Media. We received
approximately $1,540 in cash and removed approximately $1,200 of goodwill associated with these assets. The dispositions did not
result in a material gain or loss.
Playdemic Ltd. On September 20, 2021, we sold WarnerMedia’s mobile games app studio, Playdemic for approximately $1,370 in
cash and recognized a pre-tax gain of $706 in “Other income (expense) – net,” on our consolidated statement of income.
Approximately $600 of goodwill was removed related to this business.
65
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
NOTE 7. PROPERTY, PLANT AND EQUIPMENT
Property, plant and equipment is summarized as follows at December 31:
Lives (years) 2022 2021
Land - $ 1,381 $ 1,401 
Buildings and improvements 2-44 38,751 38,204 
Central office equipment 3-10 98,468 97,070 
Cable, wiring and conduit 15-50 84,447 79,961 
Satellites 14-17 103 103 
Other equipment 3-20 81,658 85,929 
Software 3-7 17,640 16,520 
Under construction - 7,182 5,425 
329,630 324,613 
Accumulated depreciation and amortization 202,185 202,964 
Property, plant and equipment – net $ 127,445 $ 121,649 
Includes certain network software.
Our depreciation expense was $17,852 in 2022, $17,634 in 2021, and $19,028 in 2020. Depreciation expense included amortization
of software totaling $2,972 in 2022, $2,909 in 2021 and $3,343 in 2020.
In December 2022, we recorded a noncash pre-tax charge of $1,413 to abandon conduits that will not be utilized to support future
network activity. The abandonment was considered outside the ordinary course of business.
During the first quarter of 2022, we updated our analysis of economic lives of AT&T owned fiber network assets. As of January 1,
2022, we extended the estimated economic life and depreciation period of such costs to better reflect the physical life of the assets
that we had been experiencing and absence of technological changes that would replace fiber as the best broadband technology in
the industry. The change in accounting estimate decreased depreciation expense $280, or $0.03 per diluted share from continuing
operations for the year ended December 31, 2022.
In December 2020, we reassessed our grouping of long-lived assets and identified certain impairment indicators, requiring us to
evaluate the recoverability of the long-lived assets of our former Video business. Based on this evaluation, we determined that these
assets were not fully recoverable and recognized pre-tax impairment charges totaling $7,255, of which $1,681 related to property,
plant and equipment, including satellites. The reduced carrying amounts of the impaired assets became their new cost basis.
NOTE 8. LEASES
We have operating and finance leases for certain facilities and equipment used in our operations. Our leases generally have
remaining lease terms of up to 15 years. Some of our real estate operating leases contain renewal options that may be exercised, and
some of our leases include options to terminate the leases within one year.
We have recognized a right-of-use asset for both operating and finance leases, and a corresponding lease liability that represents the
present value of our obligation to make payments over the lease term. The present value of the lease payments is calculated using
the incremental borrowing rate for operating and finance leases, which was determined using a portfolio approach based on the rate
of interest that we would have to pay to borrow an amount equal to the lease payments on a collateralized basis over a similar term.
We use the unsecured borrowing rate and risk-adjust that rate to approximate a collateralized rate in the currency of the lease,
which will be updated on a quarterly basis for measurement of new lease liabilities.1
1  
66
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
The components of lease expense were as follows:
2022 2021 2020
Operating lease cost $ 5,437$ 5,363$ 5,331
Finance lease cost:
Amortization of right-of-use assets $ 204$ 179$ 185
Interest on lease obligation 159 145 133
Total finance lease cost $ 363$ 324$ 318
The following table provides supplemental cash flows information related to leases:
2022 2021 2020
Cash Flows from Operating Activities
Cash paid for amounts included in lease obligations:
Operating cash flows from operating leases $ 4,679$ 4,580$ 4,496
Supplemental Lease Cash Flow Disclosures
Operating lease right-of-use assets obtained in exchange for
    new operating lease obligations 3,751 3,396 4,057
The following tables set forth supplemental balance sheet information related to leases at December 31:
2022 2021
Operating Leases
Operating lease right-of-use assets $ 21,814 $ 21,824 
Accounts payable and accrued liabilities $ 3,547 $ 3,393 
Operating lease obligation 18,659 18,956 
Total operating lease obligation $ 22,206 $ 22,349 
Finance Leases
Property, plant and equipment, at cost $ 2,770 $ 2,494 
Accumulated depreciation and amortization (1,224) (1,053)
Property, plant and equipment – net $ 1,546 $ 1,441 
Current portion of long-term debt $ 170 $ 127 
Long-term debt 1,647 1,442 
Total finance lease obligation $ 1,817 $ 1,569 
2022 2021
Weighted-Average Remaining Lease Term (years)
Operating leases 8.1 8.2
Finance leases 7.9 8.9
Weighted-Average Discount Rate
Operating leases 3.7 % 3.7 %
Finance leases 8.0 % 8.2 %
67
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
The following table provides the expected future minimum maturities of lease obligations:
At December 31, 2022Operating
LeasesFinance
Leases
2023 $ 4,657 $ 315 
2024 4,203 306 
2025 3,543 315 
2026 2,830 291 
2027 2,302 290 
Thereafter 8,933 1,032 
Total lease payments 26,468 2,549 
Less: imputed interest (4,262) (732)
Total $ 22,206 $ 1,817 
NOTE 9. GOODWILL AND OTHER INTANGIBLE ASSETS
We test goodwill for impairment at a reporting unit level, which is deemed to be our principal operating segments or one level
below. With our annual impairment testing as of October 1, 2022, the calculated fair value of the Mobility reporting unit exceeded
its book value; we recorded noncash impairment charges of $13,478 in our Business Wireline reporting unit, $10,508 in our
Consumer Wireline reporting unit and $826 in our Mexico reporting unit. The decline in fair values was primarily due to changes in
the macroeconomic environment, namely increased weighted-average cost of capital. Also, inflation pressure and lower projected
cash flows driven by secular declines, predominantly at Business Wireline, impacted the fair values. A combination of discounted
cash flow and market multiple approaches was used to determine the fair values. In the Communications segment, if all other
assumptions were to remain unchanged, we expect the impairment charge would increase by approximately $3,400 if the weighted
average cost of capital increased by 25 basis points, or $2,100 if the projected terminal growth rate declined by 25 basis points, or
$2,800 if the projected long-term EBITDA margin declined 100 basis points.
Changes to our goodwill in 2022 primarily resulted from noncash impairments. Changes to our goodwill in 2021 primarily resulted
from the sale of our Government Solutions business.
At December 31, 2022, our Communications segment has three reporting units: Mobility, Business Wireline and Consumer
Wireline. The reporting unit is deemed to be the operating segment for Latin America.
The following table sets forth the changes in the carrying amounts of goodwill by operating segment:
2022 2021
Balance at
Jan. 1 ImpairmentsDispositions,
currency
exchange
and otherBalance at
Dec. 31Balance at
Jan. 1Dispositions,
currency
exchange
and otherBalance at
Dec. 31
Communications
Goodwill $ 91,924 $ — $ (43)$ 91,881 $ 91,976 $ (52)$ 91,924 
Impairments — (23,986) — (23,986) — — — 
Net goodwill 91,924 (23,986) (43) 67,895 91,976 (52) 91,924 
Latin America 816 (826) 10 — 836 (20) 816 
Total $ 92,740 $ (24,812)$ (33)$ 67,895 $ 92,812 $ (72)$ 92,740 
We review amortizing intangible assets for impairment whenever events or circumstances indicate that the carrying amount may
not be recoverable over the remaining life of the asset or asset group.
Indefinite-lived wireless licenses increased in 2022 primarily due to recent auction activity and $1,120 of capitalized interest (see
Note 6).
In 2021, as a result of the separation of our U.S. video business (see Note 6), we removed $5,798 of orbital slot licenses and $1,585
of customer lists that were transferred to DIRECTV. Indefinite-lived wireless licenses increased in 2021 primarily due to auction
activity, compensable relocation and incentive payments, and capitalized interest (see Notes 6 and 22).
68
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Our other intangible assets at December 31 are summarized as follows:
2022 2021
Other Intangible AssetsWeighted-
Average
LifeGross
Carrying
AmountAccumulated
AmortizationCurrency
Translation
AdjustmentGross
Carrying
AmountAccumulated
AmortizationCurrency
Translation
Adjustment
Amortized intangible assets:
Wireless licenses 21.6 years$ 3,045 $ 425 $ (297)$ 3,083 $ 307 $ (440)
Trademarks and trade
names15.0 years 26 
11 (6) 27 11 (7)
Customer lists and
relationships12.6 years 413 
304 (75) 577 429 (98)
Other 8.5 years 304 234 — 349 258 — 
Total 21.1 years$ 3,788 $ 974 $ (378)$ 4,036 $ 1,005 $ (545)
Indefinite-lived intangible assets not subject to amortization:
Wireless licenses $121,769 $ 111,494 
Trade names 5,241 5,241 
Total $127,010 $116,735 
Amortized intangible assets are definite-life assets, and, as such, we record amortization expense based on a method that most
appropriately reflects our expected cash flows from these assets. Amortization expense for definite-life intangible assets was $169
for the year ended December 31, 2022, $218 for the year ended December 31, 2021 (reflecting the separation of our U.S. video
business) and $3,495 for the year ended December 31, 2020. Estimated amortization expense for the next five years is: $161 for
2023, $154 for 2024, $142 for 2025, $142 for 2026 and $142 for 2027.
69
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
NOTE 10. EQUITY METHOD INVESTMENTS
Investments in partnerships, joint ventures and less than majority-owned subsidiaries in which we have significant influence are
accounted for under the equity method.
On July 31, 2021, we closed our transaction with TPG to form a new company named DIRECTV (see Note 6). The transaction
resulted in our deconsolidation of the Video business, with DIRECTV being accounted for under the equity method beginning
August 1, 2021.
Our investments in equity affiliates at December 31, 2022 primarily included our interests in DIRECTV and SKY Mexico.
DIRECTV We account for our investment in DIRECTV under the equity method of accounting. DIRECTV is considered a
variable interest entity for accounting purposes. As DIRECTV is jointly governed by a board with representation from both AT&T
and TPG, with TPG having tie-breaking authority on certain key decisions, most significantly the appointment and removal of the
CEO, we have concluded that we are not the primary beneficiary of DIRECTV.
The ownership interests in DIRECTV, based on seniority are as follows:
•Preferred units with distribution rights of $1,800 held by TPG, which were fully distributed in 2021.
•Junior preferred units with distribution rights of $4,250 held by AT&T, of which $702 of distribution rights remain as of
December 31, 2022.
•Distribution preference associated with Common units of $4,200 held by AT&T.
•Common units, with 70% held by AT&T and 30% held by TPG.
The initial fair value of the equity considerations on July 31, 2021 was $6,852, which was determined using a discounted cash flow
model reflecting distribution rights and preference of the individual instruments. During 2022 and 2021, we recognized $1,808 and
$619 of equity in net income of affiliates and received total distributions of $4,457 and $1,942, respectively, from DIRECTV. The
book value of our investment in DIRECTV was $2,911 and $5,539 at December 31, 2022 and 2021.
Our share of net income or loss may differ from the stated ownership percentage interest of DIRECTV as the terms of the
arrangement prescribe substantive non-proportionate cash distributions, both from operations and in liquidation, that are based on
classes of interests held by investors. In the event that DIRECTV records a loss, that loss will be allocated to ownership interests
based on their seniority, beginning with the most subordinated interests.
SKY Mexico We hold a 41.3% interest in SKY Mexico, which is a leading pay-TV provider in Mexico.
The following table presents summarized financial information for DIRECTV and our other equity method investments, consisting
primarily of SKY Mexico and certain sports-related programming investments, at December 31, or for the year then ended:
2022 2021 2020
Income Statements
Operating revenues $ 25,794 $ 12,220 $ 1,282 
Operating income 3,175 1,179 157 
Net income 2,581 938 91 
Balance Sheets
Current assets 4,240 5,295 
Noncurrent assets 14,211 17,022 
Current liabilities 6,681 7,191 
Noncurrent liabilities 7,951 8,614 
Does not include DIRECTV  for periods prior to August 1, 2021.1
1
70
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
The following table is a reconciliation of our investments in equity affiliates as presented on our consolidated balance sheets:
2022 2021
Beginning of year $ 6,168 $ 742 
Additional investments 3 — 
Receipt of equity interest in DIRECTV — 6,852 
Distributions from DIRECTV in excess of cumulative equity in earnings (2,649) (1,323)
Other capital distributions — (6)
Dividends and distributions of cumulative earnings received (1,815) (701)
Equity in net income of affiliates 1,791 603 
Currency translation adjustments 25 (14)
Other adjustments 10 15 
End of year $ 3,533 $ 6,168 
NOTE 11. DEBT
Long-term debt of AT&T and its subsidiaries, including interest rates and maturities, is summarized as follows at December 31:
2022 2021
Notes and debentures
Interest Rates Maturities
0.00% -2.99% 2022 - 2039 $ 24,603 $ 31,612 
3.00% -4.99% 2022 - 2061 91,201 107,635 
5.00% -6.99% 2022 - 2095 20,083 23,023 
7.00% -12.00% 2022 - 2097 4,884 5,056 
Credit agreement borrowings 2,500 10,400 
Fair value of interest rate swaps recorded in debt 13 16 
143,284 177,742 
Unamortized (discount) premium – net (9,650) (9,758)
Unamortized issuance costs (427) (508)
Total notes and debentures 133,207 167,476 
Finance lease obligations 1,817 1,569 
Total long-term debt, including current maturities 135,024 169,045 
Current maturities of long-term debt (6,601) (7,934)
Current maturities of credit agreement borrowings — (10,100)
Total long-term debt $ 128,423 $ 151,011 
Foreign debt includes the impact from hedges, when applicable.
We had outstanding Euro, British pound sterling, Canadian dollar, Mexican peso, Australian dollar, and Swiss franc denominated
debt of approximately $35,525 and $41,063 at December 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively.
The weighted-average interest rate of our long-term debt portfolio, including credit agreement borrowings and the impact of
derivatives, was approximately 4.1% as of December 31, 2022 and 3.8% as of December 31, 2021.
Debt maturing within one year consisted of the following at December 31:
2022 2021
Current maturities of long-term debt $ 6,601 $ 7,934 
Commercial paper 866 6,586 
Credit agreement borrowings — 10,100 
Total $ 7,467 $ 24,620 1
1
71
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Financing Activities
During 2022, we received net proceeds of $479 on the issuance of $479 in long-term debt and proceeds of $3,250 on the issuance
of credit agreement borrowings in various markets, with an average weighted maturity of approximately 2.0 years and a weighted
average interest rate of 5.2%. We repaid $34,835 of long-term debt and credit agreement borrowings with a weighted average
interest rate of 3.1%. Our debt activity during 2022 primarily consisted of the following:
First
QuarterSecond
QuarterThird
QuarterFourth
QuarterFull Year
2022
Net commercial paper borrowings $ 1,471 $ (5,219)$ (724)$ (1,337)$ (5,809)
Issuance of Notes and Debentures:
Private Financing $ — $ — $ 750 $ — $ 750 
2025 Term Loan — — — 2,500 2,500 
Other 479 — — — 479 
Debt Issuances $ 479 $ — $ 750 $ 2,500 $ 3,729 
Repayments:
2021 Syndicated Term Loan $ — $ (7,350)$ — $ — $ (7,350)
BAML Bilateral Term Loan – Tranche A — (1,000) — — (1,000)
Private financing — (750) — (750) (1,500)
Repayment of other short-term borrowings $ — $ (9,100)$ — $ (750)$ (9,850)
USD notes $ (123)$(18,957)$ — $ (287)$(19,367)
Euro notes — (3,343) — — (3,343)
BAML Bilateral Term Loan – Tranche B — (1,000) — — (1,000)
Other (667) (123) (199) (419) (1,408)
Repayments of long-term debt $ (790)$(23,423)$ (199)$ (706)$(25,118)
On April 1 1, 2022, we issued notices for the redemption in full of all of the outstanding approximately $ 9,042  aggregate principal amount of
various global notes due 2022 to 2026 with coupon rates ranging from 2.625 % to 4.450 % (Make-Whole Notes). The Make-Whole Notes
were redeemed on the redemption dates set forth in the notices of redemption, at “make whole” redemption prices calculated as set forth in
the respective redemption notices in the second quarter .
Includes $ 7,954  of cash paid toward the $ 8,822  aggregate principal amount of various notes that were tendered for cash in May 2022. The
notes had interest rates ranging between 3.100 % and 8.750 % and original maturities ranging from 2026 to 2061.
Includes $ 287 of principal repayment on a $ 592 zero coupon note that matured in November 2022. The other $ 305 was applied to operating
cash flows related to interest expense that accreted to the note over its life.
As of December 31, 2022 and 2021, we were in compliance with all covenants and conditions of instruments governing our debt.
Substantially all of our outstanding long-term debt is unsecured. Maturities of outstanding long-term notes and debentures, as of
December 31, 2022, and the corresponding weighted-average interest rate scheduled for repayment are as follows:
2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 Thereafter
Debt repayments $ 6,929 $ 8,950 $ 5,948 $ 8,619 $ 6,278 $110,949 
Weighted-average interest rate 3.7 % 4.1 % 5.5 % 3.1 % 3.7 % 4.2 %
Debt repayments represent maturity value. Foreign debt includes the impact from hedges, when applicable. Includes credit agreement
borrowings.
Includes credit agreement borrowings.
Credit Facilities
General
On January 29, 2021, we entered into a $14,700 Term Loan Credit Agreement (2021 Syndicated Term Loan), with Bank of
America, N.A., as agent. On March 23, 2021, we borrowed $7,350 under the 2021 Syndicated Term Loan and the remaining $7,350
of lenders’ commitments was terminated. In the first quarter of 2022, the maturity date of the 2021 Syndicated Term Loan was
extended to December 31, 2022. On April 13, 2022, the 2021 Syndicated Term Loan was paid off and terminated.1,2,3
1
2
3
1
 2
1
2
72
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
In March 2021, we entered into and drew on a $2,000 term loan credit agreement (BAML Bilateral Term Loan) consisting of (i) a
$1,000 facility originally due December 31, 2021 (BAML Tranche A Facility) and subsequently extended to December 31, 2022 in
the fourth quarter of 2021, and (ii) a $1,000 facility due December 31, 2022 (BAML Tranche B Facility), with Bank of America,
N.A., as agent. On April 13, 2022, the BAML Bilateral Term Loan was paid off and terminated.
In November 2022, we entered into and drew on a $2,500 term loan agreement due February 16, 2025 (2025 Term Loan), with
Mizuho Bank, Ltd., as agent. As of December 31, 2022, $2,500 was outstanding under this agreement.
Revolving Credit Agreements
In November 2022, we terminated one of our revolving credit agreements and amended and restated the other. We currently have
one $12,000 revolving credit agreement that terminates on November 18, 2027 (Revolving Credit Agreement). No amounts were
outstanding as of December 31, 2022.
Each of our credit and loan agreements contains covenants that are customary for an issuer with an investment grade senior debt
credit rating. Our Revolving Credit Agreement and 2025 Term Loan include a net debt-to-EBITDA financial ratio covenant
requiring AT&T to maintain, as of the last day of each fiscal quarter, a ratio of not more than 3.75-to-1. Other loan agreements
include a net debt-to-EBITDA financial ratio covenant requiring AT&T to maintain, as of the last day of each fiscal quarter through
June 30, 2023 a ratio of not more than 4.0-to-1, and a ratio of not more than 3.5-to-1 for any fiscal quarter thereafter.
The events of default are customary for agreements of this type and such events would result in the acceleration of, or would permit
the lenders to accelerate, as applicable, required payments and would increase each agreement’s relevant Applicable Margin by
2.00% per annum.
The obligations of the lenders under the Revolving Credit Agreement to provide advances will terminate on November 18, 2027,
unless the commitments are terminated in whole prior to that date. All advances must be repaid no later than the date on which
lenders are no longer obligated to make any advances under the Revolving Credit Agreement.
The Revolving Credit Agreement provides that we and lenders representing more than 50% of the facility amount may agree to
extend their commitments under the credit agreement for two one-year periods beyond the initial termination date. We have the
right to terminate, in whole or in part, amounts committed by the lenders under the credit agreement in excess of any outstanding
advances; however, any such terminated commitments may not be reinstated.
Advances under the Revolving Credit Agreement would bear interest, at our option, either:
•at a variable annual rate equal to: (1) the highest of (but not less than zero) (a) the rate of interest announced publicly by
Citibank in New York, New York, from time to time, as Citibank’s base rate, (b) 0.5% per annum above the federal funds rate,
and (c) the forward-looking term rate based on the secured overnight financing rate (“Term SOFR”) for a period of one month
plus a credit spread adjustment of 0.10% plus 1.00%, plus (2) an applicable margin, as set forth in the credit agreement (the
“Applicable Margin for Base Advances”); or
•at a rate equal to: (i) Term SOFR for a period of one, three or six months, as applicable, plus (ii) a credit spread adjustment of
0.10% plus (iii) an applicable margin, as set forth in the Revolving Credit Agreement (the “Applicable Margin for Benchmark
Rate Advances”).
We pay a facility fee of 0.060%, 0.070%, 0.080% or 0.100% per annum of the amount of the lender commitments, depending on
AT&T’s credit rating.
NOTE 12. FAIR VALUE MEASUREMENTS AND DISCLOSURE
The Fair Value Measurement and Disclosure framework in ASC 820, “Fair Value Measurement,” provides a three-tiered fair value
hierarchy based on the reliability of the inputs used to determine fair value. Level 1 refers to fair values determined based on
quoted prices in active markets for identical assets. Level 2 refers to fair values estimated using significant other observable inputs
and Level 3 includes fair values estimated using significant unobservable inputs.
The level of an asset or liability within the fair value hierarchy is based on the lowest level of any input that is significant to the fair
value measurement. Our valuation techniques maximize the use of observable inputs and minimize the use of unobservable inputs.
The valuation methodologies described above may produce a fair value calculation that may not be indicative of future net
realizable value or reflective of future fair values. We believe our valuation methods are appropriate and consistent with other
market participants. The use of different methodologies or assumptions to determine the fair value of certain financial
73
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
instruments could result in a different fair value measurement at the reporting date. There have been no changes in the
methodologies used since December 31, 2021.
Long-Term Debt and Other Financial Instruments
The carrying amounts and estimated fair values of our long-term debt, including current maturities, and other financial instruments,
are summarized as follows:
December 31, 2022 December 31, 2021
Carrying
AmountFair
ValueCarrying
AmountFair
Value
Notes and debentures $ 133,207 $ 122,524 $ 167,476 $ 193,068 
Commercial paper 866 866 6,586 6,586 
Investment securities 2,692 2,692 3,214 3,214 
Includes credit agreement borrowings. Excludes note payable to DIRECTV .
Excludes investments accounted for under the equity method.
The carrying amount of debt with an original maturity of less than one year approximates fair value. The fair value measurements
used for notes and debentures are considered Level 2 and are determined using various methods, including quoted prices for
identical or similar securities in both active and inactive markets.
Following is the fair value leveling for investment securities that are measured at fair value and derivatives as of December 31,
2022 and December 31, 2021. Derivatives designated as hedging instruments are reflected as “Other Assets,” “Other noncurrent
liabilities,” “Prepaid and other current assets” and “Accounts payable and accrued liabilities” on our consolidated balance sheets.
December 31, 2022
Level 1 Level 2 Level 3 Total
Equity Securities
Domestic equities $ 995 $ — $ — $ 995 
International equities 198 — — 198 
Fixed income equities 189 — — 189 
Available-for-Sale Debt Securities — 1,132 — 1,132 
Asset Derivatives
Cross-currency swaps — 28 — 28 
Liability Derivatives
Cross-currency swaps — (6,010) — (6,010)
Foreign exchange contracts — (23) — (23)
December 31, 2021
Level 1 Level 2 Level 3 Total
Equity Securities
Domestic equities $ 1,213 $ — $ — $ 1,213 
International equities 221 — — 221 
Fixed income equities 219 — — 219 
Available-for-Sale Debt Securities — 1,380 — 1,380 
Asset Derivatives
Cross-currency swaps — 211 — 211 
Liability Derivatives
Cross-currency swaps — (3,170) — (3,170)
Investment Securities
Our investment securities include both equity and debt securities that are measured at fair value, as well as equity securities without
readily determinable fair values. A substantial portion of the fair values of our investment securities is estimated based on quoted
market prices. Investments in equity securities not traded on a national securities exchange are valued at cost, less1
2
1
2
74
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
any impairment, and adjusted for changes resulting from observable, orderly transactions for identical or similar securities.
Investments in debt securities not traded on a national securities exchange are valued using pricing models, quoted prices of
securities with similar characteristics or discounted cash flows.
The components comprising total gains and losses in the period on equity securities are as follows:
For the years ended December 31, 2022 2021 2020
Total gains (losses) recognized on equity securities $ (309)$ 293 $ 171 
Gains (Losses) recognized on equity securities sold (80) (5) (25)
Unrealized gains (losses) recognized on equity securities held at end of
period $ (229)$ 298 $ 196 
At December 31, 2022, available-for-sale debt securities totaling $1,132 have maturities as follows - less than one year: $38; one to
three years: $158; three to five years: $170; five or more years: $766.
Our cash equivalents (money market securities), short-term investments (certificate and time deposits) and nonrefundable customer
deposits are recorded at amortized cost, and the respective carrying amounts approximate fair values. Short-term investments and
nonrefundable customer deposits are recorded in “Prepaid and other current assets” and our investment securities are recorded in
“Other Assets” on the consolidated balance sheets.
Derivative Financial Instruments
We enter into derivative transactions to manage certain market risks, primarily interest rate risk and foreign currency exchange risk.
This includes the use of interest rate swaps, interest rate locks, foreign exchange forward contracts and combined interest rate
foreign exchange contracts (cross-currency swaps). We do not use derivatives for trading or speculative purposes. We record
derivatives on our consolidated balance sheets at fair value that is derived from observable market data, including yield curves and
foreign exchange rates (all of our derivatives are Level 2). Cash flows associated with derivative instruments are presented in the
same category on the consolidated statements of cash flows as the item being hedged.
Fair Value Hedging Periodically, we enter into and designate fixed-to-floating interest rate swaps as fair value hedges. The purpose
of these swaps is to manage interest rate risk by managing our mix of fixed-rate and floating-rate debt. These swaps involve the
receipt of fixed-rate amounts for floating interest rate payments over the life of the swaps without exchange of the underlying
principal amount.
We also designate most of our cross-currency swaps and foreign exchange contracts as fair value hedges. The purpose of these
contracts is to hedge foreign currency risk associated with changes in spot rates on foreign denominated debt. For cross-currency
hedges, we have elected to exclude the change in fair value of the swap related to both time value and cross-currency basis spread
from the assessment of hedge effectiveness. For foreign exchange contracts, we have elected to exclude the change in fair value of
forward points from the assessment of hedge effectiveness.
Unrealized and realized gains or losses from fair value hedges impact the same category on the consolidated statements of income
as the item being hedged, including the earnings impact of excluded components. In instances where we have elected to exclude
components from the assessment of hedge effectiveness related to fair value hedges, unrealized gains or losses on such excluded
components are recorded as a component of accumulated OCI and recognized into earnings over the life of the hedging instrument.
Unrealized gains on derivatives designated as fair value hedges are recorded at fair value as assets, and unrealized losses are
recorded at fair market value as liabilities. Except for excluded components, changes in the fair value of derivative instruments
designated as fair value hedges are offset against the change in fair value of the hedged assets or liabilities through earnings. In the
years ended December 31, 2022 and 2021, no ineffectiveness was measured on fair value hedges.
Cash Flow Hedging We designated some of our cross-currency swaps as cash flow hedges to hedge our exposure to variability in
expected future cash flows that are attributable to foreign currency risk generated from our foreign-denominated debt. These
agreements include initial and final exchanges of principal from fixed foreign currency denominated amounts to fixed U.S. dollar
denominated amounts, to be exchanged at a specified rate that is usually determined by the market spot rate upon issuance. They
also include an interest rate swap of a fixed or floating foreign currency-denominated interest rate to a fixed U.S. dollar
denominated interest rate.
On September 30, 2022, we de-designated most of our cross-currency swaps from cash flow hedges and re-designated these swaps
as fair value hedges. The amount remaining in accumulated other comprehensive loss related to cash flow hedges on the de-
designation date was $1,857. The amount will be reclassified to earnings when the hedged item is recognized in earnings or
75
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
when it becomes probable that the forecasted transactions will not occur. The election of fair value hedge designation for cross-
currency swaps does not have an impact on our financial results.
Unrealized gains on derivatives designated as cash flow hedges are recorded at fair value as assets, and unrealized losses are
recorded at fair value as liabilities. For derivative instruments designated as cash flow hedges, changes in fair value are reported as
a component of accumulated OCI and are reclassified into the consolidated statements of income in the same period the hedged
transaction affects earnings.
Periodically, we enter into and designate interest rate locks to partially hedge the risk of changes in interest payments attributable to
increases in the benchmark interest rate during the period leading up to the probable issuance of fixed-rate debt. We designate our
interest rate locks as cash flow hedges. Gains and losses when we settle our interest rate locks are amortized into income over the
life of the related debt. Over the next 12 months, we expect to reclassify $59 from accumulated OCI to “Interest expense” due to
the amortization of net losses on historical interest rate locks.
Collateral and Credit-Risk Contingency We have entered into agreements with our derivative counterparties establishing collateral
thresholds based on respective credit ratings and netting agreements. At December 31, 2022, we had posted collateral of $886 (a
deposit asset) and held collateral of $0 (a receipt liability). Under the agreements, if AT&T’s credit rating had been downgraded two
ratings levels by Fitch Ratings, one level by S&P and one level by Moody’s, before the final collateral exchange in December, we
would have been required to post additional collateral of $42. If AT&T’s credit rating had been downgraded three ratings levels by
Fitch Ratings, two levels by S&P, and two levels by Moody’s, we would have been required to post additional collateral of $5,728.
At December 31, 2021, we had posted collateral of $135 (a deposit asset) and held collateral of $7 (a receipt liability). We do not
offset the fair value of collateral, whether the right to reclaim cash collateral (a receivable) or the obligation to return cash collateral
(a payable) exists, against the fair value of the derivative instruments.
Following are the notional amounts of our outstanding derivative positions at December 31:
2022 2021
Cross-currency swaps $ 38,213 $ 40,737 
Foreign exchange contracts 617 — 
Total $ 38,830 $ 40,737 
Following are the related hedged items affecting our financial position and performance:
Effect of Derivatives on the Consolidated Statements of Income
Fair Value Hedging Relationships
For the years ended December 31, 2022 2021 2020
Interest rate swaps (Interest expense):
Gain (Loss) on interest rate swaps $ (3)$ (4)$ (6)
Gain (Loss) on long-term debt 3 4 6 
Cross-currency swaps:
Gain (Loss) on cross-currency swaps 2,195 (91) — 
Gain (Loss) on long-term debt (2,195) 91 — 
Gain (Loss) recognized in accumulated OCI 297 (17) — 
Foreign exchange contracts:
Gain (Loss) on foreign exchange contracts (12) — — 
Gain (Loss) on long-term debt 12 — — 
Gain (Loss) recognized in accumulated OCI (12) — — 
76
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
In addition, the net swap settlements that accrued and settled in the periods above were offset against “Interest expense.”
Cash Flow Hedging Relationships
For the years ended December 31, 2022 2021 2020
Cross-currency swaps:
Gain (Loss) recognized in accumulated OCI $ (1,119)$ (873)$ (378)
Foreign exchange contracts:
Gain (Loss) recognized in accumulated OCI 3 (17) 3 
Other income (expense) – net reclassified from
accumulated OCI into income 1 1 (3)
Interest rate locks:
Gain (Loss) recognized in accumulated OCI — — (648)
Interest income (expense) reclassified from
accumulated OCI into income (65) (92) (84)
Other income (expense) reclassified from
accumulated OCI into income (45) — — 
Distribution of WarnerMedia (12) — — 
Nonrecurring Fair Value Measurements
In addition to assets and liabilities that are recorded at fair value on a recurring basis, impairment indicators may subject goodwill
and long-lived assets to nonrecurring fair value measurements. The implied fair values of the Business Wireline, Consumer
Wireline and Mexico reporting units and the former U.S. video business were estimated using both the discounted cash flow as well
as market multiple approaches (see Note 9). The inputs to these models are considered Level 3.
NOTE 13. INCOME TAXES
Significant components of our deferred tax liabilities (assets) are as follows at December 31:
2022 2021
Depreciation and amortization $ 36,570 $ 35,894 
Licenses and nonamortizable intangibles 19,339 15,573 
Employee benefits (2,251) (3,178)
Deferred fulfillment costs 1,989 1,797 
Equity in partnership 3,284 3,285 
Net operating loss and other carryforwards (5,817) (6,109)
Other – net (343) 2,153 
Subtotal 52,771 49,415 
Deferred tax assets valuation allowance 4,175 4,343 
Net deferred tax liabilities $ 56,946 $ 53,758 
Noncurrent deferred tax liabilities $ 57,032 $ 53,767 
Less: Noncurrent deferred tax assets (86) (9)
Net deferred tax liabilities $ 56,946 $ 53,758 
At December 31, 2022, we had combined net operating and capital loss carryforwards (tax effected) for federal income tax
purposes of $892, state of $747 and foreign of $2,441, expiring through 2042. Additionally, we had federal credit carryforwards of
$293 and state credit carryforwards of $1,444, expiring primarily through 2042.
We recognize a valuation allowance if, based on the weight of available evidence, it is more likely than not that some portion, or
all, of a deferred tax asset will not be realized. Our valuation allowances at December 31, 2022 and 2021 related primarily to state
and foreign net operating losses and state credit carryforwards.
We consider post-1986 unremitted foreign earnings subjected to the one-time transition tax not to be indefinitely reinvested as such
earnings can be repatriated without any significant incremental tax costs. We consider other types of unremitted foreign earnings to
be indefinitely reinvested. U.S. income and foreign withholding taxes have not been recorded on temporary
77
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
differences related to investments in certain foreign subsidiaries as such differences are considered indefinitely reinvested.
Determination of the amount of unrecognized deferred tax liability is not practicable.
We recognize the financial statement effects of a tax return position when it is more likely than not, based on the technical merits,
that the position will ultimately be sustained. For tax positions that meet this recognition threshold, we apply our judgment, taking
into account applicable tax laws, our experience in managing tax audits and relevant GAAP, to determine the amount of tax benefits
to recognize in our financial statements. For each position, the difference between the benefit realized on our tax return and the
benefit reflected in our financial statements is recorded on our consolidated balance sheets as an unrecognized tax benefit (UTB).
We update our UTBs at each financial statement date to reflect the impacts of audit settlements and other resolutions of audit
issues, the expiration of statutes of limitation, developments in tax law and ongoing discussions with taxing authorities. A
reconciliation of the change in our UTB balance from January 1 to December 31 for 2022 and 2021 is as follows:
Federal, State and Foreign Tax 2022 2021
Balance at beginning of year $ 8,954 $ 9,415 
Increases for tax positions related to the current year 1,389 677 
Increases for tax positions related to prior years 577 332 
Decreases for tax positions related to prior years (1,079) (1,169)
Lapse of statute of limitations (2) (6)
Settlements (182) (295)
Balance at end of year 9,657 8,954 
Accrued interest and penalties 1,930 2,054 
Gross unrecognized income tax benefits 11,587 11,008 
Less: Deferred federal and state income tax benefits (723) (728)
Less: Tax attributable to timing items included above (4,640) (3,428)
Total UTB that, if recognized, would impact the
effective income tax rate as of the end of the year $ 6,224 $ 6,852 
Periodically we make deposits to taxing jurisdictions which reduce our UTB balance but are not included in the reconciliation
above. The amount of deposits that reduced our UTB balance was $1,767 at December 31, 2022 and $377 at December 31, 2021.
Accrued interest and penalties included in UTBs were $1,930 as of December 31, 2022 and $2,054 as of December 31, 2021. We
record interest and penalties related to federal, state and foreign UTBs in income tax expense. The net interest and penalty expense
(benefit) included in income tax expense was $(86) for 2022, $(129) for 2021 and $127 for 2020.
We file income tax returns in the U.S. federal jurisdiction and various state, local and foreign jurisdictions. As a large taxpayer, our
income tax returns are regularly audited by the Internal Revenue Service (IRS) and other taxing authorities.
The IRS has completed field examinations of our tax returns through 2015. All audit periods prior to 2005 are closed for federal
examination purposes and we have effectively resolved all outstanding audit issues for years through 2010 with the IRS Appeals
Division. Those years will be closed as the final paperwork is processed in the coming months.
While we do not expect material changes, we are generally unable to estimate the range of impacts on the balance of the remaining
uncertain tax positions or the impact on the effective tax rate from the resolution of these issues until each year is closed; and it is
possible that the amount of unrecognized benefit with respect to our uncertain tax positions could increase or decrease within the
next 12 months.
78
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
The components of income tax (benefit) expense are as follows:
2022 2021 2020
Federal:
Current $ 579 $ (2,400)$ (346)
Deferred 2,206 6,872 858 
2,785 4,472 512 
State and local:
Current 21 289 338 
Deferred 912 648 272 
933 937 610 
Foreign:
Current 106 (66) 14 
Deferred (44) 52 32 
62 (14) 46 
Total $ 3,780 $ 5,395 $ 1,168 
“Income (Loss) from Continuing Operations Before Income Taxes” in the Consolidated Statements of Income included the
following components for the years ended December 31:
2022 2021 2020
U.S. income (loss) before income taxes $ (1,480)$ 29,678 $ 510 
Foreign income (loss) before income taxes (1,614) (507) (864)
Total $ (3,094)$ 29,171 $ (354)
A reconciliation of income tax expense (benefit) on continuing operations and the amount computed by applying the statutory
federal income tax rate of 21% to income from continuing operations before income taxes is as follows:
2022 2021 2020
Taxes computed at federal statutory rate $ (650) $ 6,126 $ (74)
Increases (decreases) in income taxes resulting from:
State and local income taxes – net of federal income tax benefit 795 936 170 
CARES Act federal NOL carryback — (471) — 
Tax on foreign investments 43 47 (124)
Noncontrolling interest (308) (291) (286)
Permanent items and R&D credit (121) (153) (195)
Audit resolutions (642) (220) (112)
Divestitures (481) (558) 107 
Goodwill impairment 5,210 16 1,702 
Other – net (66) (37) (20)
Total $ 3,780 $ 5,395 $ 1,168 
Effective Tax Rate (122.2)% 18.5 % (329.9)%
Goodwill impairments are not deductible for tax purposes.
On March 27, 2020, the Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security (CARES) Act was enacted, which allows for a Net
Operating Loss (NOL) generated in 2020 to be carried back to a year with a federal rate of 35%. During 2021, we recorded a $471
tax benefit for the rate impact of the 2020 NOL carryback adjusted for the domestic manufacturing deduction limitation in the
carryback year and applicable unrecognized tax benefits.
AT&T is subject to the Global Intangible Low Taxed Income (GILTI) provisions created under the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act of 2017.
We report the tax impact of GILTI as a period cost when incurred.1
1  
79
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
NOTE 14. PENSION AND POSTRETIREMENT BENEFITS
We offer noncontributory pension programs covering the majority of domestic nonmanagement employees in our Communications
business. Nonmanagement employees’ pension benefits are generally calculated using one of two formulas: a flat dollar amount
applied to years of service according to job classification or a cash balance plan with negotiated annual pension band credits as well
as interest credits. Most employees can elect to receive their pension benefits in either a lump sum payment or an annuity.
Pension programs covering U.S. management employees are closed to new entrants. These programs continue to provide benefits
to participants that were generally hired before January 1, 2015, who receive benefits under either cash balance pension programs
that include annual or monthly credits based on salary as well as interest credits, or a traditional pension formula (i.e., a stated
percentage of employees’ adjusted career income).
We also provide a variety of medical, dental and life insurance benefits to certain retired employees under various plans and accrue
actuarially determined postretirement benefit costs as active employees earn these benefits.
During the third quarter of 2022, we committed to, and reflected in our results, plan changes impacting postretirement health and
welfare benefits. This plan change aligns our benefit plans to market level.
Obligations and Funded Status
For defined benefit pension plans, the benefit obligation is the projected benefit obligation, the actuarial present value, as of our
December 31 measurement date, of all benefits attributed by the pension benefit formula to employee service rendered to that date.
The amount of benefit to be paid depends on a number of future events incorporated into the pension benefit formula, including
estimates of the average life of employees and their beneficiaries and average years of service rendered. It is measured based on
assumptions concerning future interest rates and future employee compensation levels as applicable.
For postretirement benefit plans, the benefit obligation is the accumulated postretirement benefit obligation, the actuarial present
value as of the measurement date of all future benefits attributed under the terms of the postretirement benefit plans to employee
service.
The following table presents the change in the projected benefit obligation for the years ended December 31:
Pension Benefits Postretirement Benefits
2022 2021 2022 2021
Benefit obligation at beginning of year $ 57,212 $ 62,158 $ 12,552 $ 13,928 
Service cost - benefits earned during the period 617 957 32 45 
Interest cost on projected benefit obligation 1,747 1,276 277 210 
Amendments — — (2,370) — 
Actuarial (gain) loss (10,894) (1,237) (1,919) (275)
Benefits paid, including settlements (5,854) (5,942) (1,292) (1,356)
Benefit obligation at end of year $ 42,828 $ 57,212 $ 7,280 $ 12,552 
80
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
The following table presents the change in the fair value of plan assets for the years ended December 31 and the plans’ funded
status at December 31:
Pension Benefits Postretirement Benefits
2022 2021 2022 2021
Fair value of plan assets at beginning of year $ 54,401 $ 54,606 $ 3,198 $ 3,843 
Actual return on plan assets (7,673) 5,737 (370) 210 
Benefits paid, including settlements (5,854) (5,942) (788) (1,163)
Contributions — — 120 308 
Fair value of plan assets at end of year 40,874 54,401 2,160 3,198 
Unfunded status at end of year $ (1,954)$ (2,811)$ (5,120)$ (9,354)
At our discretion, certain postretirement benefits may be paid from our cash accounts, which does not reduce Voluntary Employee Benefit
Association (VEBA) assets. Future benefit payments may be made from VEBA  trusts and thus reduce those asset balances.
Funded status is not indicative of our ability to pay ongoing pension benefits or of our obligation to fund retirement trusts. Required pension
funding is determined in accordance with the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended (ERISA) and applicable
regulations.
Amounts recognized on our consolidated balance sheets at December 31 are listed below:
Pension BenefitsPostretirement Benefits
2022 2021 2022 2021
Current portion of employee benefit obligation $ — $ — $ (1,058)$ (1,106)
Employee benefit obligation (1,954) (2,811) (4,062) (8,248)
Net amount recognized $ (1,954)$ (2,811)$ (5,120)$ (9,354)
Included in “Accounts payable and accrued liabilities.”
Included in “Postemployment benefit obligation,” combined with international pension obligations and other postemployment obligations of
$161 and $ 1,083  at December 31, 2022, and $ 364 and $ 1,226  at December 31, 2021, respectively .
The accumulated benefit obligation for our pension plans represents the actuarial present value of benefits based on employee
service and compensation as of a certain date and does not include an assumption about future compensation levels. The
accumulated benefit obligation for our pension plans was $42,137 at December 31, 2022, and $56,159 at December 31, 2021.
Net Periodic Benefit Cost and Other Amounts Recognized in Other Comprehensive Income
Periodic Benefit Costs
The service cost component of net periodic pension cost (credit) is recorded in operating expenses in the consolidated statements of
income while the remaining components are recorded in “Other income (expense) – net.” Our combined net pension and
postretirement cost (credit) recognized in our consolidated statements of income was $(4,789), $(7,652) and $711 for the years
ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020.
The following table presents the components of net periodic benefit cost (credit):
Pension BenefitsPostretirement Benefits
2022 2021 2020 2022 2021 2020
Service cost – benefits earned
during the period $ 617 $ 957 $ 1,029 $ 32 $ 45 $ 53 
Interest cost on projected benefit
obligation 1,747 1,276 1,687 277 210 416 
Expected return on assets (3,107) (3,513) (3,557) (112) (151) (178)
Amortization of prior service credit (133) (144) (113) (2,558) (2,537) (2,329)
Net periodic benefit cost (credit) before
remeasurement (876) (1,424) (954) (2,361) (2,433) (2,038)
Actuarial (gain) loss (115) (3,461) 2,404 (1,437) (334) 1,299 
Net pension and postretirement
cost (credit) $ (991)$ (4,885)$ 1,450 $ (3,798)$ (2,767)$ (739)1
2
1
2
1
 2
1
2
81
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Other Changes in Benefit Obligations Recognized in Other Comprehensive Income
The following table presents the after-tax changes in benefit obligations recognized in OCI and the after-tax prior service credits
that were amortized from OCI into net periodic benefit costs:
Pension Benefits Postretirement Benefits
2022 2021 2020 2022 2021 2020
Balance at beginning of year $ 416 $ 525 $ 361 $ 6,496 $ 8,408 $ 8,163 
Prior service (cost) credit — — 250 1,786 — 2,001 
Amortization of prior service credit (100) (109) (86) (1,928) (1,912) (1,756)
Total recognized in other
comprehensive (income) loss (100) (109) 164 (142) (1,912) 245 
Balance at end of year $ 316 $ 416 $ 525 $ 6,354 $ 6,496 $ 8,408 
Assumptions
In determining the projected benefit obligation and the net pension and postretirement benefit cost, we used the following
significant weighted-average assumptions:
Pension Benefits Postretirement Benefits
2022 2021 2020 2022 2021 2020
Weighted-average discount rate for
determining benefit obligation at
December 31 5.20 % 3.00 % 2.70 % 5.20 % 2.80 % 2.40 %
Discount rate in effect for
determining
service cost 4.40 % 3.30 % 3.60 % 4.00 % 2.90 % 3.50 %
Discount rate in effect for
determining interest cost 3.90 % 2.30 % 2.90 % 3.20 % 1.60 % 2.70 %
Weighted-average interest credit
rate for cash balance pension
programs 4.10 % 3.20 % 3.10 % — % — % — %
Long-term rate of return on plan
assets 6.75 % 6.75 % 7.00 % 4.50 % 4.50 % 4.75 %
Composite rate of compensation
increase for determining benefit
obligation 3.00 % 3.00 % 3.00 % 3.00 % 3.00 % 3.00 %
Composite rate of compensation
increase for determining net cost
(credit) 3.00 % 3.00 % 3.00 % 3.00 % 3.00 % 3.00 %
Weighted-average discount rates shown for years with interim remeasurements: 2022 and 2021 for pension benefits and 2022 for
postretirement benefits.
Weighted-average interest crediting rates for cash balance pension programs relate only to the cash balance portion of total pension benefits.
A 0.50% increase in the weighted-average interest crediting rate would increase the pension benefit obligation by $ 135.
We recognize gains and losses on pension and postretirement plan assets and obligations immediately in “Other income (expense) –
net” in our consolidated statements of income. These gains and losses are generally measured annually as of December 31 and
accordingly, will normally be recorded during the fourth quarter, unless an earlier remeasurement is required. Should actual
experience differ from actuarial assumptions, the projected pension benefit obligation and net pension cost and accumulated
postretirement benefit obligation and postretirement benefit cost would be affected in future years.
Discount Rate Our assumed weighted-average discount rates for both pension and postretirement benefits of 5.20%, at
December 31, 2022, reflect the hypothetical rate at which the projected benefit obligation could be effectively settled or paid out to
participants. We determined our discount rate based on a range of factors, including a yield curve composed of the rates of return
on several hundred high-quality, fixed income corporate bonds available at the measurement date and corresponding to the related
expected durations of future cash outflows. These bonds had an average rating of at least Aa3 or AA- by the nationally recognized
statistical rating organizations, denominated in U.S. dollars, and generally not callable, convertible or index linked. For the year
ended December 31, 2022, when compared to the year ended December 31, 2021, we increased our pension discount rate by
2.20%, resulting in a decrease in our pension plan benefit obligation of $11,738 and increased our postretirement discount rate by
2.40%, resulting in a decrease in our postretirement benefit obligation of $2,102. For the year ended December 31, 2021, we
increased our pension discount rate by 0.30%, resulting in a decrease in our pension plan benefit1
1
2
1
2
82
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
obligation of $1,645 and increased our postretirement discount rate by 0.40%, resulting in a decrease in our postretirement benefit
obligation of $341.
We utilize a full yield curve approach in the estimation of the service and interest components of net periodic benefit costs for
pension and other postretirement benefits. Under this approach, we apply discounting using individual spot rates from a yield curve
composed of the rates of return on several hundred high-quality, fixed income corporate bonds available at the measurement date.
These spot rates align to each of the projected benefit obligations and service cost cash flows. The service cost component relates to
the active participants in the plan, so the relevant cash flows on which to apply the yield curve are considerably longer in duration
on average than the total projected benefit obligation cash flows, which also include benefit payments to retirees. Interest cost is
computed by multiplying each spot rate by the corresponding discounted projected benefit obligation cash flows. The full yield
curve approach reduces any actuarial gains and losses based upon interest rate expectations (e.g., built-in gains in interest cost in an
upward sloping yield curve scenario), or gains and losses merely resulting from the timing and magnitude of cash outflows
associated with our benefit obligations. Neither the annual measurement of our total benefit obligations nor annual net benefit cost
is affected by the full yield curve approach.
Expected Long-Term Rate of Return In 2023, our expected long-term rate of return is 7.50% on pension plan assets and 6.50% on
postretirement plan assets, an increase of 0.75% for pension plan assets and 2.00% for postretirement plan assets. This update to
our asset return assumptions was due to economic forecasts and changes in the asset mix. Our long-term rates of return reflect the
average rate of earnings expected on the funds invested, or to be invested, to provide for the benefits included in the projected
benefit obligations. In setting the long-term assumed rate of return, management considers capital markets’ future expectations, the
asset mix of the plans’ investment and average historical asset return. Actual long-term returns can, in relatively stable markets, also
serve as a factor in determining future expectations. We consider many factors that include, but are not limited to, historical returns
on plan assets, current market information on long-term returns (e.g., long-term bond rates) and current and target asset allocations
between asset categories. The target asset allocation is determined based on consultations with external investment advisers. If all
other factors were to remain unchanged, we expect that a 0.50% decrease in the expected long-term rate of return would cause 2023
combined pension and postretirement cost to increase $201. However, any differences in the rate and actual returns will be included
with the actuarial gain or loss recorded in the fourth quarter when our plans are remeasured.
Composite Rate of Compensation Increase Our expected composite rate of compensation increase cost of 3.00% in 2022 and 2021
reflects the long-term average rate of salary increases.
Healthcare Cost Trend Our healthcare cost trend assumptions are developed based on historical cost data, the near-term outlook and
an assessment of likely long-term trends. Based on our assessment of expectations of healthcare industry inflation, our 2023
assumed annual healthcare prescription drug cost trend and medical cost trend for eligible participants will increase from an annual
and ultimate trend rate of 4.25% to an annual and ultimate trend rate of 4.50%. This change in assumption increased our obligation
by $19. For 2022, our assumed annual healthcare prescription drug cost trend and medical cost trend for eligible participants
increased from an annual and ultimate trend rate of 4.00% to an annual and ultimate trend rate of 4.25%. This change in assumption
increased our obligation by $31.
Plan Assets
Plan assets consist primarily of private and public equity, government and corporate bonds, and real assets (real estate and natural
resources). The asset allocations of the pension plans are maintained to meet ERISA requirements. Any plan contributions, as
determined by ERISA regulations, are made to a pension trust for the benefit of plan participants. We do not have significant
ERISA required contributions to our pension plans for 2023.
We maintain VEBA trusts to partially fund postretirement benefits; however, there are no ERISA or regulatory requirements that
these postretirement benefit plans be funded annually. We made discretionary contributions of $120 in December 2022 and $308 in
December 2021 to our postretirement plan.
The principal investment objectives are to ensure the availability of funds to pay pension and postretirement benefits as they
become due under a broad range of future economic scenarios, maximize long-term investment return with an acceptable level of
risk based on our pension and postretirement obligations, and diversify broadly across and within the capital markets to insulate
asset values against adverse experience in any one market. Each asset class has broadly diversified characteristics. Substantial
biases toward any particular investing style or type of security are sought to be avoided by managing the aggregation of all
accounts with portfolio benchmarks. Asset and benefit obligation forecasting studies are conducted periodically, generally every
two to three years, or when significant changes have occurred in market conditions, benefits, participant demographics or funded
status. Decisions regarding investment policy are made with an understanding of the effect of asset allocation on funded status,
future contributions and projected expenses.
83
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
The plans’ weighted-average asset targets and actual allocations as a percentage of plan assets, including the notional exposure of
future contracts by asset categories at December 31 are as follows:
Pension Assets Postretirement (VEBA) Assets
Target 2022 2021 Target 2022 2021
Equity securities:
Domestic 5  % - 25  % 7  % 16  % 16  % - 26  % 21  % 19  %
International 1  % - 21  % 4 13 16  % - 26  % 21 19 
Fixed income
securities 40  % - 50  % 45 38 42  % - 52  % 47 39 
Real assets —  % - 20  % 16 10 —  % - 6  % 1 1 
Private equity —  % - 16  % 14 12 —  % - 6  % 1 1 
Preferred interests 8  % - 18  % 13 10 —  % - —  % — — 
Other —  % - 5  % 1 1 5  % - 15  % 9 21 
Total 100 % 100 % 100 % 100 %
The pension trust holds preferred equity interests valued at $5,427 in AT&T Mobility II LLC (Mobility II), the primary holding
company for our wireless business. The preferred equity interests were valued at $5,562 as of December 31, 2021. On December
27, 2022, the pension trust provided written notice of its right to require AT&T to purchase Mobility preferred interests outstanding.
(See Note 16)
At December 31, 2022, AT&T securities represented 14% of assets held by our pension trust, including the preferred interests in
Mobility II. The VEBA trusts included in these financial statements no longer hold AT&T securities.
Investment Valuation
Investments are stated at fair value. Fair value is the price that would be received to sell an asset or paid to transfer a liability at the
measurement date.
Investments in securities traded on a national securities exchange are valued at the last reported sales price on the final business day
of the year. If no sale was reported on that date, they are valued at the last reported bid price. Investments in securities not traded on
a national securities exchange are valued using pricing models, quoted prices of securities with similar characteristics or discounted
cash flows. Shares of registered investment companies are valued based on quoted market prices, which represent the net asset
value of shares held at year-end.
Other commingled investment entities are valued at quoted redemption values that represent the net asset values of units held at
year-end which management has determined approximates fair value.
Real estate and natural resource direct investments are valued at amounts based upon appraisal reports. Fixed income securities
valuation is based upon observable prices for comparable assets, broker/dealer quotes (spreads or prices), or a pricing matrix that
derives spreads for each bond based on external market data, including the current credit rating for the bonds, credit spreads to
Treasuries for each credit rating, sector add-ons or credits, issue-specific add-ons or credits as well as call or other options.
The preferred interests in Mobility II are valued by an independent fiduciary using an income approach.
Purchases and sales of securities are recorded as of the trade date. Realized gains and losses on sales of securities are determined on
the basis of average cost. Interest income is recognized on the accrual basis. Dividend income is recognized on the ex-dividend
date.
Non-interest bearing cash and overdrafts are valued at cost, which approximates fair value.
Fair Value Measurements
See Note 12 for a discussion of the fair value hierarchy that prioritizes the inputs to valuation techniques used to measure fair value.
84
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
The following tables set forth by level, within the fair value hierarchy, the pension and postretirement assets and liabilities at fair
value as of December 31, 2022:
Pension Assets and Liabilities at Fair Value as of December 31, 2022
Level 1 Level 2 Level 3Total
Non-interest bearing cash $ 158 $ — $ — $ 158 
Interest bearing cash 5 — — 5 
Foreign currency contracts — 4 — 4 
Equity securities:
Domestic equities 2,312 — 2 2,314 
International equities 1,251 — — 1,251 
Preferred interests — — 5,427 5,427 
Fixed income securities:
Corporate bonds and other investments — 9,366 1 9,367 
Government and municipal bonds — 5,450 — 5,450 
Mortgage-backed securities — 220 — 220 
Real estate and real assets — — 4,343 4,343 
Securities lending collateral 1,137 1,407 — 2,544 
Receivable for variation margin 5 — — 5 
Assets at fair value 4,868 16,447 9,773 31,088 
Investments sold short and other liabilities at fair value (261) (5) — (266)
Total plan net assets at fair value $ 4,607 $ 16,442 $ 9,773 $ 30,822 
Assets held at net asset value practical expedient
Private equity funds 5,866 
Real estate funds 1,907 
Commingled funds 5,045 
Total assets held at net asset value practical expedient 12,818 
Other assets (liabilities) (2,766)
Total Plan Net Assets $ 40,874 
Other assets (liabilities) include amounts receivable, accounts payable and net adjustment for securities lending payable.
Postretirement Assets and Liabilities at Fair Value as of December 31, 2022
Level 1 Level 2 Level 3 Total
Interest bearing cash $ 191 $ 4 $ — $ 195 
Equity securities:
Domestic equities 258 — — 258 
International equities 233 — 1 234 
Securities lending collateral — 12 — 12 
Assets at fair value 682 16 1 699 
Securities lending payable and other liabilities — (12) — (12)
Total plan net assets at fair value $ 682 $ 4 $ 1 $ 687 
Assets held at net asset value practical expedient
Private equity funds 13 
Real estate funds 13 
Commingled funds 1,445 
Total assets held at net asset value practical expedient 1,471 
Other assets (liabilities) 2 
Total Plan Net Assets $ 2,160 
Other assets (liabilities) include amounts receivable and accounts payable.1
1
1
1
85
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
The following tables set forth by level, within the fair value hierarchy, the pension and postretirement assets and liabilities at fair
value as of December 31, 2021:
Pension Assets and Liabilities at Fair Value as of December 31, 2021
Level 1Level 2 Level 3Total
Non-interest bearing cash $ 167 $ — $ — $ 167 
Interest bearing cash 11 — — 11 
Foreign currency contracts — 5 — 5 
Equity securities:
Domestic equities 7,693 — 1 7,694 
International equities 4,117 — 7 4,124 
Preferred interests — — 5,562 5,562 
Fixed income securities:
Corporate bonds and other investments — 11,168 2 11,170 
Government and municipal bonds — 6,977 — 6,977 
Mortgage-backed securities — 268 — 268 
Real estate and real assets — — 3,318 3,318 
Securities lending collateral 1,645 1,285 — 2,930 
Receivable for variation margin 8 — — 8 
Assets at fair value 13,641 19,703 8,890 42,234 
Investments sold short and other liabilities at fair value (529) (3) (1) (533)
Total plan net assets at fair value $ 13,112 $ 19,700 $ 8,889 $ 41,701 
Assets held at net asset value practical expedient
Private equity funds 6,454 
Real estate funds 2,329 
Commingled funds 6,780 
Total assets held at net asset value practical expedient 15,563 
Other assets (liabilities) (2,863)
Total Plan Net Assets $ 54,401 
Other assets (liabilities) include amounts receivable, accounts payable and net adjustment for securities lending payable.1
1
Postretirement Assets and Liabilities at Fair Value as of December 31, 2021
Level 1 Level 2 Level 3 Total
Interest bearing cash $ 371 $ 295 $ — $ 666 
Equity securities:
Domestic equities 323 — — 323 
International equities 287 — 1 288 
Fixed income securities:
Corporate bonds and other investments 1 — — 1 
Securities lending collateral — 9 — 9 
Assets at fair value 982 304 1 1,287 
Securities lending payable and other liabilities — (9) — (9)
Total plan net assets at fair value $ 982 $ 295 $ 1 $ 1,278 
Assets held at net asset value practical expedient
Commingled funds 1,883 
Private equity funds 19 
Real estate funds 16 
Total assets held at net asset value practical expedient 1,918 
Other assets (liabilities) 2 
Total Plan Net Assets $ 3,198 
Other assets (liabilities) include amounts receivable and accounts payable.1
1
86
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
For the years ended December 31, 2022 and 2021, our postretirement assets did not include significant investments in Level 3
assets, nor were there significant changes in fair value of those assets during the period. The tables below set forth a summary of
changes in the fair value of the Level 3 pension assets for the years ended:
EquitiesFixed Income
FundsReal Estate and
Real Assets Total
Balance as of December 31, 2021 $ 5,569 $ 2 $ 3,318 $ 8,889 
Realized gains (losses) 1 — 22 23 
Unrealized gains (losses) (139) — 802 663 
Transfers in 1 1 20 22 
Transfers out — (2) (29) (31)
Purchases — — 716 716 
Sales (3) — (506) (509)
Balance as of December 31, 2022 $ 5,429 $ 1 $ 4,343 $ 9,773 
EquitiesFixed Income
FundsReal Estate and
Real Assets Total
Balance as of December 31, 2020 $ 5,793 $ 53 $ 2,544 $ 8,390 
Realized gains (losses) 2 — (31) (29)
Unrealized gains (losses) (203) — 558 355 
Transfers in — 1 — 1 
Transfers out (7) (8) — (15)
Purchases 7 1 425 433 
Sales (23) (45) (178) (246)
Balance as of December 31, 2021 $ 5,569 $ 2 $ 3,318 $ 8,889 
Estimated Future Benefit Payments
Expected benefit payments are estimated using the same assumptions used in determining our benefit obligation at December 31,
2022. Because benefit payments will depend on future employment and compensation levels; average years employed; average life
spans; and payment elections, among other factors, changes in any of these assumptions could significantly affect these expected
amounts. The following table provides expected benefit payments under our pension and postretirement plans:
Pension
BenefitsPostretirement
Benefits
2023 $ 5,612 $ 1,211 
2024 3,734 801 
2025 3,747 640 
2026 3,632 598 
2027 3,561 568 
Years 2028 - 2032 16,688 2,322 
Supplemental Retirement Plans
We also provide certain senior- and middle-management employees with nonqualified, unfunded supplemental retirement and
savings plans. While these plans are unfunded, we have assets in a designated non-bankruptcy remote trust that are independently
managed and used to provide for certain of these benefits. These plans include supplemental pension benefits as well as
compensation-deferral plans, some of which include a corresponding match by us based on a percentage of the compensation
deferral. For our supplemental retirement plans, the projected benefit obligation was $1,544 and the net supplemental retirement
pension credit was $234 at and for the year ended December 31, 2022. The projected benefit obligation was $2,326 and the net
supplemental retirement pension credit was $41 at and for the year ended December 31, 2021.
We use the same significant assumptions for the composite rate of compensation increase in determining our projected benefit
obligation and the net pension and postemployment benefit cost. Our discount rates of 5.10% at December 31, 2022 and 2.70% at
December 31, 2021 were calculated using the same methodologies used in calculating the discount rates for our qualified pension
and postretirement benefit plans.
87
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Deferred compensation expense was $94 in 2022, $171 in 2021 and $183 in 2020.
Contributory Savings Plans
We maintain contributory savings plans that cover substantially all employees. Under the savings plans, we match in cash or
company stock a stated percentage of eligible employee contributions, subject to a specified ceiling. There are no debt-financed
shares held by the Employee Stock Ownership Plans, allocated or unallocated.
Our match of employee contributions to the savings plans is fulfilled with purchases of our stock on the open market or company
cash. Benefit cost, which is based on the cost of shares or units allocated to participating employees’ accounts or the cash
contributed to participant accounts, was $611, $614 and $646 for the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020.
NOTE 15. SHARE-BASED PAYMENTS
Under our various plans, senior and other management employees and nonemployee directors have received nonvested stock and
stock units. The shares will vest over a period of one to four years in accordance with the terms of those plans.
We grant performance stock units, which are nonvested stock units, based upon our stock price at the date of grant and award them
in the form of AT&T common stock and cash at the end of a three-year period, subject to the achievement of certain performance
goals. We treat the cash settled portion of these awards as a liability. Effective with the 2021 plan year, for the majority of
employees, performance shares were replaced with restricted stock units that do not have any performance conditions. These new
restricted stock units vest ratably over a three-year period. We grant forfeitable restricted stock and stock units, which are valued at
the market price of our common stock at the date of grant and predominantly vest over a three- to five-year period. We also grant
other nonvested stock units and award them in cash at the end of a three-year period, subject to the achievement of certain market-
based conditions. As of December 31, 2022, we were authorized to issue up to approximately 128 million shares of common stock
(in addition to shares that may be issued upon exercise of outstanding options or upon vesting of performance stock units or other
nonvested stock units) to officers, employees and directors pursuant to these various plans.
We account for our share-based payment arrangements based on the fair value of the awards on their respective grant date, which
may affect our ability to fully realize the value shown on our consolidated balance sheets of deferred tax assets associated with
compensation expense. We record a valuation allowance when our future taxable income is not expected to be sufficient to recover
the asset. Accordingly, there can be no assurance that the current stock price of our common shares will rise to levels sufficient to
realize the entire tax benefit currently reflected on our consolidated balance sheets. However, to the extent we generate excess tax
benefits (i.e., those additional tax benefits in excess of the deferred taxes associated with compensation expense previously
recognized) the potential future impact on income would be reduced.
Our consolidated statements of income include the compensation cost recognized for those plans as operating expenses, as well as
the associated tax benefits, which are reflected in the table below:
2022 2021 2020
Performance stock units $ 168 $ 248 $ 348 
Restricted stock and stock units 350 199 74 
Other nonvested stock units — — — 
Stock options — — — 
Total $ 518 $ 447 $ 422 
Income tax benefit $ 127 $ 110 $ 104 
88
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
A summary of the status of our nonvested stock units as of December 31, 2022, and changes during the year then ended is
presented as follows (shares in millions):
Nonvested Stock Units SharesWeighted-
Average Grant-
Date Fair Value
Nonvested at January 1, 2022 35 $ 32.33 
Granted 21 23.64 
Vested (28) 27.64 
Forfeited (5) 23.76 
Spin-off Adjustment 13 NA
Nonvested at December 31, 2022 36 $ 22.07 
In connection with the WarnerMedia transaction, AT&T  made certain adjustments to the number of stock awards to maintain the
intrinsic value prior to the spin-of f.
As of December 31, 2022, there was $547 of total unrecognized compensation cost related to nonvested share-based payment
arrangements granted. That cost is expected to be recognized over a weighted-average period of 1.69 years. The total fair value of
shares vested during the year was $783 for 2022, compared to $608 for 2021 and $471 for 2020.
It is our intent to satisfy share option exercises using our treasury stock. Cash received from stock option exercises was $2 for
2022, $11 for 2021 and $21 for 2020.
NOTE 16. STOCKHOLDERS’ EQUITY
Authorized Shares We have authorized 14 billion common shares of AT&T stock and 10 million preferred shares of AT&T stock,
each with a par value of $1.00 per share. Cumulative perpetual preferred shares consist of the following:
•Series A: 48 thousand shares outstanding at December 31, 2022 and December 31, 2021, with a $25,000 per share liquidation
preference and a dividend rate of 5.000%.
•Series B: 20 thousand shares outstanding at December 31, 2022 and December 31, 2021, with a €100,000 per share liquidation
preference, and an initial rate of 2.875%, subject to reset after May 1, 2025.
•Series C: 70 thousand shares outstanding at December 31, 2022 and December 31, 2021, with a $25,000 per share liquidation
preference, and a dividend rate of 4.75%.
So long as the quarterly preferred dividends are declared and paid on a timely basis on each series of preferred shares, there are no
limitations on our ability to declare a dividend on or repurchase AT&T common shares. The preferred shares are optionally
redeemable by AT&T at the liquidation price on or after five years from the issuance date, or upon certain other contingent events.
Stock Repurchase Program From time to time, we repurchase shares of common stock for distribution through our employee
benefit plans or in connection with certain acquisitions. Our Board of Directors has approved the following authorization to
repurchase common stock: (1) March 2013 authorization program of 300 million shares, which was completed in 2020 and (2)
March 2014 authorization program for 300 million shares, with approximately 144 million outstanding at December 31, 2022.
To implement these authorizations, we used open market repurchases, relying on Rule 10b5-1 of the Securities Exchange Act of
1934, where feasible. We also used accelerated share repurchase agreements with large financial institutions to repurchase our
stock. During 2021, there were no shares repurchased under the March 2014 authorization. During 2022, we repurchased
approximately 34 million shares totaling $662 under the March 2014 authorization.
Dividend Declarations In December 2022 and December 2021, AT&T declared a quarterly preferred dividend of $36. In
December 2022 and December 2021, AT&T declared a common dividend of $0.2775 and $0.52 per share of common stock,
respectively.
Preferred Interests Issued by Subsidiaries We have issued cumulative perpetual preferred membership interests in certain
subsidiaries. The preferred interests are entitled to cash distributions, subject to declaration. The preferred interests are included in
“Noncontrolling interest” on the consolidated balance sheets.1
1 
89
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Mobility II
In 2018, we issued 320 million Series A Cumulative Perpetual Preferred Membership Interests in Mobility II (Mobility preferred
interests), which pay cash distributions of 7% per annum, subject to declaration. So long as the distributions are declared and paid,
the terms of the Mobility preferred equity interests will not impose any limitations on cash movements between affiliates, or our
ability to declare a dividend on or repurchase AT&T shares.
A holder of the Mobility preferred interests may put the interests to Mobility II. Mobility II may redeem the interests upon a change
in control of Mobility II or on or after September 9, 2022. When either option arises due to a passage of time, that option may be
exercised only during certain periods.
The price at which a put option or a redemption option can be exercised is the greater of (1) the market value of the interests as of
the last date of the quarter preceding the date of the exercise of a put or redemption option and (2) the sum of (a) twenty-five
dollars plus (b) any accrued and unpaid distributions. The redemption price may be paid with cash, AT&T common stock, or a
combination of cash and AT&T common stock, at Mobility II’s sole election. In no event shall Mobility II be required to deliver
more than 250 million shares of AT&T common stock to settle put and redemption options. We have the intent and ability to settle
the Mobility preferred equity interests with cash.
On October 24, 2022, approximately 105 million Mobility preferred interests were put to AT&T by a third-party investor, for which
we paid approximately $2,600 cash to redeem. On December 27, 2022, the AT&T pension trust provided written notice of its right
to require us to purchase the remaining 213 million, or approximately $5,340, of Mobility preferred interests outstanding. The
terms of the instruments limit the amount we are required to redeem in any 12-month period to approximately 107 million shares,
or $2,670. We expect to redeem approximately $2,670 of the Mobility preferred interests primarily in October 2023 and $2,670 in
October 2024, unless the interests are called or the puts are accepted by AT&T prior to those dates. With the certainty of
redemption, the remaining Mobility preferred interests were reclassified from equity to a liability at fair value, with approximately
$2,670 recorded in current liabilities as “Accounts payable and accrued liabilities” and $2,670 recorded in “Other noncurrent
liabilities.” The liabilities associated with the Mobility preferred interests are considered Level 3 under the Fair Value Measurement
and Disclosure framework (see Notes 12 and 14). The difference between the carrying value of the Mobility preferred interest,
which represented fair value at contribution, and the fair value of the instrument upon settlement and/or balance sheet
reclassification was recorded as an adjustment to additional paid-in capital.
As of December 31, 2022, we have approximately 213 million Mobility preferred interests outstanding, which have a redemption
value of approximately $5,340 and pay cash distributions of $373 per annum, subject to declaration.
Tower Holdings
In 2019, we issued $6,000 nonconvertible cumulative preferred interests in a wireless subsidiary (Tower Holdings) that holds
interests in various tower assets and have the right to receive approximately $6,000 if the purchase options from the tower
companies are exercised.
The membership interests in Tower Holdings consist of (1) common interests, which are held by a consolidated subsidiary of
AT&T, and (2) two series of preferred interests (collectively the “Tower preferred interests”). The September series (Class A-1) of
the preferred interests totals $1,500 and pays an initial preferred distribution of 5.0%, and the December series (Class A-2) totals
$4,500 and pays an initial preferred distribution of 4.75%. Distributions are paid quarterly, subject to declaration, and reset every
five years. Any failure to declare or pay distributions on the Tower preferred interests would not impose any limitation on cash
movements between affiliates, or our ability to declare a dividend on or repurchase AT&T shares. We can call the Tower preferred
interests at the issue price beginning five years from the issuance date or upon the receipt of proceeds from the sale of the
underlying assets.
The holders of the Tower preferred interests have the option to require redemption upon the occurrence of certain contingent
events, such as the failure of AT&T to pay the preferred distribution for two or more periods or to meet certain other requirements,
including a minimum credit rating. If notice is given upon such an event, all other holders of equal or more subordinate classes of
membership interests in Tower Holdings are entitled to receive the same form of consideration payable to the holders of the
preferred interests, resulting in a deemed liquidation for accounting purposes.
Telco LLC
In September 2020, we issued $2,000 nonconvertible cumulative preferred interests out of a newly created limited liability
company (Telco LLC) that was formed to hold telecommunication-related assets.
Members’ equity in Telco LLC consist of (1) member’s interests, which are held by a consolidated subsidiary of AT&T, and (2)
preferred interests (Telco preferred interests), which pay an initial preferred distribution of 4.25% annually, subject to declaration,
and subject to reset every seven years. Failure to pay distributions on the Telco preferred interests would not limit
90
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
cash movements between affiliates, or our ability to declare a dividend on or repurchase AT&T shares. We can call the Telco
preferred interests at the issue price beginning seven years from the issuance date.
The holders of the Telco preferred interests have the option to require redemption upon the occurrence of certain contingent events,
such as the failure of Telco LLC to pay the preferred distribution for two or more periods or to meet certain other requirements,
including a minimum credit rating. If notice is given, all other holders of equal or more subordinate classes of members’ equity are
entitled to receive the same form of consideration payable to the holders of the preferred interests, resulting in a deemed liquidation
for accounting purposes.
PR Holdings
In 2019, we issued $1,950 nonconvertible cumulative preferred interests in a subsidiary (PR Holdings) that held notes secured by
the proceeds from our agreement to sell wireless and wireline operations in Puerto Rico and the U.S. Virgin Islands. These
preferred interests were redeemed on November 6, 2020. (See Note 6)
The membership interests in PR Holdings consisted of (1) common interests, which were held by consolidated subsidiaries of
AT&T, and (2) preferred interests (PR preferred interests). The PR preferred interests paid an initial preferred distribution at an
annual rate of 4.75%. Distributions were paid quarterly, subject to declaration.
NOTE 17. SALES OF RECEIVABLES
We have agreements with various third-party financial institutions pertaining to the sales of certain types of our accounts
receivable. The most significant of these programs consists of receivables arising from equipment installment plans, which are sold
for cash and a deferred purchase price. Under this program, we transfer receivables to purchasers in exchange for cash and
additional consideration upon settlement of the receivables. Under the terms of our agreement for this program, we continue to
service the transferred receivables on behalf of the financial institutions.
The following table sets forth a summary of cash proceeds received, net of remittances paid, from sales of receivables for the years
ended December 31:
2022 2021 2020
Net cash received (paid) from equipment installment receivables $ 1,875 $ 1,000 $ (1,565)
Net cash received (paid) from other programs 620 (295) 295 
Total net cash impact to cash flows from operating activities $ 2,495 $ 705 $ (1,270)
Net cash from initial sales of $ 11,129 , $9,740  and $ 6,089  for the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively .
The sales of receivables did not have a material impact on our consolidated statements of income or to “Total Assets” reported on
our consolidated balance sheets. We reflect cash receipts on sold receivables as cash flows from operations in our consolidated
statements of cash flows. Cash receipts on the deferred purchase price are classified as cash flows from investing activities, when
applicable.
The following table sets forth a summary of the equipment installment receivables and accounts being serviced at December 31:
2022 2021
Gross receivables: $ 4,165 $ 4,361 
Balance sheet classification
Accounts receivable
Notes receivable 1,789 1,846 
Trade receivables 522 606 
Other Assets
Noncurrent notes and trade receivables 1,854 1,909 
Outstanding portfolio of receivables derecognized from
our consolidated balance sheets $ 11,030 $ 9,767 
Cash proceeds received, net of remittances 8,519 6,644 
Represents amounts to which financial institutions remain entitled, excluding the deferred purchase price.1
1
1
1
91
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
We offer our customers the option to purchase certain wireless devices in installments over a specified period of time and, in many
cases, once certain conditions are met, they may be eligible to trade in the original equipment for a new device and have the
remaining unpaid balance paid or settled.
We maintain a program under which we transfer a portion of these receivables through our bankruptcy-remote subsidiary in
exchange for cash and additional consideration upon settlement of the receivables, referred to as the deferred purchase price. In the
event a customer trades in a device prior to the end of the installment contract period, we agree to make a payment to the financial
institutions equal to any outstanding remaining installment receivable balance. Accordingly, we record a guarantee obligation for
this estimated amount at the time the receivables are transferred.
The following table sets forth a summary of equipment installment receivables sold under this program:
2022 2021 2020
Gross receivables sold $ 11,510 $ 10,793 $ 7,270 
Net receivables sold 11,061 10,502 7,026 
Cash proceeds received 11,129 9,740 6,089 
Deferred purchase price recorded 245 1,080 1,021 
Guarantee obligation recorded 703 434 157 
Receivables net of allowance, imputed interest and equipment trade-in right guarantees.
The deferred purchase price and guarantee obligation are initially recorded at estimated fair value and subsequently adjusted for
changes in present value of expected cash flows. The estimation of their fair values is based on remaining installment payments
expected to be collected and the expected timing and value of device trade-ins. The estimated value of the device trade-ins
considers prices offered to us by independent third parties and contemplate changes in value after the launch of a device model. The
fair value measurements used for the deferred purchase price and the guarantee obligation are considered Level 3 under the Fair
Value Measurement and Disclosure framework (see Note 12).
The following table presents the previously transferred equipment installment receivables, which we repurchased in exchange for
the associated deferred purchase price:
2022 2021 2020
Fair value of repurchased receivables $ 3,314 $ 1,424 $ 1,271 
Carrying value of deferred purchase price 3,335 1,334 1,235 
Gain (loss) on repurchases $ (21)$ 90 $ 36 
These gains (losses) are included in “Selling, general and administrative” expense in the consolidated statements of income.
At December 31, 2022 and December 31, 2021, our deferred purchase price receivable was $2,318 and $3,177, respectively, of
which $1,278 and $2,123 are included in “Prepaid and other current assets” on our consolidated balance sheets, with the remainder
in “Other Assets.” The guarantee obligation at December 31, 2022 and December 31, 2021 was $419 and $371, respectively, of
which $73 and $101 are included in “Accounts payable and accrued liabilities” on our consolidated balance sheets, with the
remainder in “Other noncurrent liabilities.” Our maximum exposure to loss as a result of selling these equipment installment
receivables is limited to the total amount of our deferred purchase price and guarantee obligation.
NOTE 18. TOWER TRANSACTION
In December 2013, we closed our transaction with Crown Castle International Corp. (Crown Castle) in which Crown Castle gained
the exclusive rights to lease and operate 9,048 wireless towers and purchased 627 of our wireless towers for $4,827 in cash. The
leases have various terms with an average length of approximately 28 years. As the leases expire, Crown Castle will have fixed
price purchase options for these towers totaling approximately $4,200, based on their estimated fair market values at the end of the
lease terms. We sublease space on the towers from Crown Castle for an initial term of ten years at current market rates, subject to
optional renewals in the future.
We determined that we did not transfer control of the tower assets, which prevented us from achieving sale-leaseback accounting
for the transaction, and we accounted for the cash proceeds from Crown Castle as a financing obligation on our consolidated
balance sheets. We record interest on the financing obligation using the effective interest method at a rate of approximately 3.9%.
The financing obligation is increased by interest expense and estimated future net cash flows generated and retained by Crown
Castle from operation of the tower sites, and reduced by our contractual payments. We continue to include the tower assets in
“Property, Plant and Equipment – Net” on our consolidated balance sheets and depreciate them1
1
1
1
92
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
accordingly. At December 31, 2022 and 2021, the tower assets had a balance of $686 and $725, respectively. Our depreciation
expense for these assets was $39 for each of 2022, 2021 and 2020.
Payments made to Crown Castle under this arrangement were $258 for 2022. At December 31, 2022, the future minimum payments
under the sublease arrangement are $264 for 2023, $269 for 2024, $274 for 2025, $280 for 2026, $285 for 2027 and $421
thereafter.
NOTE 19. TRANSACTIONS WITH DIRECTV
Effective August 1, 2021, we began accounting for our investment in DIRECTV under the equity method and recorded our share of
DIRECTV earnings as equity in net income of affiliates, with DIRECTV considered a related party (see Note 10).
For the year ended December 31, 2022, our share of DIRECTV’s earnings included in equity in net income of affiliates was $1,808.
Cash distributions from DIRECTV totaled $4,457, with $1,808 classified as operating activities and $2,649 classified as investing
activities in our consolidated statement of cash flows. Our investment in DIRECTV at December 31, 2022 was $2,911.
In addition to the assets and liabilities contributed to DIRECTV, we recorded total obligations of $2,100 to cover certain net losses
under the NFL SUNDAY TICKET contract, of which $1,800 is in the form of a note payable to DIRECTV. For the year ended
December 31, 2022, cash payments to DIRECTV on the note totaled $1,211 and were classified as financing activities in our
consolidated statement of cash flows. Amounts due under the DIRECTV note were $130 at December 31, 2022.
We also provide DIRECTV with network transport for U-verse products and sales services under commercial arrangements for up
to five years. Under separate transition services agreements, we provide DIRECTV certain operational support, including servicing
of certain of their customer receivables for up to three years. For the year ended December 31, 2022, we billed DIRECTV
approximately $1,260 for these costs, which were primarily recorded as a reduction to the operations and support expenses incurred
and resulted in net retained costs to AT&T of approximately $737.
At December 31, 2022, we had accounts receivable from DIRECTV of $360 and accounts payable to DIRECTV of $120.
We are not committed, implicitly or explicitly, to provide financial or other support, other than noted above, as our involvement
with DIRECTV is limited to the carrying amount of the assets and liabilities recognized on our balance sheet.
NOTE 20. FIRSTNET
In 2017, the First Responder Network Authority (FirstNet) selected AT&T to build and manage the first nationwide broadband
network dedicated to America’s first responders. Under the 25-year agreement, FirstNet provides 20 MHz of valuable
telecommunications spectrum and success-based payments of $6,500 over the first five years to support network buildout. We are
required to construct a network that achieves coverage and nationwide interoperability requirements and have a contractual
commitment to make sustainability payments of $18,000 over the 25-year contract. These sustainability payments represent our
commitment to fund FirstNet’s operating expenses and future reinvestments in the network which we own and operate, which we
estimate in the $3,000 or less range over the life of the 25-year contract. After FirstNet’s operating expenses are paid, we anticipate
the remaining amount, expected to be in the $15,000 range, will be reinvested into the network.
During 2022, we submitted $195 in sustainability payments, with future payments under the agreement of $195 for 2023, 2024 and
2025; $1,590 for 2026, $1,665 for 2027; and $13,365 thereafter. Amounts paid to FirstNet, which are not expected to be returned to
AT&T to be reinvested into our network, will be expensed in the period paid. In the event FirstNet does not reinvest any funds to
construct, operate, improve and maintain this network, our maximum exposure to loss is the total amount of the sustainability
payments, which would be reflected in higher expense.
The $6,500 of initial funding from FirstNet is contingent on the achievement of six operating capability milestones and certain first
responder subscriber adoption targets. These milestones are based on coverage objectives of the first responder network during the
construction period, which is expected to be over five years, and subscriber adoption targets. Funding payments received from
FirstNet are reflected as a reduction from the costs capitalized in the construction of the network and, as appropriate, a reduction of
associated operating expenses. As of December 31, 2022, we have collected approximately $6,120 for the completion of certain
tasks and anticipate collecting nearly all of the remainder of the $6,500 as we fulfill contractual deliveries set out by FirstNet in
2023.
93
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
NOTE 21. CONTINGENT LIABILITIES
We are party to numerous lawsuits, regulatory proceedings and other matters arising in the ordinary course of business. In
evaluating these matters on an ongoing basis, we take into account amounts already accrued on the balance sheet. In our opinion,
although the outcomes of these proceedings are uncertain, they should not have a material adverse effect on our financial position,
results of operations or cash flows.
We have contractual obligations to purchase certain goods or services from various other parties. Our purchase obligations are
expected to be approximately $12,313 in 2023, $11,424 in total for 2024 and 2025, $2,457 in total for 2026 and 2027 and $821 in
total for years thereafter.
See Note 12 for a discussion of collateral and credit-risk contingencies.
NOTE 22. ADDITIONAL FINANCIAL INFORMATION
December 31,
Consolidated Balance Sheets 2022 2021
Accounts payable and accrued liabilities:
Accounts payable $ 31,101 $ 29,511 
Accrued payroll and commissions 1,605 2,082 
Current portion of employee benefit obligation 1,173 1,234 
Current portion of Mobility preferred interests 2,670 — 
Accrued interest 2,160 2,438 
Accrued taxes 798 1,148 
Other 3,137 2,682 
Total accounts payable and accrued liabilities $ 42,644 $ 39,095 
Reported as noncontrolling interest in 2021. (See Note 16)
Consolidated Statements of Income 2022 2021 2020
Advertising expense $ 2,462 $ 2,732 $ 2,705 
Interest expense incurred $ 7,402 $ 7,670 $ 7,850 
Capitalized interest – capital expenditures (174) (173) (123)
Capitalized interest – spectrum (1,120) (781) — 
Total interest expense $ 6,108 $ 6,716 $ 7,727 
Included in “Acquisitions, net of cash acquired” on our consolidated statements of cash flows.
Cash and Cash Flows We typically maintain our restricted cash balances for purchases and sales of certain investment securities
and funding of certain deferred compensation benefit payments.
The following table summarizes cash and cash equivalents and restricted cash balances contained on our consolidated balance
sheets:
December 31,
Cash and Cash Equivalents and Restricted Cash 2022 2021 2020 2019
Cash and cash equivalents from continuing operations $ 3,701 $ 19,223 $ 7,924 $ 9,702 
Cash and cash equivalents from discontinued operations — 1,946 1,816 2,428 
Restricted cash in Prepaid and other current assets 1 3 9 69 
Restricted cash in Other Assets 91 144 121 96 
Cash and cash equivalents and restricted cash $ 3,793 $ 21,316 $ 9,870 $ 12,295 1
1
1
1
94
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
The following tables summarize certain cash flow activities from continuing operations:
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows 2022 2021 2020
Cash paid (received) during the year for:
Interest $ 7,772 $ 7,485 $ 8,010 
Income taxes, net of refunds 592 252 577 
Total cash income taxes paid, net of refunds, by AT&T was $696, $700 and $993 for 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively.
Purchase of property and equipment $ 19,452 $ 15,372 $ 14,567 
Interest during construction - capital expenditures 174 173 123 
Total Capital expenditures $ 19,626 $ 15,545 $ 14,690 
Business acquisitions $ — $ — $ 12 
Spectrum acquisitions 9,080 24,672 1,613 
Interest during construction - spectrum 1,120 781 — 
Total Acquisitions, net of cash acquired $ 10,200 $ 25,453 $ 1,625 
Total capitalized interest was $1,294, $954 and $123 for 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively.
Noncash Investing and Financing Activities In connection with capital improvements and the acquisition of other productive
assets, we negotiate favorable payment terms (referred to as vendor financing), which are reported as financing activities in our
statements of cash flows when paid. We recorded $5,817 of vendor financing commitments related to capital investments in 2022,
$5,282 in 2021 and $4,664 in 2020.
Total vendor financing payables included in our December 31, 2022 consolidated balance sheet were approximately $6,147, with
$4,592 due within one year (in “Accounts payable and accrued liabilities”) and the remainder predominantly due within five years
(in “Other noncurrent liabilities”).
Labor Contracts As of January 31, 2023, we employed approximately 160,700 persons. Approximately 42% of our employees are
represented by the Communications Workers of America (CWA), the International Brotherhood of Electrical Workers (IBEW) or
other unions. After expiration of in place agreements with these groups, work stoppages or labor disruptions may occur in the
absence of new contracts or other agreements being reached. The main contracts included the following:
•A contract covering approximately 7,000 Mobility employees in nine states, for which we reached tentative agreement in
February 2023.
•A contract covering approximately 400 employees supporting internet-based products is set to expire in July 2023.
•A contract covering approximately 200 Mobility employees in Illinois is set to expire in May 2023.1
1
1
1
1
95
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
NOTE 23. DISCONTINUED OPERATIONS
Upon the separation and distribution, the WarnerMedia business met the criteria for discontinued operations. For discontinued
operations, we also evaluated transactions that were components of AT&T’s single plan of a strategic shift, including dispositions
that previously did not individually meet the criteria due to materiality, and have determined discontinued operations to be
comprised of WarnerMedia, Vrio, Xandr and Playdemic.
The following is a summary of operating results included in income (loss) from discontinued operations for the years ended:
 2022 2021 2020
Revenues $ 9,454 $ 34,826 $ 28,710 
Operating Expenses
Cost of revenues 5,481 19,400 14,269 
Selling, general and administrative 2,791 8,275 7,222 
Asset abandonments and impairments — 4,691 3,193 
Depreciation and amortization 1,172 5,010 5,993 
Total operating expenses 9,444 37,376 30,677 
Interest expense 131 168 198 
Equity in net income (loss) of affiliates (27) 28 6 
Other income (expense) — net (87) 466 (343)
Total other income (expense) (245) 326 (535)
Net loss before income taxes (235) (2,224) (2,502)
Income tax expense (benefit) (54) 73 (203)
Net loss from discontinued operations $ (181)$ (2,297)$ (2,299)
2021 includes $ 4,555  impairment resulting from our assessment of the recoverability of Vrio’s net assets. 2020 includes approximately
$2,200  of goodwill impairment at Vrio and $ 1,000  from production, content and other impairment at WarnerMedia. The implied fair value of
the Vrio business was estimated using both the discounted cash flow as well as market multiple approaches. The fair values of film
productions were estimated using a discounted cash flow approach. The inputs to all of these approaches are considered Level 3.
“Other income (expense) - net” includes the gain of $ 706 from Playdemic for the year ended 2021.
The following is a summary of assets and liabilities attributable to discontinued operations, which were included in our historical
Consolidated Balance Sheet at December 31:
 2021
Assets:
Current assets $ 9,005 
Noncurrent Inventories and Theatrical Film and Television Production Costs 18,983 
Property, Plant and Equipment — Net 4,255 
Goodwill 40,484 
Other Intangibles — Net 40,273 
Other Assets 6,776 
Total Assets, discontinued operations $ 119,776 
Liabilities:
Current liabilities $ 12,912 
Other liabilities 20,643 
Total Liabilities, discontinued operations $ 33,555 
In preparation for close of the separation and distribution, on April 7, 2022, Spinco drew $10,000 on its $10,000 term loan credit
agreement (Spinco Term Loan), which conveyed to WBD. Total debt conveyed was approximately $41,600, which included $1,600
of existing WarnerMedia debt, $30,000 of Spinco senior notes issued in March 2022 and the $10,000 Spinco Term Loan.
WarnerMedia cash transfer to Discovery was approximately $2,660.1
2
1
2
96
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
NOTE 24. QUARTERLY FINANCIAL INFORMATION (UNAUDITED)
The following tables represent our quarterly financial results:
2022 Calendar Quarter
First Second Third Fourth Annual
Total Operating Revenues $ 29,712 $ 29,643 $ 30,043 $ 31,343 $ 120,741 
Operating Income (Loss) 5,537 4,956 6,012 (21,092) (4,587)
Net Income (Loss) from
Continuing Operations 5,149 4,751 6,346 (23,120) (6,874)
Net Income (Loss) from Continuing
Operations Attributable to Common Stock 4,747 4,319 5,924 (23,536) (8,546)
Basic Earnings (Loss) Per Share
Attributable to Common Stock from
Continuing Operations $ 0.66 $ 0.60 $ 0.82 $ (3.20)$ (1.10)
Diluted Earnings (Loss) Per Share
Attributable to Common Stock from
Continuing Operations $ 0.65 $ 0.59 $ 0.79 $ (3.20)$ (1.10)
Includes actuarial gains and losses on pension and postretirement benefit plans (Note 14).
Includes goodwill impairments (Note 9) and an asset abandonment char ge (Note 7).
Quarterly earnings per share impacts may not add to full-year earnings per share impacts due to the dif ference in weighted-average common
shares for the quarters versus the weighted-average common shares for the year .
2021 Calendar Quarter
First Second Third Fourth Annual
Total Operating Revenues $ 35,877 $ 35,740 $ 31,326 $ 31,095 $ 134,038 
Operating Income 7,194 7,572 6,237 4,894 25,897 
Net Income from Continuing Operations 7,586 5,969 5,019 5,202 23,776 
Net Income from Continuing
Operations Attributable to Common Stock 7,143 5,526 4,613 4,802 22,084 
Basic Earnings Per Share
Attributable to Common Stock
from Continuing Operations $ 0.99 $ 0.77 $ 0.64 $ 0.67 $ 3.07 
Diluted Earnings Per Share
Attributable to Common Stock from
Continuing Operations $ 0.97 $ 0.76 $ 0.63 $ 0.66 $ 3.02 
Includes actuarial gains and losses on pension and postretirement benefit plans (Note 14).
Quarterly earnings per share impacts may not add to full-year earnings per share impacts due to the dif ference in weighted-average common
shares for the quarters versus the weighted-average common shares for the year .1 1 1 1,2
3
3
1
2
3
1 1 1 1
2
2
1
2
97
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
ITEM 9. CHANGES IN AND DISAGREEMENTS WITH ACCOUNTANTS ON ACCOUNTING AND FINANCIAL
DISCLOSURE
During our two most recent fiscal years, there has been no change in the independent accountant engaged as the principal
accountant to audit our financial statements, and the independent accountant has not expressed reliance on other independent
accountants in its reports during such time period.
ITEM 9A. CONTROLS AND PROCEDURES
Disclosure Controls and Procedures
The registrant maintains disclosure controls and procedures that are designed to ensure that information required to be disclosed by
the registrant is recorded, processed, summarized, accumulated and communicated to its management, including its principal
executive and principal financial officers, to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosure, and reported within the time
periods specified in the SEC’s rules and forms. The Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer have performed an
evaluation of the effectiveness of the design and operation of the registrant’s disclosure controls and procedures as of December 31,
2022. Based on that evaluation, the Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer concluded that the registrant’s disclosure
controls and procedures were effective as of December 31, 2022.
There have not been any changes in our internal control over financial reporting during our most recent fiscal quarter that have
materially affected, or are reasonably likely to materially affect, our internal control over financial reporting.
Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
a.Management’s Annual Report on Internal Control over Financial Reporting
The management of AT&T is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over financial reporting.
AT&T’s internal control system was designed to provide reasonable assurance as to the integrity and reliability of the published
financial statements. AT&T management assessed the effectiveness of the company’s internal control over financial reporting as of
December 31, 2022. In making this assessment, it used the criteria set forth by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the
Treadway Commission (COSO) in Internal Control – Integrated Framework (2013 framework). Based on its assessment, AT&T
management believes that, as of December 31, 2022, the Company’s internal control over financial reporting is effective based on
those criteria.
b.Attestation Report of the Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
The independent registered public accounting firm that audited the financial statements included in the Annual Report containing
the disclosure required by this Item, Ernst & Young LLP, has issued an attestation report on the Company’s internal control over
financial reporting.
ITEM 9B. OTHER INFORMATION
There is no information that was required to be disclosed in a report on Form 8-K during the fourth quarter of 2022 but was not
reported.
98
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
PART III
ITEM 10. DIRECTORS, EXECUTIVE OFFICERS AND CORPORATE GOVERNANCE
Information regarding executive officers required by Item 401 of Regulation S-K is furnished in a separate disclosure at the end of
Part I of this report entitled “Information about our Executive Officers.” Information regarding directors required by Item 401 of
Regulation S-K is incorporated herein by reference pursuant to General Instruction G(3) from the registrant’s 2023 definitive proxy
statement (Proxy Statement) under the heading “Management Proposal Item No. 1. Election of Directors.”
Information required by Item 405 of Regulation S-K is incorporated herein by reference pursuant to General Instruction G(3) from
the registrant’s Proxy Statement under the heading “Delinquent Section 16(a) Reports.”
The registrant has a separately-designated standing audit committee established in accordance with Section 3(a)(58)(A) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The members of the committee are Messrs. Luczo, McCallister and Ubiñas, and Ms. Taylor. The
additional information required by Item 407(d)(5) of Regulation S-K is incorporated herein by reference pursuant to General
Instruction G(3) from the registrant’s Proxy Statement under the heading “Audit Committee.”
The registrant has adopted a code of ethics entitled “Code of Ethics” that applies to the registrant’s principal executive officer,
principal financial officer, principal accounting officer, or controller or persons performing similar functions. The additional
information required by Item 406 of Regulation S-K is provided in this report under the heading “General” under Part I, Item 1.
Business.
ITEM 11. EXECUTIVE COMPENSATION
Information required by this Item is incorporated herein by reference pursuant to General Instruction G(3) from the registrant’s
Proxy Statement under the headings “Director Compensation,” “CEO Pay Ratio,” and the pages beginning with the heading
“Compensation Discussion and Analysis” and ending with, and including, the pages under the heading “Potential Payments upon
Change in Control.”
Information required by Item 407(e)(5) of Regulation S-K is included in the registrant’s Proxy Statement under the heading
“Compensation Committee Report” and is incorporated herein by reference pursuant to General Instruction G(3) and shall be
deemed furnished in this Annual Report on Form 10-K and will not be deemed incorporated by reference into any filing under the
Securities Act of 1933 or the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.
99
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
ITEM 12. SECURITY OWNERSHIP OF CERTAIN BENEFICIAL OWNERS AND MANAGEMENT AND RELATED
STOCKHOLDER MATTERS
Information required by Item 403 of Regulation S-K is included in the registrant’s Proxy Statement under the heading “Common
Stock Ownership,” which is incorporated herein by reference pursuant to General Instruction G(3).
Equity Compensation Plan Information
The following table provides information as of December 31, 2022, concerning shares of AT&T common stock authorized for
issuance under AT&T’s existing equity compensation plans.
Equity Compensation Plan Information
Plan CategoryNumber of securities to be
issued upon
exercise of
outstanding options,
warrants and rights
(a)Weighted average
exercise price of
outstanding
options, warrants
and rights
(b)Number of securities
 remaining available for
future issuance under
equity compensation plans
(excluding securities
reflected in column (a))
(c)
Equity compensation plans approved by
security holders 76,927,549 $ — 102,240,827 
Equity compensation plans not approved
by security holders — — — 
Total 76,927,549 $ — 102,240,827 
Includes the issuance of stock in connection with the following stockholder approved plans: (a) 0 stock options under the Stock
Purchase and Deferral Plan (SPDP), (b) 945,111 phantom stock units under the Stock Savings Plan (SSP), 18,492,845
phantom stock units under the SPDP, 0 restricted stock units under the 2011 Incentive Plan, 0 restricted stock units under the
2016 Incentive Plan and 35,383,614 restricted stock units under the 2018 Incentive Plan, (c) 0 target number of stock-settled
performance shares under the 2011 Incentive Plan, 0 target number of stock-settled performance shares under the 2016
Incentive Plan, and 19,478,272 target number of stock-settled performance shares under the 2018 Incentive Plan. At payout,
the target number of performance shares may be reduced to zero or increased by up to 150%. Each phantom stock unit and
performance share is settleable in stock on a 1-to-1 basis. The weighted-average exercise price in the table does not include
outstanding performance shares or phantom stock units.
The SSP was approved by stockholders in 1994 and then was amended by the Board of Directors in 2000 to increase the
number of shares available for purchase under the plan (including shares from the Company match and reinvested dividend
equivalents). Stockholder approval was not required for the amendment. To the extent applicable, the amount shown for
approved plans in column (a), in addition to the above amounts, includes 2,648,162 phantom stock units (computed on a first-
in-first-out basis) that were approved by the Board in 2000. Under the SSP, shares could be purchased with payroll deductions
and reinvested dividend equivalents by mid-level and above managers and limited Company partial matching contributions.
No new contributions may be made to the plan.
Includes 19,493,387 shares that may be issued under the SPDP, 80,375,750 shares that may be issued under the 2018 Incentive
Plan, and up to 2,371,691 shares that may be purchased through reinvestment of dividends on phantom shares held in the SSP.
Does not include certain stock options issued by companies acquired by AT&T that were converted into options to acquire
AT&T stock. As of December 31, 2022, there were 2,861,614 shares of AT&T common stock subject to the converted options,
having a weighted-average exercise price of $20.18. Also, does not include 346,157 outstanding phantom stock units that were
issued by companies acquired by AT&T that are convertible into stock on a 1-to-1 basis, along with an estimated 135,365
shares that may be purchased with reinvested dividend equivalents paid on the outstanding phantom stock units. No further
phantom stock units, other than reinvested dividends, may be issued under the assumed plans. The weighted-average exercise
price in the table does not include outstanding performance shares or phantom stock units.(1) (2)
(3)(2)
(1)
(2)
(3)
100
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
ITEM 13. CERTAIN RELATIONSHIPS AND RELATED TRANSACTIONS, AND DIRECTOR INDEPENDENCE
Information required by Item 404 of Regulation S-K is included in the registrant’s Proxy Statement under the heading “Related
Person Transactions,” which is incorporated herein by reference pursuant to General Instruction G(3). Information required by Item
407(a) of Regulation S-K is included in the registrant’s Proxy Statement under the heading “Director Independence,” which is
incorporated herein by reference pursuant to General Instruction G(3).
ITEM 14. PRINCIPAL ACCOUNTANT FEES AND SERVICES
Information required by this Item is included in the registrant’s Proxy Statement under the heading “Principal Accountant Fees and
Services,” which is incorporated herein by reference pursuant to General Instruction G(3).
Part IV
ITEM 15. EXHIBITS AND FINANCIAL STATEMENT SCHEDULES
(a)Documents filed as a part of the report:
Page
(1) Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm (PCAOB ID: 42) 40
Financial Statements covered by Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm: 42
Consolidated Statements of Income 43
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income 44
Consolidated Balance Sheets 45
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows 46
Consolidated Statements of Changes in Stockholders’ Equity 47
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements 49
(2) Financial Statement Schedules:
II - Valuation and Qualifying Accounts 105
Financial statement schedules other than those listed above have been omitted because the required information is contained in the
financial statements and notes thereto, or because such schedules are not required or applicable.
(3) Exhibits:
Exhibits identified in parentheses below, on file with the SEC, are incorporated herein by reference as exhibits hereto. Unless
otherwise indicated, all exhibits so incorporated are from File No. 1-8610.
Exhibit
Number
2-aAgreement and Plan of Merger, dated as of May 17, 2021, by and among AT&T
Inc., Magallanes, Inc., and Discovery, Inc. (Exhibit 2.1 to Form 8-K filed on May
20, 2021)*
2-b Separation and Distribution Agreement, dated as of May 17, 2021, by and among
AT&T Inc., Magallanes, Inc., and Discovery, Inc. (Exhibit 2.2 to Form 8-K filed on
May 20, 2021)*
3-aRestated Certificate of Incorporation, filed with the Secretary of State of Delaware
on December 13, 2013 (Exhibit 3.1 to Form 8-K filed on December 16, 2013)
3-b Bylaws (Exhibit 3.1 to Form 8-K filed on February 2, 2023)
3-cCertificate of Designations with respect to Series A Preferred Stock (Exhibit 3.1 to
Form 8-K filed on December 12, 2019)
3-d Certificate of Designations with respect to Series B Preferred Stock (Exhibit 3.1 to
Form 8-K filed on February 18, 2020)
3-eCertificate of Designations with respect to Series C Preferred Stock (Exhibit 3.2 to
Form 8-K filed on February 18, 2020)
101
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
4-aNo instrument which defines the rights of holders of long-term debt of the registrant
and all of its consolidated subsidiaries is filed herewith pursuant to Regulation S-K,
Item 601(b)(4)(iii)(A), except for the instruments referred to in 4-b, 4-c, 4-d, 4-e, 4-
f below. Pursuant to this regulation, the registrant hereby agrees to furnish a copy of
any such instrument not filed herewith to the SEC upon request.
4-bGuaranty of certain obligations of Pacific Bell Telephone Co. and Southwestern
Bell Telephone Co. (Exhibit 4-c to Form 10-K for the period ending December 31,
2011)
4-cGuaranty of certain obligations of Ameritech Capital Funding Corp., Indiana Bell
Telephone Co. Inc., Michigan Bell Telephone Co., Pacific Bell Telephone Co.,
Southwestern Bell Telephone Company, Illinois Bell Telephone Company, The Ohio
Bell Telephone Company, The Southern New England Telephone Company,
Southern New England Telecommunications Corporation, and Wisconsin Bell, Inc.
(Exhibit 4-d to Form 10-K for the period ending December 31, 2011)
4-dGuarantee of certain obligations of AT&T Corp. (Exhibit 4-e to Form 10-K for the
period ending December 31, 2011)
4-eIndenture, dated as of May 15, 2013, between AT&T Inc. and The Bank of New
York Mellon Trust Company, N.A., as Trustee (Exhibit 4.1 to Form 8-K filed on
May 15, 2013)
4-fIndenture dated as of November 1, 1994 between SBC Communications Inc. and
The Bank of New York, as Trustee (Exhibit 4-h to Form 10-K for the period ending
December 31, 2013)
4-gDeposit Agreement, dated December 12, 2019, among the AT&T Inc.,
Computershare Inc. and Computershare Trust Company, N.A., collectively, as
depositary, and the holders from time to time of the depository receipts described
therein (Exhibit 4.3 to Form 8-K filed December 12, 2019)
4-hDeposit Agreement, dated February 18, 2020, among the Company, Computershare
Inc. and Computershare Trust Company, N.A., collectively, as depositary, and the
holders from time to time of the depositary receipts described therein (Exhibit 4.3 to
Form 8-K filed February 18, 2020)
4-iDescription of AT&T’s Securities Registered Under Section 12 of the Exchange Act
10-a2018 Incentive Plan (Exhibit 10-a to Form 10-K for the period ending December
31, 2017)**
10-b2016 Incentive Plan (Exhibit 10-a to Form 10-Q for the period ending March 31,
2016)**
10-cResolution Regarding John Stankey (Exhibit 10-b to Form 10-Q for the period
ending September 30, 2017)**
10-d2011 Incentive Plan (Exhibit 10-a to Form 10-Q for the period ending September
30, 2015)**
10-eShort Term Incentive Plan (Exhibit 10.1 to Form 8-K filed on February 2, 2018)**
10-fSupplemental Life Insurance Plan (Exhibit 10.1 to Form 8-K filed on June 26,
2020)**
10-gSupplemental Retirement Income Plan (Exhibit 10-e to Form 10-K for the period
ending December 31, 2013)**
10-h2005 Supplemental Employee Retirement Plan (Exhibit 10-g to Form 10-K for the
period ending December 31, 2021)**
10-iSalary and Incentive Award Deferral Plan (Exhibit 10-k to Form 10-K for the period
ending December 31, 2011)**
10-jStock Savings Plan (Exhibit 10-l to Form 10-K for the period ending December 31,
2011)**
10-kStock Purchase and Deferral Plan as amended July 28, 2022 (Exhibit 10.3 to Form
10-Q for the period ending September 30, 2022)**
10-lCash Deferral Plan as amended July 28, 2022 (Exhibit 10.2 to Form 10-Q for the
period ending September 30, 2022)**
10-mMaster Trust Agreement for AT&T Inc. Deferred Compensation Plans and Other
Executive Benefit Plans and subsequent amendments dated August 1, 1995 and
November 1, 1999 (Exhibit 10-dd to Form 10-K for the period ending December
31, 2009)**
10-nOfficer Disability Plan (Exhibit 10-i to Form 10-Q for the period ending June 30,
2009)**
10-oAT&T Inc. Health Plan (Exhibit 10.1 to Form 10-Q for the period ending September
30, 2022)**
10-pPension Benefit Makeup Plan No.1 (Exhibit 10-n to Form 10-K for the period
ending December 31, 2016)**
10-qAT&T Inc. Equity Retention and Hedging Policy as amended March 24, 2022
(Exhibit 10.2 to Form 10-Q for the period ending March 31, 2022)
10-rAdministrative Plan (Exhibit 10-q to Form 10-K for the period ending December
31, 2019)**
10-sAT&T Inc. Non-Employee Director Stock and Deferral Plan**
10-tAT&T Inc. Non-Employee Director Stock Purchase Plan (Exhibit 10-t to Form 10-
KfortheperiodendingDecember312013)**
K for the period ending December 31, 2013)**
102
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
10-uAT&T Inc. Board of Directors Communications Concession Program
10-vForm of Indemnity Agreement, effective July 1, 1986, between Southwestern Bell
Corporation (now AT&T Inc.) and its directors and officers. (Exhibit 10-bb to Form
10-K for the period ending December 31, 2011)**
10-wAT&T Executive Physical Program (Exhibit 10-ff to Form 10-K for the period
ending December 31, 2016)**
10-xAttorney Fee Payment Agreement for John Stankey (Exhibit 10.1 to Form 8-K filed
on July 3, 2018)**
10-y$12,000,000,000 Amended and Restated Credit Agreement, dated as of November
18, 2022, among AT&T Inc., the lenders named therein and Citibank, N.A., as
agent. (Exhibit 10.1 to Form 8-K filed on November 18, 2022)
10-zAmended and Restated Contribution Agreement (Exhibit 10-ee to Form 10-K for
the period ending December 31, 2018)
10-aaFifth Amended and Restated Limited Liability Company Agreement of Mobility II
LLC (Exhibit 10.1 to Form 10-Q for the period ending September 30, 2020)
10-bbFirst Amendment to the Fifth Amended and Restated Limited Liability Company
Agreement of Mobility II LLC
10-ccSecond Amendment to the Fifth Amended and Restated Limited Liability Company
Agreement of Mobility II LLC
10-ddThird Amendment to the Fifth Amended and Restated Limited Liability Company
Agreement of Mobility II LLC
10-eeAmended and Restated Registration Rights Agreement by and among AT&T Inc.
and The SBC Master Pension Trust and Brock Fiduciary Services LLC (Exhibit 10-
ii to Form 10-K for the period ending December 31, 2018)
10-ffFirst Amendment to Amended and Restated Registration Rights Agreement by and
among AT&T Inc. and The SBC Master Pension Trust and Brock Fiduciary Services
LLC (Exhibit 10.2 to Form 10-Q for the period ending September 30, 2020)
10-ggSecond Amended and Restated Limited Liability Company Agreement of NCWPCS
MPL Holdings, LLC (Exhibit 10.1 to Form 8-K filed on December 12, 2019)
10-hhAT&T Inc. Change in Control Severance Plan (Exhibit 10.1 to Form 8-K filed on
June 30, 2014)**
10-iiAgreement of Contribution and Subscription, dated February 25, 2021 (Exhibit 10.1
to Form 8-K filed on February 25, 2021)
10-jjEmployee Matters Agreement by and among AT&T Inc., Magallanes, Inc., and
Discovery, Inc. dated as of May 17, 2021 (Exhibit 10.3 to Form 8-K Filed on May
20, 2021)
10-kkTax Matters Agreement between AT&T Inc., Magallanes, Inc., and Discovery, Inc.
dated as of May 17, 2021 (Exhibit 10.4 to Form 8-K Filed on May 20, 2021)
10-llAmended and Restated Limited Liability Company Agreement of DIRECTV
Entertainment Holdings LLC, dated as of July 31, 2021 (Exhibit 10.1 to Form 8-K
filed August 2, 2021)
10-mmRelocation Program Plan (Exhibit 10.2 to Form 10-Q for the period ending
September 30, 2021)**
10-nnAmendment Regarding Continuation of Active Employee Participant Benefits in
Certain AT&T Benefit Plans in Connection with DIRECTV Transaction (Exhibit
10.3 to Form 10-Q for the period ending September 30, 2021)**
21 Subsidiaries of AT&T Inc.
23 Consent of Ernst & Young LLP
24 Powers of Attorney
31 Rule 13a-14(a)/15d-14(a) Certifications
31.1Certification of Principal Executive Officer
31.2Certification of Principal Financial Officer
32 Section 1350 Certification
99 Supplemental Interim Financial Information
103
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
101The consolidated financial statements from the Company’s Form 10-K for the year
ended December 31, 2022, as filed with the SEC on February 13, 2023, formatted in
Inline XBRL: (i) Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows, (ii) Consolidated
Statements of Operations, (iii) Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income,
(iv) Consolidated Balance Sheets, and (v) Notes to Consolidated Financial
Statements, tagged as blocks of text and including detailed tags.
104Cover Page Interactive Data File (formatted as Inline XBRL and contained in
Exhibit 101)
* Certain schedules (or similar attachments) have been omitted pursuant to Item 601(a)(5) or Item 601(b)(2) of Regulation S-K. The registrant
agrees to furnish copies of such schedules (or similar attachments) to the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission upon request.
**Management contracts and compensatory plans and arrangements required to be filed as exhibits pursuant to Item 15(b) of this report.
We will furnish to stockholders upon request, and without charge, a copy of the Annual Report to Stockholders and the Proxy
Statement, portions of which are incorporated by reference in the Form 10-K. We will furnish any other exhibit at cost.
ITEM 16. FORM 10-K SUMMARY
None.
104
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
SCHEDULE II - VALUA TION AND QUALIFYING ACCOUNTS
Allowance for  Credit Losses
COL. A COL. B COL. C COL. D COL. E
Additions
(1) (2) (3)
Balance at
Beginning of
PeriodCharged to
Costs and
Expenses (a)Charged to Other
Accounts (b) Acquisitions Deductions (c)Balance at End
of Period (d)
Year 2022 $ 1,163 $ 1,865 $ — $ — $ 2,017 $ 1,011 
Year 2021 $ 1,457 $ 1,241 $ — $ — $ 1,535 $ 1,163 
Year 2020 $ 1,150 $ 1,798 $ 405 $ — $ 1,896 $ 1,457 
(a) Includes amounts previously written of f which were credited directly to this account when recovered.
Excludes direct char ges and credits to expense for nontrade receivables in the consolidated statements of income.
Includes the impact to operating expenses, for the year ended December 31, 2020, after adoption of ASC 326.
(b) Opening adjustments upon adoption of ASC 326, with modified retrospective application, as of January 1, 2020 (see Note 1).
(c) Amounts written of f as uncollectible, or related to divested entities.
(d) Includes balances applicable to trade receivables, loans, contract assets and other assets subject to credit loss measurement (see Note 1).
SCHEDULE II - VALUATION AND QUALIFYING ACCOUNTS
Allowance for Deferred Tax Assets
COL. A COL. B COL. C COL. D COL. E
Additions
(1) (2) (3)
Balance at
Beginning of
PeriodCharged to
Costs and
ExpensesCharged to Other
Accounts Acquisitions DeductionsBalance at End
of Period
Year 2022 $ 4,343 (168) — — — $ 4,175 
Year 2021 $ 4,557 (214) — — — $ 4,343 
Year 2020 $ 4,715 (158) — — — $ 4,557 
105
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this
report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized, on the 14th day of February, 2023.
AT&T INC.
/s/ Pascal Desroches
Pascal Desroches
Senior Executive Vice President
   and Chief Financial Officer
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following
persons on behalf of the registrant and in the capacities and on the date indicated.
Principal Executive Officer:
John T. Stankey*
Chief Executive Officer
and President
Principal Financial Officer:
Pascal Desroches
Senior Executive Vice President
and Chief Financial Officer
/s/ Pascal Desroches
Pascal Desroches, as attorney-in-fact
and on his own behalf as Principal
Financial Officer
Principal Accounting Officer:
Debra L. Dial
Senior Vice President, Chief
Accounting Officer and Controller
/s/ Debra L. Dial
February 13, 2023
Directors:
William E. Kennard* Beth E. Mooney*
Scott T. Ford* Matthew K. Rose*
Glenn H. Hutchins* John T. Stankey*
Stephen J. Luczo* Cynthia B. Taylor*
Michael B. McCallister* Luis A. Ubiñas*
* by power of attorney
106
